{1318}{1470}A picture with a smile -|and perhaps, a tear.
{1584}{1728}"Charity Hospital"
{1789}{1910}The Woman -|whose sin was motherhood.
{2966}{3000}Alone.
{3124}{3154}The man.
{7670}{7710}His morning promenade.
{8246}{8292}"Awkward ass."
{9860}{9912}"Pardon me, you dropped something."
{13955}{14013}"Is that yours ?"
{14057}{14103}"What its name?"
{14305}{14340}"John"
{18703}{18877}Five years later...
{20147}{20210}"Put the quater in the gas meter."
{21912}{22004}"You know what streets we worked today ?"
{26201}{26270}All`s well...Job number 13.
{27148}{27167}Off duty.
{29578}{29632}The woman -|now a star of great prominence.
{30053}{30112}Professor Guido, impressario.
{30410}{30504}"Read what the critics say... wonderful!"
{32485}{32610}Charity -|to some a duty, to others a joy.
{40613}{40662}Enter - his brother.
{41194}{41232}" You wicked boy."
{41436}{41491}"Go lick`im."
{41713}{41781}"If your kid beats my brother,|then i`m going to beat you."
{43726}{43821}"And you wouldn`t strike this man,|would you?"
{44516}{44671}"Remember - if he smites you on one cheek,|offer him the other."
{45334}{45365}A successful retreat.
{45990}{46062}"Oh, well, I guess he`s not in.".
{46483}{46581}"This child is ill. Get a doctor at once!"
{46731}{46823}"I must go now, but I`ll return."
{47040}{47145}The country doctor.
{48000}{48032}"Say `ah`."
{48573}{48601}"Louder!"
{49254}{49323}"Are you the father of this child?"
{49401}{49426}"Well - pràctically."
{49513}{49565}"Explain yourself."
{50547}{50630}"This child needs proper care and attention."
{50843}{50897}"I`ll attend to the matter."
{51541}{51744}Convalescence
{52082}{52151}The proper care and attention.
{52356}{52452}Country Orfan Asylum
{52916}{52994}"Ask him where the kid is."
{53125}{53237}"Ask him if he`s got any belongings."
{53300}{53375}" Tell him it`s none of his business."
{60083}{60116}Night.
{63375}{63553}"You don`t charge for a baby in arms ?"
{64197}{64369}$1000 Reward|Lost child wanted...
{67928}{67975}Dawn.
{70316}{70357}Dreamland.
{71962}{71991}Shopping.
{72503}{72553}Off for a spin.
{72797}{72826}Sin creeps in.
{72858}{72908}Welcome to our city.
{73211}{73248}The trouble begins.
{73385}{73426}"Vamp him."
{73667}{73698}Innocence.
{74237}{74277}Getting flighty.
{74440}{74480}Her sweetheart arrives.
{75083}{75126}Jealousy.
{78571}{78696}The End
{78712}{78785}translation
THE IDLE CLASS
The summer season.
An absent minded husband.
DEAREST BE AT DEPOT
TEN OCLOCK.
GLAD YOU'RE NOT DRINKING
YOUR LOVING WIFE, EDNA
His wife.
The afternoon... a lonely husband.
I will occupy other rooms until you stop drinking. Edna
A lonely wife.
The lonely tramp.
That evening.
The lonely husband.
Come to the Ball tonight and I will forgive you.
Your loving wife, Edna
The lonely wife.
A lonely tramp.
"Madam awaits you, sir."
"You look so strange... won't you sit down?"
"My wife... and flirting."
"Hello, father."
"This is my daughter and her husband."
"Oh, no... we're not married."
"You dare insult my daughter."
"That's my wife. Don"t you know your own son-in-law?"
"Father, we owe that man an apology."
Ripped with SubRip 1.17 and Verified by CdinT cdint@hotmail.com
I deliver perfection... and don't brag about it! :D
In the great Gold Rush, Alaska was the hope and dream of men, the ruthless siren of the Far North, beckoning thousands to her icy bosom.
Beckoning thousands to her unknown regions.
Chilkoot Pass was the great barrier to the gold fields.
Over this Pass men faced untold misery and hardship.
Many lost their lives.
Some fell by the wayside, others lost courage and turned back.
But the brave went on.
Far into the icy north, deep into the silent nowhere, came an undaunted lone prospector.
And somewhere in that nowhere was another lone prospector.
With cheerful optimism our little Columbus descended, then stopped, stepped, slipped and slid.
"Now let me see", thought the little fellow.
"Before I know where I am,
I must get there."
There in that frozen wilderness a dream came true, and a lone voice shrieked into the solemn sky,
"Eureka! I've found it, a mountain of gold!"
But the elements laughed, roared and thundered.
In that raging nowhere was a lone cabin, and another lone man,
Black Larson, an unmitigated, predatory scoundrel.
Out of the lashing storm came the Little Fellow to find shelter and perhaps a little hospitality.
There he sat, resting his weary bones as the icy wind howled through the knothole.
"Come here", said Larson.
"What are you doing?"
"Eating, obviously."
"Get out."
"Go on!"
"Get out!"
The wind also was giving
Big Jim his troubles.
Big Jim was the noble type.
He had suffered.
Oh, how he loved to suffer.
He suffered about everything.
"Get out", said Black Larson.
"Or I'll fill you both full of lead."
"Now then, the pair of you, get out!"
"Out!"
That kind of noise
Jim don't tolerate.
"I'll stay right here, understand?"
"Right here", said Big Jim.
"Yes, sir, he'll stay right here", said the Little Fellow.
"Understand? We stay right here."
And stay they did, for days and nights.
The cabin moaned and groaned.
Two men walked and never talked, hunger gnawed their bones.
"I must have food!" yelled Big Jim.
"I must have food!"
"What are you eating?"
Said Black Larson.
"Nothing."
"Open your mouth!"
"Liar! It's that candle."
"That?" said the Little Fellow.
"How revolting."
"If I thought you were holding out on me, I'd slit your gizzard!"
"One of us must brave that storm, if we're to get food."
"Come here, the pair of you."
"We'll cut the cards and the low man goes."
"You're the man", said Jim.
"Goodbye, good luck."
"Don't forget to bring home the bacon."
Somewhere in that nowhere, the law was looking for Black Larson.
Desperate with hunger and here it was Thanksgiving Day.
Nevertheless there was something to be thankful for.
"Not quite done yet, give it two more minutes."
"Come on, come on", said Big Jim.
After scouring the country for food, the Little Fellow had to admit he had seen nothing, not even a field mouse.
From the pangs of hunger,
Big Jim was becoming delirious, hysterical.
In fact he was a pain in the neck.
"Food, food!" he thundered.
"I can put another shoe in the pot."
"No, no, anything but that!"
Poor Jim, he couldn't take it.
"What's the matter?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"I thought you were a chicken."
"Well, build up the fire", said Big Jim.
"What's the matter with you?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"Come, my pretty bird", said Big Jim.
"Don't be childish."
"Hey, quit it.
Don't be foolish, it's me!"
"You!" said Jim.
"I'm sorry. I must be crazy."
"You're telling me", said the Little Fellow.
"You go inside. I'll take the gun in case you lose it."
Chicken or no chicken, the Little Fellow looks appetizing to Big Jim.
Meanwhile Black Larson stumbled onto Big Jim's mountain of gold.
Then came the parting of the ways,
Big Jim to his mine, our hero to his fate.
"Goodbye", said the Little Fellow.
"It's been a great pleasure knowing you."
Treachery awaited Big Jim at his mountain of gold.
Big Jim looked deep into the eyes of Black Larson and saw there the soul of a skunk.
Caught in a maelstrom of desperate deeds,
Black Larson swept on to impending doom.
And out of a dream in that frozen waste, a city grew.
And humanity warmed it with living, loving and desiring.
Georgia.
Jack was a ladies' man.
Georgia was quick and impulsive, proud and independent.
In the evening Georgia worked as a dancehall girl.
Jack had lots of appeal for Georgia.
Perhaps that's why she resented him.
Out of the night came the Little Fellow, towards the dancehall, that beacon light of pleasure, that retreat of lost dreams.
"Georgia, why aren't you nice to Jack?"
"I believe he really likes you", said the girl.
"He likes everybody", said Georgia quite audibly.
"I'm bored with this place", she continued.
"I'd give it all up if I could find someone honest and worthwhile."
"Don't worry,
I'll find him someday."
Then she turned and looked and looked and looked.
"Kinda fresh, ain't ya?"
Thought Jack.
"Get down off that high horse."
"Me and you are gonna dance."
"Hey there, pan out a tune."
"Just a moment,
I said we're gonna dance."
"I beg your pardon", said Georgia.
To show her utter contempt for Jack, she picked out the most deplorable looking tramp in the dancehall.
"Hey you, come here."
"Yes, you. Do you want to dance?"
"You see, I'm very particular about whom I dance with."
And there he stood, the dauntless cavalier, guarding... her sanctuary.
"If you wanna make a hit with your lady friend",
"you should put your hat on straight, like this!"
"Take that you... Ouch!"
"Huh! Very good."
"Didn't know me own strength", said the Little Fellow.
Hank Curtis' cabin was a stone's throw from the dancehall.
Hank was a mining engineer who lived alone and occasionally went on long expeditions into the Far North.
Hank was kind and human, and our hero cold and hungry, and the beans smelled good and the coffee was steaming hot.
So the Little Fellow devised a way of getting breakfast.
Big Jim recovered from the blow he received from Black Larson but lost his memory.
Hank's partner arrives.
Both are ready to leave on a long expedition.
Hank informs his partner that the Little Fellow is to look after the cabin while he's away.
"Goodbye", said Hank.
"And don't forget to feed the mule."
Since that night in the dancehall the Little Fellow hadn't seen Georgia, but an incident was to bring them together again.
There she stood, her loveliness lighting the room, filling his soul with the music of romance for which he was so ill-fitted.
As she introduced her friends, his heart began to sing.
As they warmed up by the stove, he excused himself to get firewood.
And in that cabin his secret was revealed, his love for Georgia.
And the girls giggled and laughed, perhaps in order to hide their pity.
For in the world of the dancehall it wasn't wise for the girls to reveal their hearts.
And so they thought they'd have a little fun with him.
There in the gloaming they sat, their faces alight with mischief, but all the while his heart was singing.
And so she fooled and flirted and stroked his hair.
He knew she was fooling, but he was happy.
For she was near him, holding his hand, smiling at him.
"Nice place you have here", said Georgia.
"I hope you will invite us again."
What if she were fooling?
He was enjoying the warmth of her attention.
And the lady was enjoying the warmth of his chair.
And now she was leaving.
The light of her loveliness would be gone.
And he would be left with an emptiness, to return to his bleak, lonely existence.
"Pardon me", said the Little Fellow,
"But, uh..."
He was lost for words.
"Would you really like to come again?"
"Of course", said Georgia.
"What do you say, girls?"
"We'll come for dinner
New Year's Eve", said the ladies.
"Very well", said Georgia.
"We'll come to dinner
New Year's Eve."
Of course at that moment
Georgia would forget her gloves!
For the next few days the Little
Fellow hustled and shoveled in order to buy that New Year's dinner.
The eve of a new year.
New hopes and new dreams.
And there was Georgia, caressing him with her smiles and tender glances.
And the girls called for a speech.
But he was too happy to speak.
All that mattered was Georgia was there. Georgia!
So he muttered and stuttered and finally said,
"I can't make a speech but I'll do a dance."
And a dance he did, with the rolls.
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And days of auld lang syne
For auld lang syne
My dear
For auld lang...
In the midst of all their revelry the vague memory of a promise crept into Georgia's mind.
"Let's go up and visit the Little Fellow", she said.
"We'll have some fun with him", said Jack.
"We'll send Georgia in first, then give him a scare."
"Oh, forget it", said Jack.
"How about giving me a little attention?"
A day or so later in the Recorder's office,
Big Jim tried to convince the assayers that he had a mountain of gold.
"Where is this place?" they said.
But Big Jim's memory had failed him.
All he knew was that it was near the cabin.
"The cabin, that's it!"
"F I could find my way to the cabin
I could find the mine."
"But I can't remember."
"Hey!" said Jack,
"Georgia's been looking for you."
The Little Fellow knew otherwise.
How dare that cad mention her name so lightly?
For two pins he'd give him another thrashing.
However being a little underweight he would ignore the insult.
But it was true.
Georgia had been looking for him.
Georgia had written him a letter.
And as he went looking for Georgia, so Big Jim went looking for him.
"You, you!" said Big Jim.
"You! The very man
I've been looking for!"
"The cabin, the cabin! Where is it?"
"Answer me, I say!"
"Can't you speak, man? Tell me!"
"Where's the cabin? Where is it?"
"At last I shall find my mountain of gold."
"To your feet man, quick!"
"You're coming with me!"
"Take me to the cabin and I'll make you a millionaire!"
"Georgia! Just a moment", said the Little Fellow.
"Georgia, you don't have to explain.
I understand."
"I love you.
I'll take you away from this life."
"I'm going away, and when I return",
"I shall come back."
Exhausted and footweary, they arrived at the cabin.
"Ah!" said Big Jim,
"it won't be long now."
"Bring in the eats and tomorrow we'll start for the mine.
"Here, take a swig of this.
It'll put hair on your topcoat."
"My, this is a heavy lamb chop", said the Little fellow.
Then fate - it's always fate - played its little joke, and again the elements laughed, roared and thundered, but through it all our heroes soundly slumbered.
Then came the dawn.
The Little Fellow awoke, blissfully ignorant of what happened the night before, but feeling definitely conscious of "the morning after".
"Oh well, may as well tidy up and get breakfast."
"This is the worst liver attack
I've ever had."
"Feel that rocking?"
"It's the stomach."
"It's not the stomach."
"Let's go to the other side."
"We'll see how far it will go over."
"Something must be missing underneath."
"I'll go outside and see what it is."
"Now", said Big Jim,
"don't get excited."
"Take it easy, don't move, don't breathe!"
"I said don't breathe, stupid."
"You can be most annoying at times."
"If you'll only be cool, be calm", said Big Jim,
"We have nothing to worry about."
"Now show a little character!
Where's your willpower?"
"Now listen,
I've got a very good idea."
"Hold your hands like this, then I can get out first."
"You see what I mean?"
Said Big Jim.
"Your mind is chaotic.
You have no psychology."
"You have no control."
And Big Jim discovered his claim!
"Now we shall be rich", said Jim.
"We shall be millionaires!"
And so they were.
Now they were homeward bound and they were leaving the hardship and toil of Alaska to live in the land of milk and honey.
To live, laugh and indulge themselves in the lap of luxury.
They were famous, and sought after by the press.
In their cabin deluxe they were welcomed and waited upon.
The reporter wanted to write the Little Fellow's life story,
"From Rags to Riches", and he graciously consented.
And Big Jim was manicured.
"Not the nails", said he,
"the corns".
The reporter thought of a good idea, to have the Little Fellow pose in his mining clothes.
It would make a human story.
Georgia...
There she was in the steerage.
Neither knew of the other's presence.
Georgia overheard the officer say there was a stowaway aboard.
"You!" said Georgia.
"I thought I'd never see you again."
And then she mistook him for the stowaway.
The officer was going to put him in irons.
But Georgia pleaded for him and said she would pay his fare.
"Heck!" said the Captain.
"That's no stowaway."
"That's Big Jim's partner, the multimillionaire."
Then of course there were apologies.
The Little Fellow gathered himself together.
James, the valet, was told to prepare for an extra guest.
"Pardon me", said the reporter,
"but who's the lady?"
"Buzz buzz buzz!"
"Oh, you don't say!
Well, congratulations."
"This will make a great story, and with a happy ending."
And so it was.
A happy ending.
Subtitles by Sionann O'Neill
Subtitling: TVS - TITRA FILM
MEZHRABPOMRUS 1927
THE GIRL WITH THE HAT BOX
Written with the goal of promoting the issue of public loans, this comedy, one of Barnet's first works, is interesting for its lyricism and for its new way of presenting characters.
Natasha Korostelyova and her grandfather lived in a small house in Moscow's suburb.
Every day Fogelev, the railroad clerk, rushed after the object of his hopeless love.
Natasha and her grandfather made hats at home.
I'm afraid, Natashenka, that you'll soon fly away from me!
You mean marriage?
Don't be afraid!...
Every morning Natasha brought the ordered hats to Moscow...
From his remote village
Ilya Snegiryov was coming to Moscow dreaming to enter the worker's faculty.
MADAME IRENE, HATS, was the shop for which Natasha worked.
Marfushka, the shop owner's servant.
Madam, the house committee is here!
One of the apartment's rooms of Mrs Irene was registered under Natasha's name but it was in fact occupied by Nikolay
Matveevich Trager, Irene's husband.
And where's Natalya Korostelyova, the tenant registered here?
Darling, you should spend the night here sometimes!
The house committee is bothering us again!
I'd like to know your turnover.
I'm the tax assessor.
Idiot! It's the tax assessor!
In search of housing.
Excuse me, is there a room for rent anywhere?
Ilya Snegiryov spent all nights at the railway stations.
For heaven's sake, what do you want from me?
Excuse me, I...
Incidentally...  dropped a rouble... searched... I have nowhere to sleep...
What were you dreaming of, Natasha?
Poor boy, he has no place to sleep.
In search of another meeting.
Madame Irene's home was preparing to receive guests.
I can get you a room if you want.
Ilya Snegiryov. small farmer.
Single...
...Married.
Natalya Korostelyova. Milliner.
Single...
...Married.
You asked, I got it fixed : here is my husband!  He's gonna live in my room.
I'll let nobody in! Though you're registered in this room, it is not yours!
You'd better not offend my wife!
Is it her room or not?
Where is it?
Well, here's our tenant... and she's just got married!...
May I ask you to go into the next room!
It's falling.
Good-bye "husband"!
I'll visit you some day...
The first night went perfectly.
Mr and Mrs Trager declare war.
I declare that tenant Natasha Korostelyova, de facto, doesn't intend to inhabit her room.
On the basis of all above mentioned it is obvious that Ilya Snegiryov, inhabiting the room, turns out to be her so-called husband and, thereby, is entitled to be evicted from the apartment that I'm responsible for.    N. Trager
Nothing, but lottery bond...
Irene darling! give me some money...
I'm broke! heads and tails...
You're still indebted to me for my work.
Pay this trollop!
STATE LOTTERY LOAN
Stop singing!
Madame, the house committee has come to see the new tenant!
And where is your, so to speak, wife?
I'm here!
Lend me 30 kopecks for the return ticket till tomorrow...
Fogelev still hoped that
Natasha would come with the last train.
I'm late for the last train!
...The last train swept his last hope away...
Aren't you sleeping?
Yes, I am!
I'm afraid! A mouse is running!
My God! A rat!
In the morning...
Let's listen now to the first winning numbers of the state lottery loan...
10.000 roubles prize goes to the bond 7219, serial number 05...
25.000 roubles prize... goes to the bond n掳 1419963, serial number 03...
Natasha's address! Quick!
She won 25.000 roubles with my lottery bond!
Natasha's address!!
Working with a round jack.
Going to the station for a newspaper...
I love you!
Natashka, marry me!
Give me back the bond!
It is a dear souvenir to me...
I left it in Ilya's room.
Here's your bond!
You won 25.000 roubles!
Farewell...
I wanted to say...
I agree, I'll...
... be your wife!
Now I don't agree!...
Farewell!
I request to dissolve my marriage with citizen N. P. Korostelyova, she won 25.000 roubles and people could consider that I'd married her for money.
Ilya Snegiryov
I agree - - - -
Your wife wanted money instead of bond...
It's for me the uttermost pleasure!
The lottery bond is in her hands!
Give me back the bond!
Before it's too late, Fogelev decided to make an offer to Natasha.
Sign the divorce petition...
I DO NOT agree - - -
Why are you making fun of me?
- - - N. Korostelyova
Here's your bond!
Idiot! Go and buy one hundred bonds!
THE END
The film The Wildcat was presented for the first to the public in 1921. 
The intertitles in the surviving print were different than the ones from the pages of the official Censor.
The new intertitles were prepared from the Censor archives.
The Wildcat
Comedy in 4 acts 
Hanns Kräly & Ernst Lubitsch
Director: Ernst Lubitsch
Scenery and costumes: Ernst Stern
Cameraman: Theodor Sparkuhl
The characters 
The commander of the fortress ... Viktor Janson 
His wife                      ... Marga Köhler
Their daughter                ... Edith Meller
Lt. Alexis                    ... Paul Heidemann 
Claudius, the head of the gang of thieves 
                              ... Wilhelm Digelmann 
Rischka his daughter          ... Pola Negri
Pepo, the timid thief ...Hermann Thimig
Dafko                 ...Paul Biensfeld
Zofano                ...Paul Grätz
Masilio               ...Max Kronert
Tripo                 ...Erwin Kopp
Location:  near Piffkaneiro
<:> First Act <:>
<:> Quiet! <:> 
Lili, the Commander's daughter.
Ministry of War 
General Piffkaneiro  
To the Commander of the Fortress Border. 
Lieutenant Alexis is transferred
It is imperative, as Lieutenant Alexis is best known to the female sex as "Alex the Seducer", to maintain very strict discipline with him. 
Signed: General Piffkaneiro 
Finally, a handsome man! 
What a pig!
How can you speak so about Alex? 
Alex prepaes to leave his home. 
My darling!
A word of goodbye.
Rómpese el corazón, lágrimas se derraman.
My heart breaks, tears expand, nostalgia grows and enlarges the ball in my throat
Go in peace and may your path be easy. 
You made me happy!
Goodbye, Daddy!
Claudius, the head of the thieves and his accomplices are the terrors of the border.
Hello, friends!
Hello, Chief!
Come on, give it up!
What have you stolen now?
Where have you hidden it this time?
I was at the movies.
Not behind the head!
Rischka, my child. 
She hit me!
Me, too! 
You should not indulge her, too!
Handkerchiefs!
Ah, the handsome man!
Take off your pants!'
Ah, the handsome man!
What you do to me, I'll do to you!
End of the First Act 
<:> Second Act <:>
The Brigands!
... attacked the Lieutenant.
Tell us what happened! 
Suddenly, a shot! 
Now I have eaten enough.
Go immediately and look for Lt. Alexis! 
But I am the ... 
Lieutenant.
The pajama pants are very cute.
Let me introduce you to my wife!.
And my very precious daughter.
- Do you like my daughter? 
- Pardon? ?
But you will not get my daughter's hand so easily!
Idiot!
This is unbelievable.
Why did you let him escape?
... and such a beautiful pajama pants, 
I wish I had had such a pair.
They would have been too small for you.
You have no idea how I froze.
The punitive expedition against the thieves.
You may make the coffee now.
Children, you look great!
If you please, Mr. Conductor!
They have already drawn!
Don't be rough!
War is war! 
We should not even permit them a slap.
At your service!
That girl has guts!
End of the Second Act.
<:> Third Act <:> 
Victory along the entire line.
You have fought valiantly, just as Hector faced the cannons!
We will reward you for this wonderful victory. 
As thanks, I offer you my daughter's hand!.
But I absolutely cannnot accept. 
But yes, you may even demand it! 
Nothing can be done otherwise... 
The victory celebration.
I have never felt so good!
Rischka!
Busy! 
Aren't you ashamed to dress in my closet!
We will soon be husband and wife! 
I am afraid!
This does not help me. 
I need you to stop.
You, come out! Impertinent person!
The air is unhealthy!
Ten legs, five men, and it plays!
End of the Third Act. 
<:> Fourth Act <:>
Rischka dreams.
Can you hear my heart beating?
Ah, the season of love ... 
Now is the time to marry that girl!
You promised him that one of us would marry her!
I will do what I promised! 
You must marry! 
And don't speak so crudely!
Who would want to marry me?
I would like to!
For Rischka, the big day ...
Will you make my daughter happy?
Always be honest and faithful forever, and to the grave.
The daughter of the commander of our fortress, after having given him every confidence ... will marry Lt. Alexis. 
The marriage will take place today..
Lieutenant, we must now leave for the wedding ceremony.
This could be your size.
I'll make myself more comfortable.
Why are you so taken with our daughter?
He loves you more than he does me!
I will cure him, however difficult it will be!
Where were you hidden all this time? 
End
Music:  Marco Dalpane (2000)
Director: Marco Dalpane
Recorded: Teatro Consorziale di Budrio
Sound: Franco Visioli, Nicola Zonca
Post-production: Thomas Schmölz
Editors: Nina Goslar 
Production: Foundation F.W. Murnau in collaboration with ZDF / Arte
The Ballets Suedois of Rolf de Mare has presented on the stage of the Theatre des Champ Elysees
In 1924 
The ballet RELACHE
Whose cinematic prologue reveals the auteurs
Francis Picabia and Erik Satie.
Between the two acts of that ballet a film was projected; it is based on a Francis Picabia screenplay 
And it uses the music of Erik Satie, recorded in 1967 under the supervision of Henri Sauguet  
Interlude by Rene Clair
The Flower of Love could find no more romantic spot...
...in which to blossom than in this poet's Dream Garden.
I love you.
I love you 2.
Are you comfortable?
I know a better way than that to break his neck.
He's my son and I'll break his neck any way I please.
Babe Ruth is a bat.
That afternoon the young inventor tries his patent fly-swatter.
Come in!
They are going to have peace if they have to go to Court and fight for it.
Her father's abused her long enough.
Now I want to marry her and take her home to my father.
Sign this bond to keep the peace.
We're going to get married.
After going to court to end their troubles they have a wedding to start more.
Wedding Presents
Hands off!
What happened to you?
I bought a Ford.
Get the groom, the bride's out in the alley.
I 'm giving up single life I feel
I'm losing something-
Where's the ring?
Straight from Woolworths.
ACME
5 and 10 cent Store
Father's watching, come and get me!
Presents
Photos by S. M. Eisenstein and other materials
Moscow Year 1923
Spectacle
"Even a Wise Man Stumbles"
At the Proletkult Theatre
Fragmentos of the cinematographic melodrama
Glumov's Diary included in the spectacle.
Sergei Eisenstein and the participants in the spectacle
G. Alexandrov,
V. Yanukova,
M. Strauss
A. Antonov and others.
We wanna see you, Mr. Hammer. What's the matter? Somebody pay their bill?
We want our money. Yes, money.
You want your money?
We wanna get paid.
Oh, you want my money? Is that fair? Do I want your money?
Suppose George Washington's soldiers had asked for money? Where would this country be today?
But they did ask.
And where's Washington?
No, my friends. No, money will never make you happy, and happy will never make you money.
That might be a wisecrack, but I doubt it.
We want our money.
I'll make you all a promise. If you'll all stick with me and work hard, we'll forget about money.
Let's get together and we'll make a regular hotel out of this place.
I'll put writing paper in the hotel, and next year if you behave yourselves, I'll put in envelopes.
I'm gonna put extra blankets free in all your rooms. There'll be no cover charge.
Think of the opportunities here in Florida.
Three years ago I came to Florida without a nickel in my pocket.
And now I've got a nickel in my pocket.
That's all very well, Mr. Hammer, but we haven't been paid in two weeks and we want our wages.
Wages? Do you wanna be wage slaves? Answer me that.
No. No, of course not.
Well, what makes wage slaves?
Wages. I want you to be free.
Remember there's nothing like liberty, except Colliers and the Saturday Evening Post.
Be free, my friends.
One for all and all for me, and me for you and three for five and six for a quarter.
Pardon me. A couple of telegrams for you, Mr. Hammer. There you are.
Business is beginning to pick up already.
Now if you gir... boys will only be calm.
Uh-huh. " We arrive this afternoon on the 4:30.
Kindly reserve two floors and three ceilings." They must be mice.
"If we like your property, we will immediately buy it."
See that, things have started our way already. Who's it from?
Western Union, and they've got a lot of money too.
On the 4:15, eh?
Well, I'll take the bus down myself.
Here's another one, Mr. Hammer. See, we're gonna be stuffed by tonight.
This hotel will be so crowded that we'll be turning away thousands of people.
"If there is another hotel in Cocoanut
Beach, cancel our reservations."
I knew it. It was too good.
Wait a minute. " P.S.
Aunt Fanny had an eight-pound boy.
Can you come to the wedding?"
You see, everything is all right, boys.
Everything is all right.
You're all invited to the wedding of Aunt Fanny's eight-pound boy.
Hooray! Oh, but that won't be for a couple of years yet.
In the meantime, I want you to buck up, get down to work.
Let's put this thing over with a bang.
And above all, forget about money.
Don't think of it. Just forget about it, because you won't get it anyway.
Hooray. Hooray.
Hooray!
See that? I keep them dancing for their money.
Jamison, I'm going down to meet the 4:15.
If I never come back, you'll know I'm still waiting for the train. Yes, sir.
And in my absence, I'm relying on you to take good care of everything. You can depend upon me, sir.
That's fine. If any guests come in, take good care of them. And think of me, Jamison.
You bet I will.
I'll be back someday.
All right. Keep a light burning in the window, if you can find a window.
All right, sir. Good-bye.
Good-bye, Jamison.
Hello, Harvey.
Why so downhearted?
Is Bob Adams cutting you out with Polly Potter?
I'm not worried about a hotel clerk. No, but
I'll bet you're worried about the Potter millions.
You generally could use money in the old days. Oh, lay off that stuff.
You know, marrying Polly is the only way for you to square your debts.
I can take care of myself.
I doubt it.
Suppose I have a little plan that'll take care of both of us. What do you mean?
Have you ever seen that diamond necklace of Mrs. Potter's?
You bet I have.
What's that got to do with us?
Her room and my room are right next to each other.
Hers is 318; mine, 320.
The door between is unlocked.
Well?
She keeps everything in a jewel case locked up in her dresser.
The key is always in her bag.
That's what you've got to get.
It's a large order, but maybe it can be done.
Suppose I invite Mrs. Potter and
Polly to take supper with me tonight?
What then?
Sometime during the evening...
I might be able to get the key out of her bag.
Now you're talking.
That sounds more like old times.
And now I will try and get rid of Bob Adams for you.
Look, this is Cocoanut Manor.
You know that hill?
What a question.
Do I know that cunning little hill?
It's cunning, all right. But that's why there hasn't been any development here.
Couldn't it be cut down?
Too expensive.
Now, here's what happened.
John W. Berryman was here to see it last month.
You know, Berryman practically built Palm Beach and Miami, but he said he wouldn't touch this.
Now when a man like that passes a place up, no one wants it.
Do you know anything about architecture? No, but I'd love to learn.
Well, I made a drawing of the whole place showing the hills.
It's a built-up scheme, without cutting down the hill or having it get in the way.
I made the hill fit in with the architectural scheme.
I sent Berryman a copy last week, and his secretary wrote me a nice note saying they were studying my plans.
That's thrilling.
Does Mr. Hammer know about it?
Not yet. But if he takes it,
I'll design the buildings.
Say, I may be an architect yet.
If he only does, I'm sure it will be the most beautiful place in the world.
It would be... if you lived there.
Look, see what I've written?
"Heaven for Polly and me."
That looks great.
When do I move in?
Any day now.
It's a lovely dream, Bob.
Let's make it come true.
The skies
Will all be blue
When my dreams
Come true
And I'll be smiling
Through
When my dreams
Come true
That Spanish castle
I built in my mind
Will be a love nest
The practical kind
And I'll be there
With you
When my dreams
Come true
Ever since I met you
All that I seem to do
Is dream
Wonderful dreams
Heaven's before my eyes
When will I realize
My dreams
Wonderful dreams
The skies
Will all be blue
When my dreams
Come true
And I'll be smiling
Through
When my dreams
Come true
That Spanish castle
I built in my mind
Will be a love nest
The practical kind
And I'll be there
With you
When my dreams
Come
True
Will you look at that?
I am looking.
Well, it's darn cute. I wonder who it can be. Let's find out.
Then little Red Riding Hood said to the wolf, "Wolf, wolf, wolf, wolf."
Hello. How do you do,
Miss Potter? Hello.
Hello. Your mother is looking for you, Polly.
She generally is, and she generally finds me.
You know Mother.
Thanks a lot.
It was a lovely story, Mr. Adams. I'd like to hear the rest of it sometime.
Good-bye.
I wonder if I could hear it sometime.
With pleasure.
How about you, Yates?
No, thanks. You know what happens to bad little boys who tell stories?
Certainly. They marry the beautiful princess.
So long.
And I'll be there
With you
When my dreams
Come
True
Nice boy. The kind who usually gets what he wants.
Not always.
I might win out yet.
Well, miracles do happen.
Well, Polly, you've been out again with Mr. Adams.
But only for a little while,
Mother.
Why a daughter of mine should fool around with a hotel clerk... when she has the opportunity of marrying one of the Boston Yates... is more than I can understand,
Oh, who cares about the Boston Yates?
Anyway, Bob isn't a clerk.
He's an architect.
He's only clerking until he can get started.
One who clerks, Polly, is a clerk, and that settles it.
And I want you to remember that no Potter... has ever been involved in a single scandal.
How about Uncle Dick?
Polly, it's a well-known fact... that your uncle was drunk at the time.
And another thing, young lady, I'm quite tired of your sitting out on the beach...
all hours of the night.
Hey. Hey. Why don't you take something for that insomnia?
You ought to cut out drinking so much coffee. I'm sorry, sir.
Say, any luck with the 4:30? Yes, it didn't hit me. That's the only luck I had with it.
Mr. Hammer, I think I know what's wrong with the hotel.
I think I know too. You're fired.
Get your hat and my coat and get out.
Maybe the season hasn't started yet.
Maybe the hotel hasn't opened yet.
Don't worry, Mr. Hammer.
In a few weeks you'll be cleaning up.
Yes, and making the beds. Go on, get out of here. I can handle this rush myself.
600 rooms in the hotel and you have to sleep here. How do you do, Mr. Hammer?
Why don't you whistle at the crossing?
You're just the woman I'm looking for.
Now whether you like it or not, I'm gonna tell you about Florida real estate.
It's the first time it's ever been mentioned down here, today. I'm sorry, but...
Do you know that property values have increased 1929 since 1,000%?
Do you know that this is the biggest development since Sophie Tucker?
Do you know that Florida is the show spot of America and Cocoanut Beach is the black spot of Florida?
You told me about this yesterday.
I know, but I left out a comma. Look.
In a little while we're gonna hold an auction sale at
Cocoanut Manor, the suburb terrible... uh, beautiful.
You must come over. There's gonna be entertainment, sandwiches and the auction.
If you don't like auctions, we can play contract.
Here it is. Cocoanut Manor, 42 hours from Times Square by railroad.
1,600 miles as the crow flies,
1,800 as the horseflies.
There you are, Cocoanut Manor glorifying the American sewer and the Florida sucker.
Why, it's the most exclusive residential district in Florida. Nobody lives there.
And the climate... Ask me about the climate, I dare you. Very well. How...
I'm glad you brought it up. Our motto is,
Cocoanut Beach... no snow, no ice and no business.
Do you know that Florida is the greatest state in the Union? Is it?
Take its climate. No, we took that.
Take its fruits, take the alligator pears.
Take all the alligator pears and keep 'em. See if I care.
Do you know how alligator pears are made? Haven't the slightest idea.
That's because you've never been an alligator, and don't let it happen again.
Do you know that it sometimes requires years to bring the pear and the alligator together?
They don't like each other.
No.
No. Do you know how many alligator pears are sent out of this state every year and told not to come back?
I don't think I do.
All they can get a hold of.
Florida feeds the nation, but nobody feeds me and that's what I wanna talk to you about.
Mr. Hammer... Another thing, take our cattle raising.
I don't mean anything personal. But here is the ideal cattle raising section.
We have longhorns, shorthorns and shoehorns.
Mr. Hammer, will you let me say something, please?
I hardly think so, and there's something else I wanna bring to your mind.
Where will you be when you're 65?
That's only about three months from now.
If I were to buy, I should prefer someplace like Palm Beach.
Palm Beach? The Atlantic City of yesterday? The slums of tomorrow?
Do you know that the population of
Cocoanut Beach has doubled in the past week?
Has it? Three bulldogs were born. We're expecting a nanny goat in the morning.
I'm sorry, but I'm afraid I must be going. Aw, now, don't go.
Before you go, let me show you a sample of our sewer pipe we're gonna lay.
Look at it. Nobody could fool you on a sewer pipe, can they, a woman like you?
Now this is the eight-inch pipe.
But of course, all property owners will be allowed to vote on the size of their pipe.
In case of a tie, it goes to the Supreme Court, and
I can give you a little inside information in advance.
The chief justice is crazy about this type of sewer.
Here, put it in your pocket.
I'll see you later.
Mr. Hammer, I can't use this.
I don't want it.
Hello. Yes?
Ice water in 318?
Is that so?
Where'd you get it?
Oh, you want some?
Oh, that's different.
Have you got any ice?
No, I haven't.
This is Cocoanut Beach... no snow, no ice.
Get some onions.
That'll make your eyes water.
What? You too!
Oh, Mr. Hammer.
Mrs. Thompson wants to know... if you'd reserve a table for dinner for her in a nice quiet spot.
A nice quiet spot?
Yeah.
Tell her she can eat in the lobby.
We ought to dress this place up a bit.
It looks terrible.
Front. Front.
Front. Here, front.
Here, front.
Here, front, front, front, front.
Jamison, what's become of our front? Are we all out of front? I haven't seen 'em.
I'm gonna fire some of those people.
Give me the fire bell.
Why don't you stick around here. If anybody comes in that looks like a customer, tie 'em and brand 'em.
Yes, sir.
Look at him.
He's dressed better than I am.
Hey, come on. Come on.
Hey, come here. Come here.
Come here!
- Gentlemen, how do you do?
- How do you do?
Are you boys giving me the runaround? Come over here.
Now what do you want?
Explain your business.
We send you a telegram. Oh, you're the boys that sent the telegram?
How do you do? That's a coincidence.
I used to send telegrams myself.
How are you? And how are you?
That's all right. Don't worry.
Say, you can stay, but you'll have to take that groundhog out of here.
Now what do you want?
Explain your business.
We make a "reservash."
"Reservash"?
Yes. We want a room and no bath.
Oh, I see. You're just here for the winter. Well, step this way and I'll see what I can do for you.
All right. We stay for the summer too. I'm sorry, boys, but we haven't got any vacancies.
He's got no vacancies?
We got plenty of rooms.
That's all right, we take a room. You want a room?
All right, we take a vacancy.
Boy, take the gentlemen's baggage.
Hey, what are you...
Hey, hey, do you know that suitcase is empty?
That's all right.
We'll fill it up before we leave.
Oh, you will, eh?
Well, you'll empty it before I go out.
Step this way, boys. Just put your moniker on there and everything will be "A.K."
Look what he do.
Don't do that.
Step right this way, boy. Three shots for five. He never misses.
This boy wins the gold cigar.
Anybody else? Step right this way.
Hey, hey, hey, hey!
Don't throw that.
That's only for long distance.
All right, all right.
Now what do you want? Would you like a suite on the third floor?
No, I'll take a Polack in the basement.
You'll have to take that up with the commissary department.
That's an entirely different proposition and I can't...
Here you are.
Let me help you here.
I'm sorry. The afternoon mail isn't in yet. I can use you the first of the month.
Telegram for Mr. Hammer.
Telegram?
Just tell them I'll send them the money in the morning. Now then, what do you want?
What do you want? Do you want a single room? We'd like to double up.
Well, eat some green apples.
Just a joke.
What's that? You'll have to talk louder. I can't hear you.
If you'll take your nose out of the receiver, it'll be okay.
Funny fella, you.
Hello. What's that?
You wanna know where you can get a hold of Mrs. Potter?
I don't know.
She's awfully ticklish.
Now, I'm in a position, gentlemen...
He's a hungry.
Here, have one of these flowers.
They're buckwheat.
Pick out a nice one now. I don't want you to get any of the worst ones.
There you are.
I'm so glad.
Now, if you boys will pardon me for a few moments,
I have some very important business to attend to.
As a matter of fact, I'm going upstairs to get your partner a stomach pump.
He needs one. And I'll be down in a few minutes. And while I'm gone, don't forget.
Register.
Hey, don't forget. Register.
That's all right.
Hello. Hello.
No, we no got a no rooms.
We got a nothing. We got a no customers. We got a nothing.
All right. I send you up a some. All right, good-bye.
Did you ring, sir?
Did you ring, sir?
Come on. Come here.
Come here.
Get away from those girls.
Come on.
Hurry up.
All right then, but let's be careful.
I will.
Tell me, how is it that the door between your room and Mrs. Potter's is open?
Well, you see, I told her that
I trusted her. You trusted her?
Hey, stop that.
Come on. We dance.
Really!
Come, Penelope.
Let's get away from this... bum.
Bum. Bum.
Bum, bum, bum
I could kill those tramps.
Wait a minute.
Don't kill them yet.
I've got an idea.
About them?
Mm-hmm. Listen.
When the necklace is found missing, someone's got to be blamed.
Why not them?
Gee, that's not bad.
But have you got anything definite?
Suppose I flirt with them and they come to my room. Then what?
I'll complain to the management.
Then on the night the necklace disappeared they were seen near Mrs. Potter's.
Get it?
You bet I get it.
That's a grand idea.
Thanks, kind sir.
Well, I've got to run along now.
See you later.
Good-bye.
Hey, hey, what you do, eh?
All the time you eat.
That's a no good.
We gotta get the money.
Right now I'd do anything for money.
I'd kill somebody for money.
I'd kill you for money.
Oh, no, you're my friend.
I kill you for nothin'.
What do you laugh, eh? You're in the hotel three hours and you no got a something yet.
What do you got?
A beautiful watch. That's a fine.
That's a fine.
That's all you steal?
Hey.
I think I know your face.
I give up. Whose is it?
I'll tell you in a minute. I brought some pictures from headquarters.
Let me see your face.
Yours too.
All right. All right.
I make my own face.
Why you push, huh?
No pushing.
You wanna fight? Come on.
Come on. Start. Come on.
That's no funny.
You fight upstairs.
Hey! What are you guys fighting for?
We no fight. That's a my friend.
We play this way.
What are you doing around here?
What's your name?
I'm pretty suspicious of you birds.
Now you listen to me.
I haven't got anything on you yet, but I'm going to keep watching.
I've got your full records right here in my pocket.
There's enough to send you up the minute you start anything. Do you get me?
Wise guy. Wise guy. Gotta start a fight when the detective come around.
You can't wait a little bit, huh?
What do you got?
A badge.
That's a fine. He's a no more detective. You're a detective.
Hurry along, my dear. Only a few minutes to get to the train.
Can you tell me what time is the next train to Philadelphia?
There's a train once a week and sometimes twice a day.
Thank you.
That's all right.
That's a fine.
It's a little tight.
Needs something taken out.
All right, keep it. That's just what I need... a coat like this.
That's a fine, huh, to look good.
Hello.
How do you do?
That's a good-looking coat you have on. You like it, huh?
Do you know you look like the prince of Wales? Better.
Where'd you get that coat?
That's a my coat.
That's your coat?
That's a my coat.
But it doesn't fit you.
I know. I had it made to order.
Tell me, what are you doing tonight?
Maybe you got a good idea, eh?
Well, don't you dare come to room 320 at 11:00.
All right, I come half past 10:00.
Did you see a handkerchief?
I thought I dropped one.
Well, it really doesn't matter... because what I'm really interested in is you.
Did anyone ever tell you that you looked like the prince of Wales?
That's funny. I thought it was an original idea of mine.
Tell me, do you know who I am?
Do you know my room number?
Well, I'll be there at 11:00 tonight.
Did anyone ever tell you you look like the prince of Wales?
I don't mean the present prince of Wales.
One of the old Wales.
And believe me, when I say Wales,
I mean Wales.
I know a whale when I see one.
Did you say your room was 318?
I'm the proprietor of this hotel and
I have a passkey to every room in it.
Passkey?
Passkey, that's Russian for "pass."
You know they "passkey" down the "streetskey."
Won't you, uh, lie down?
Aw, if we could find a little bungalow, eh?
Of course, I know we could find one, but maybe the people wouldn't get out.
But if we could find a nice little empty bungalow just for me and you... where we could bill and cow...
No, where we could bull and cow.
Do you know what you're trying to say?
Yes, it's not what I'm thinking of.
What I meant was, if we had a nice little bungalow... and you was inside and I was outside trying to get in or inside trying to get out...
No, I was in... You was up...
You were inside out and I was up...
Uh, no...
I'll tell you, if you don't hear from me by next Friday, the whole thing's off.
I don't think I understand.
I mean, your eyes... your eyes, they shine like the pants of a blue serge suit.
What? That's an insult.
That's not a reflection on you.
That's on the pants.
What I meant was if we had a nice bungalow... and I came home from work and you were standing by the gate...
No, you came home from work and I was standing by the gate.
That's more like it.
And we came down the path... and we went inside and the shades were drawn... and the lights were low, and, uh... then, uh...
Are you sure your husband's dead?
Why, yes.
There seems to be a trace of uncertainty in that "yes."
You know, a yes like that was once responsible for me jumping out of a window.
And I'm not the jumper
I used to be.
What I meant was, you're gonna be here all winter and I'm stuck with the hotel anyhow, why don't you grab me until you can make other arrangements?
My dear, Mr. Hammer, I shall never get married before my daughter.
You did once.
Oh, but I love you.
I love you.
Can't you see how
I'm pining for you?
What in the world is the matter with you?
Oh, I'm not myself tonight.
I don't know who I am.
One false move and I'm yours.
I love you.
I love you anyhow.
I don't think you'd love me if I were poor.
I might, but I'd keep my mouth shut.
I'll not stay here any longer and be insulted this way.
No, don't go away and leave me here alone. You stay here and I'll go away.
I don't know what to say. Say that you'll be truly mine, or truly yours or yours truly.
Don't you know that I'm... Will you keep your hands to yourself!
Come on.
I'll play you one more game.
Come on.
The three of you.
Ohhh.
Can you come down a little bit?
Just think, tonight... tonight... when the moon is sneaking around the clouds, I'll be sneaking around you.
I'll meet you tonight under the moon.
Oh, I can see you now... you and the moon.
You wear a necktie so I'll know you.
Send up some ice water right away.
That's right. Thank you.
Thank goodness.
Close the door.
Did you get the key?
Yes. It's one of these.
Oh, that's fine. Now, listen.
We can't take any chances on this job.
How do you mean? There's bound to be trouble when she misses the necklace.
Well?
We can't have it found on us.
I should say not. We've got to play it safe and hide it somewhere for a while.
Hide it?
Just for a few days.
Yes, but where?
Anywhere but in here.
Hide it?
I know just the place.
A hollow tree stump about a mile from here. Will that do?
Fine, but how do I get there? It's
Cocoanut Manor. You've been out there.
I'm not so sure, Harvey.
Here, I'll show you.
Now, you... you go right out Cocoanut Road.
Then there's Augustine Road, like this, but instead, you take the Granada Road.
Suddenly, you come to a clearing with a fringe of trees around it.
That's Cocoanut Manor where the stump is.
It's about 20 feet from the edge of the clearing.
That's where you put the jewels.
You can't miss it.
Now you take the necklace right out there, see?
I've got to go back downstairs, or Mrs. Potter will be suspicious.
And be careful.
I will.
Cocoanut Manor, Granada Road,
20 feet from the clearing.
Everything's going along swimmingly now.
Do you remember me? The prince of
Wales? Why, yes, of course I do...
Mr. Hammer, how dare you come into my room?
If there's gonna be two people in this room, it'll be 50 cents extra.
Did he go?
Who?
Anybody.
Get out. Oh, Prince, how you frightened me.
This hotel not only has running water, it has running guests.
Do you remember me?
Prince of Wales?
- Who is it?
- It's me, the king of England.
My father!
Come in.
Ice water.
Put it there.
Thank you. "Thank you"?
Why didn't you give him a dime?
Come in.
Lay down.
Well, I never.
I should say not.
You get out of here.
Get out. Hurry. Hurry.
Come in.
What is the matter with that man?
Mr. Hammer, what are you doing in my room?
Don't you dare take that coat off in this room. You get out of here as fast as you can go.
I was only playing, that's all.
I'll find out about this outfit.
Thank goodness he's gone.
Never mind, Operator.
Come in.
Who are you? That's all right.
I'll be through in a minute.
- Well, I guess there's nobody in here.
- You don't know where to look.
What's that you said?
Oh, this is awful.
When you've quite finished, let me know.
Well, everything seems to be all right in here.
I'm not so sure about that.
All right. I know where to go.
Alone at last.
Come over here. I wanna see you.
Now listen to me.
I'm not gonna have that red-headed fellow running around the lobby.
If you wanna keep him up in the room, you'll have to keep him in a trap.
I can't catch him.
Who is he?
That's a my partner, but he no speak.
Oh, that's your silent partner.
Well, anyhow, you wired me about some property. I've thought it over.
Now, I can let you have three lots watering the front, or I can let you have three lots fronting the water.
Now, these lots cost me $ 9,000 and I'm gonna let you have them for 15 because I like you.
I no buy nothing. I ain't got a no money. What?
You got a no money?
I no got a one cent.
How are you gonna pay for your room? That's your lookout.
Oh, you're just an idle "roomer."
Well, you see, we come here to make money.
I read in the paper and it say,
"Big Boom In Florida." So we come.
We're a couple of big booms too. I'll show you how you can make some real money.
I'm going to hold an auction in a little while in Cocoanut Manor.
You know what an auction is, eh? I come from Italy on the Atlantic Auction.
Well, let's go ahead as if nothing happened.
I say I'm holding an auction at Cocoanut Manor.
And when the crowd gathers around,
I want you to mingle with them.
Don't pick their pockets, just mingle with them... I'll find time for both.
Well, maybe we can cut out the auction.
Here's what I mean. If somebody says $100, you say two.
If somebody says two, you say three.
Bid up.
That's right. Now, if nobody says anything, then you start it off.
How am I gonna know when they no say nothin'? Well, they'll probably notify you.
You fool, if they don't say anything, you'll hear 'em, won't you?
Well, maybe I no listen.
Well, don't tell 'em.
Now then, if we're successful in disposing of these lots, I'll see that you get a nice commission.
And how about some money?
Well, you can have your choice.
Now, in arranging these lots, of course, we use blueprints.
You know what a blueprint is, huh? It's oysters.
How is it you never got double pneumonia? I go around by myself.
Do. You know what a lot is?
Yeah, it's too much.
I don't mean a whole lot.
Just a little lot with nothing on it.
Anytime you got a too much, you got a whole lot. Look, I explain it to you.
Sometimes you no got a enough.
Sometimes you got a whole lot.
Sometimes you got a little bit.
You no think it's enough.
Somebody else maybe think it's a too much. It's a whole lot too.
Now, a whole lot is a too much, too much is a whole lot. Same thing.
The next time I see you, remind me not to talk to you, will you?
All right... Come over here, Rand McNally, and I'll explain this thing to you.
Now look, this is a map and diagram of the whole Cocoanut section.
This whole area is within a radius of approximately three-quarters of a mile.
Radius. Is there a remote possibility that you know what radius means?
It's a W.J.Z.
Well, I walked right into that one.
It's gonna be a cinch explaining the rest of this thing to you, I can see that.
I catch on quick.
That's a rodeo you're thinking of.
Look, Einstein.
Here's Cocoanut Manor.
No matter what you say, this is Cocoanut Manor.
Here's Cocoanut Manor.
Here's Cocoanut Heights.
That's a swamp.
And right over here where the road forks, that's Cocoanut Junction.
Where have you got
Cocoanut Custard?
That's on one of the forks.
You probably eat with your knife, so you won't have to worry about that.
Now, here is the main road leading out of Cocoanut Manor.
That's the road
I wish you were on.
Now, over here on this site we're gonna build an eye and ear hospital.
This is gonna be a sight for sore eyes.
You understand?
That's fine.
Now, right over here, this is the residential section.
People live there, huh?
No, that's the stockyards.
Now all along here, this is the riverfront, and all along the river... all along the river, those are all levees.
That's the Jewish neighborhood?
Well, we'll pass over that.
You're a peach, boy.
Now, here is a little peninsula, and here is a viaduct leading over to the mainland.
Why a duck?
I'm all right. How are you?
I say here is a little peninsula, and here's a viaduct leading over to the mainland.
All right. Why a duck?
I'm not playing Ask Me Another.
I say that's a viaduct.
All right. Why a duck?
Why a duck? Why a no chicken?
I don't know why a no chicken.
I'm a stranger here myself.
All I know is that it's a viaduct.
You try to cross over there a chicken, and you'll find out viaduct.
I no go someplace...
It's deep water, that's why a duck.
It's deep water.
That's why a duck.
Look, rube. Suppose you were out horseback riding... and you came to that stream and wanted to ford over.
You couldn't make it.
It's too deep.
But what do you want with a Ford if you got a horse?
Well, I'm sorry the matter ever came up.
All I know is that it's a viaduct.
Look. All right.
I catch on to why a horse, why a chicken, why a this, why a that.
I no catch on to why a duck.
Well, I was only fooling.
I was only fooling.
They're gonna build a tunnel there in the morning.
Now, is that clear to you? Yes, everything except why a duck.
Well, that's fine. Then we can go ahead with this thing.
Now, look, I'm gonna take you down and show you our cemetery.
I've got a waiting list of 50 people at that cemetery just dying to get in.
But I like you.
You're my friend.
I like you and I'm gonna shove you in ahead of all of them. I know you like me.
I'm gonna see that you get a steady position. That's a good.
And if I can arrange it, it'll be horizontal.
Now remember, when the auction starts, if somebody says $100...
I say 200.
That's grand.
Now, if somebody says 200.
I say 300.
That's great. Now, you know how to get down there?
No...
Now, look.
You go down there, down that narrow path there... until you come to that little jungle there.
You see it? Where those thatched palms are. Yes, I see.
And then there's a little clearing there... a little clearing with a wire fence around it.
You see that wire fence there?
All right. Why a fence?
Oh, no, we're not gonna go all through that again.
You come along with me and I'll fix you up.
I know what you mean. Bid 'em up. Go higher. One say 100, 2... 200, 300.
That's it. If somebody says $100, you say
200. If somebody says two, you say three.
Help me put this deal over, you can have anything you got. I got a nothing.
Be alert. That's it. Be alert.
Be alert, or papa don't go out at all. I be alert. I don't know what it is, but I be it.
All ye suckers who are gonna get trimmed, step this way for the big swindle.
Ladies and gentlemen, before proceeding with the main business of the day, which is the selling of these lots at any price, we're gonna have a little entertainment... very little.
I wanna present to you Miss Polly Potter, the best paying guest in the hotel.
In fact, the only paying guest in the hotel.
She will sing for you and for me too.
Miss Potter.
Monkeys upon a tree
Never are very blue
They never seem to be
Under par
That is true
Not like the ones you see
On a bar in the zoo
Monkeys upon a tree
Do the monkey doodle doo
Oh, among the mangoes where the monkey gang goes
You can see them do
The little monkey doodle doo
Oh, a little monkey playing on his one key
Gives them all the cue
To do the monkey doodle doo
Let me take you by the hand
Over to the jungle band
If you're too old for dancing
Get yourself a monkey gland
And then let's go, my little dearie
Here's the Darwin theory
Telling me and you
To do the monkey doodle doo
That's Florida, folks... singing, dancing and entertainment.
After the entertainment, there'll be sandwiches.
But remember, if there are no lots sold, there will be no sandwiches.
Florida, folks... sunshine, sunshine.
Perpetual sunshine all the year around.
Let's get the auction started before we get a tornado.
Right this way.
Step forward, everybody.
Friends, you are now in Cocoanut Manor, one of the finest cities in Florida.
Of course, we still need a few finishing touches, but who doesn't?
This is the heart of the residential district.
Every lot is a stone's throw from the station.
As soon as they throw enough stones, we're gonna build a station.
800 wonderful residences will be built right here.
Why, they're as good as up.
Better.
You can have any kind of a home you want to.
You can even get stucco.
Oh, how you can get stuck, oh.
Now is the time to buy while the new boom is on.
Remember that old saying,
"a new boom sweeps clean"?
And don't forget the guarantee... my personal guarantee.
If these lots don't double in value in a year, I don't know what you can do about it.
Now, we'll take lot number 20, right at the corner of DeSota Avenue.
Of course, you all know who DeSota was?
He discovered a body of water.
You've all heard of the water that they named after him... DeSota Water.
Now this lot has a 20-foot frontage, a 14-foot "backage" and a mighty fine gobbet.
Now, what am I offered for this lot?
Anything at all? Anything at all?
Ah, a gentleman bids $ 200.
Who'll say 300?
Another gentleman says $300.
Do I hear four?
Well, the auction is practically over.
It's all over but the shooting.
I'll attend to that later.
- Do I hear 600?
- Sold for $600.
Wrap up that lot and put some poison ivy on it. Yes, sir.
Well, I came out even on that one.
That was a big success.
Yeah, one more success like that and I'll sell my body to a medical institute.
Now, we'll take lot number 21.
There it is, right over there, folks.
Right where that coconut tree is.
What am I offered for lot number 21?
Why, my friend, there's over $ 200 worth of milk in those coconuts.
And what milk! Milk from contented cow-conuts. Who will say 300?
What the heck I care?
What the heck do you care?
But how about me?
Sold to What The Heck for $800.
I hope all your teeth have cavities.
And don't forget... abscess makes the heart grow fonder.
When he said "why a duck,"
I should have smelled a rat.
I did, but I didn't know who it was.
Now, we'll take lot number 22.
What am I offered for lot number 22? $100.
Sold for $100.
Believe me, you gotta get up early if you wanna get out of bed.
- Now, we'll take lot number 23.
What are you gonna do with all these lots? Play lottos?
Who'll say 300?
400? Do I hear five? $ 500.
Sold to this gentleman...
Sold to this gentleman...
Do I hear nine?
Do I hear nine?
You hear nine, you'll hear 10.
If I hear 10, you'll hear plenty.
Do I hear nine? Will the gentleman who said seven say nine?
Will the gentleman who said seven say seven again? Will you say six?
He say six, I say seven. He say seven,
I say eight. He say eight, I say nine.
I got a plenty of numbers left. When I start, I no a stop for nothing. I bid 'em up. I go higher.
Higher, higher all the time. You'll go higher when I get a hold of you.
Sold to Hiawatha for $800.
Get away from that tree before it dies.
What am I offered for lot number 24? Fifty dollars.
Sold for $ 50...
Too late. Too late. Too late all the time.
Now, we'll take lot number 25, right where you're standing.
Will you please get your feet off this lot? You're getting it all dirty.
Now, here's a lot, folks.
It doesn't look very big on top, but it's all yours as far down as you wanna go, and it's dirt cheap.
Now, what am I offered for lot number
25? Anything at all. Who'll start it off?
Anyone at all. Anyone at...
What's become of Peter Rabbit?
What am I offered for lot 25?
Come on, folks. You know you're allowed to bid. This is a free country.
What am I offered for lot 25?
What am I offered for lot 25 and a year's subscription to Youth's Companion?
Will somebody take a year's subscription?
I'm trying to work my way through college.
Will somebody take a six-month's subscription? I'll go to high school.
Does anybody wanna buy a lead pencil?
I'll wrestle anybody in the crowd for five dollars.
Well, if there's not gonna be any more bidding, I might as well quit.
What's the matter with you people? Can't you visualize bargains? Don't you wanna make money?
I'm gonna try one more lot, and if I don't dispose of this, I'm gonna fold up. You get me?
We're gonna take lot number 26, the star lot of the whole proceedings.
Here it is. Right there where the stump of that tree is overlooking the oceanfront.
- One of the finest sites in Florida Now somebody make me an offer.
Who'll say 400?
Do I hear...
Keep Winnie the Pooh out of here.
He'll ruin me. Who'll say 500?
Six? Come on.
$800. Now there's a gentleman with vision and a nice haircut.
There's a gentleman with vision. Who'll say 1,000? $1,000.
There's a gentleman with double vision and a better haircut. Who'll say 1,100?
1,100. There's a gentleman with astigmatism. Twelve once? Come on.
Twelve, hail and farewell.
Who'll say 13? Come on.
I'll bid...
Thirteen? Do I hear 13?
Twelve? Twelve once.
Twelve twice.
Sold to Mr. Adams for $1,200. And a mighty fine piece of property you got there, buddy.
Oh, Bob, you've got it!
Make a note of that.
What happened?
I protest against that.
I didn't have a chance to bid. What do you mean?
I want you to understand I don't discriminate.
You had the same opportunity as everybody else. Mr. Hammer.
Mr. Hammer, I've been robbed.
What?
My necklace in your hotel...
Oh, Mother.
It's worth $100,000.
Was it valuable?
"Was it valuable"?
I'll give a thousand dollars' reward for its return.
You hear that? This little lady has lost a necklace worth $100,000, and she offers a thousand dollars' reward for its return.
2,000. Sold for $ 2,000.
Make a note of that.
Comin' through.
I'll take charge of this.
All you people get back and give us plenty of room and keep quiet.
Cut that out. Come on.
Get back, everybody.
What's the matter?
What, he hurt you?
What's the matter?
No push, boy. Come on.
Come on. All right.
Start fighting. Go on.
Mr. Hammer, what's the matter with him?
I don't know where he's from.
He hasn't any license on him.
What is it? What?
Yes, that's it.
That's it.
You dear man.
Oh, I'm so happy.
I must kiss you again.
So that's it. I saw you in that room last night.
Grabbing off stuff for the reward, eh? Now then, you, come clean.
Hey! Let go of that.
All right. Leave him go.
Come on. Leave him go.
How'd you know that necklace was there?
Officer, may I make a suggestion? What is it?
Isn't it possible that the gentleman who bought this lot might know something about it?
Why was he so anxious to buy it? How about it, you? Why did you buy this lot?
None of your business.
He is a desperate character.
Mother, he isn't.
Whenever a fella shuts up and won't say anything,
I've noticed it's generally on account of a woman.
- Who is she?
- None of your business.
I won't say a word.
You won't say anything.
This guy's letting on to be a dummy.
This bird you can't understand when he does talk.
Is there anybody here who will talk?
I will, but I can't think of anything.
Well, if you won't tell me about it, you'll tell somebody else.
Wait a minute. You mean to say that... That's enough. Come on.
Please. Please don't take him.
What?
I didn't want you to steal it, Bob.
I had no idea that you'd do it.
Oh, I feel awful.
What are you talking about?
Bob, what does she mean?
Polly.
So that's it. Oh, it's all my fault.
I had no idea he'd think that I meant it. I didn't want you to do it.
I just meant that you could give me one like it. Wait a minute.
Are you accusing me of taking Mrs. Potter's necklace?
I'm taking all the blame myself. I was joking, and you took me seriously.
Bob, last night when you told me that you'd taken it, I just couldn't believe it.
Told you I'd taken what?
Why, Polly, she's out of her mind.
It sounds quite plausible to me.
Mother.
He didn't know what he was doing.
I begged him to take it back.
Say, I'm not gonna stand for any more of this.
Why, the whole thing is ridiculous.
It's absurd!
Do you people really think for one moment that...
Oh, I... I don't care what you think, any of you.
Polly, you know it's a lie, don't you?
It was just a harmless flirtation, and then, well, he lost his head.
Don't you know it's a lie?
Of course I do.
You don't think I'd believe a silly story like that, do you? Polly.
Mother, I don't believe it!
Mr. Adams, I must ask you never to speak to my daughter again. But, Mrs. Potter...
Bob, I'm going with you.
You'll stay here.
Yes, Polly.
You stay here.
It's only for a little while.
Why, the whole thing is ridiculous. You ready?
Yes.
Oh, I'm so sorry, Bob.
Don't keep it up any longer.
All right. I'll have a confession out of him in half an hour.
Come on, you.
Bob!
Will you come back here.
Now we'll take lot number 27.
I've been so unsuccessful in disposing these other lots, that I'm gonna give away a half a pound of tea with every lot I sell from now on.
There's only one way to wipe out this disgrace.
You must make people forget that you ever knew this young man.
Mother! What are you saying?
You see what's come of your way.
Now I'm going to have mine.
Mr. Yates?
Yes, Mrs. Potter?
My daughter has reconsidered her answer to you. Mother!
Your engagement will be announced tonight.
That's wonderful, Polly.
I shall give a dinner at the hotel...
A dinner? A dinner?
You want the 30- or 40-cent dinner? You may invite everyone.
It's 50 with Jell-O, and, oh, how you can Jell-O.
In honor of the engagement of my daughter to Mr. Harvey Yates. I see.
Let me be the last to congratulate you, and you too.
I'm sure you'll have a very dismal wedding.
Congratulations, Yates.
Congratulations, Polly.
Coming, Polly?
In a minute.
Please go ahead.
Why, what's the matter, dear?
Nothing. Please go.
All right.
I'll wait for you.
Oh, no.
You got the key?
That's fine.
Hey, wait, wait. Look.
I got the saw.
Now, you gotta get a something.
We get a Bob out. Hurry up.
Bob. Hey, Bob. Hey, Bob.
Hello. What are you doing here? How do you do?
I didn't know they allowed visitors here.
I'm a no visitor. We come to get you out.
We gotta be quick too. Thanks very much. You shouldn't have bothered.
I might as well stay here as any other place. You gotta come out. Uh...
Polly, she wants you.
Polly wants me?
She gotta have you because tonight she's gonna be engaged. Engaged?
Yes, gonna be married. Mrs. Potter, she's gonna give a big engagement dinner.
To who? To Polly. He's engaged to Polly.
Everybody's gonna be there. You too. Polly's gonna marry Yates?
That's right. That's right. Let me outta here. Get me out of here quick.
We get you out. Hey, paesan.
Come on. Hurry up. Quick, quick.
Shh! Shh!
Now we get you out.
Thanks very much.
I don't want anything to eat.
Not at a time like this. Come on. Hurry up. Get me out of here.
We get you out.
What's a matter? What a you do, eh? Come on. Break a the lock.
Come on. Hurry.
What's the matter? What's a matter for you? Come on. Come on.
Come on. Stop fighting. Stop fighting! This is no time to fight.
Come on. Hurry up.
Get me out of here, quick.
Oh, come on. Hurry. Hurry.
Come on. Hurry up, Bob. Everybody's away.
Is that so?
Well, I'll attend to that.
Boy.
It's been reported to me there's a poker game going on in room 420.
Go up there and knock on the door and see if you can get me a seat. Yes, sir.
All right.
I'll be right over.
All right, Bob. The coast is clear.
Nobody around.
Here he is. We got him.
We got him, all right.
Hello. Are you out on parole? No. These two gentlemen helped me to get out.
I'm ever so much obliged to you, Mr.
Hammer. They told me it was your idea.
I can't begin to thank you. That's all right. Maybe you do as much for me sometime.
Well, arrivederci.
Good-bye.
Arrivederci.
I can't begin to thank you.
Why, that's polygamy.
Believe me, it's no fun being in jail.
Jail is no place for a young fella.
There's no advancement.
But seriously, Mr. Hammer, you know that story of Penelope's was all a lie, don't you?
Now, what's the use of worrying? It's silly to worry, isn't it? You're gone today and here tomorrow.
But you know it was a lie. How am
I gonna prove it? Well, of course...
What is it?
"Silent Red wanted by the police."
What's going on here?
Everything's been dropping from on high here.
Grapefruit.
Well,
I hope I still got my underwear on.
You know...
Come here with that.
I felt kind of flimsy.
Bob.
Yes, sir.
Go upstairs and count the rooms.
I think the third floor is missing.
I'll put this stuff in here until I get ready to go upstairs.
Wait just a moment.
"Blackstone Hotel, Chicago."
"Statler Hotel, Cleveland"?
Those are mine.
Can you imagine that?
More papers than any man I've ever knew.
"Granada Road. Cocoanut Road."
"Granada Road, Cocoanut..."
"Granada..."
Hey, if you get it twice more, you're allowed to keep it.
Come here with that, will you.
You can beat that, but you can't tie it.
"Granada Road..."
Don't, don't... Don't talk.
He'll take the words right out of your mouth. "Granada..."
"Granada Road. Cocoanut Road.
Hollow stump. Jewels."
Tell me, where did you find this?
That's a great guy you picked to ask.
Where did you find this?
Mr. Hammer, whoever drew this knows something about that robbery. Look.
The skies
Will all be blue
When my dreams
Come true
And I'll be smiling
Through
When my dreams
Come true
That Spanish castle
I built in my mind
Will be our love nest
The practical kind
And I'll
Be there
With you
When my dreams
Come
True
Penelope, dear, so good of you to come.
Thanks so much, Mrs. Potter.
Oh, isn't it lovely.
You're a lucky boy, Harvey.
Yes.
I know the party is going to be a great success. I hope so.
Hello, Penelope.
Oh, hello.
I didn't know you were going to be here. Anywhere that you are.
How do you do? How do you do? Is Mr. Hammer coming?
Mr. Hammer? Yes.
He'll be here directly.
Mr. Hammer, your costume is wonderful.
This costume has been condemned by Good Housekeeping.
I love the color scheme. That isn't a scheme. It's a conspiracy.
Senor Chico Joseph Maria de Accunia,
Count de Elsinore.
On Track 25.
Aha!
Listen, Count. As soon as the guests leave,
I'd like you to take the ashes out.
His Excellency, the ambassador from San Rafaelo,
Senor de Harpeno.
Hey, nix on that stuff.
Sure, and it's just a breath of old Ireland.
I can see me old mother comin' down the old path. And I can see in the mornin'.
And I can see the old...
Diddly doo
Whoo, goes the weasel
There goes the weasel now.
I'm awfully glad you came, Mr.
Hennessy. That's all right, madam.
At a party like this, you've got to have the law around.
Now, a nice woman like you needs protection, and I'm here to see that you get it.
There's a couple of shady characters hanging around that I'm going to keep an eye on.
What's that you gave him?
I no give a nothing.
Give me that, I tell you!
Who got my shirt?
What's become of my shirt?
I want my shirt.
Hey, you've lost your shirt.
Yes.
Uh, can you describe this shirt?
What's that?
Here. Now, look.
This cross... This cross marks the spot where the shirt was last seen.
Cut that out. Now, remain quiet, will you please?
Just as I thought.
You birds are all in on this thing, and you're all trying to keep me from finding my shirt.
That's a lie, you whelp.
Whelp, whelp, whelp, whelp, whelp.
Whelp, whelp, whelp.
I want my shirt.
He wants his shirt.
He wants his shirt
I want my shirt.
He wants his shirt.
I want my shirt.
He wants his shirt
I want my shirt
I want my shirt
I can't be happy without my shirt
He wants his shirt He wants his shirt
He can't be happy without his shirt
I want my shirt
He wants his shirt
He can't be happy without his shirt
He wants his shirt
He wants his shirt
He won't be happy till he has... his shirt
He's got it, he's got it He's got it, he's got it I've got my shirt back
Thank God, I've got my shirt I've got my shirt He's got it, he's got it, he's got it
I've got my shirt
You'll never know how deeply I was hurt
He's got it, he's got it, he's got it
I thought I'd lost my shirt He's got it, he's got it he's got it, he's got it
It was given to me by my brother
Bert His brother Bert
That's why I love this shirt
The beautiful shirt
My shirt
The wonderful shirt
Now that I've found my shirt
Good-bye
And now, friends, now that we've found Hennessy's shirt, would you all mind looking for a collar button that I lost here?
Size 131/2.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, if you'll all find places at the table, we'll have a short entertainment before supper.
Eat, eat, eat. Come on!
How about you and I giving this joint the air and indulging in some snappy necking?
What?
Ladies and gentlemen,
Mr. Hammer will now act as master of ceremonies.
Mr. Hammer.
Ladies and gentlemen...
Two hundred dollars.
In behalf of the Rotary Club of Minneapolis,
I want to take this occasion of welcoming you to Waukegan.
No, no, I mean, in recognition of my many years of service with the railroad, you have presented me with these ties.
And that, of course, reminds me of the story of the Irishman.
It's so funny.
I wish I could think of it.
Oft in the stilly night, the trembling of a leaf can be heard... sighing through the trees.
And the babbling brook, as it wends its way onward, babbling and...
Well, I got rid of one.
And one like that is worth three ordinary ones. Where was I?
Oh, yes, on this chair.
That's right.
Western cattle opened at 15 and a quarter.
Yearlings and spring veal showed a firm tone.
And eggs were a little touchy on a falling market.
Well, my mother and father talked it over, and they finally moved to New York.
They took a little house in the Bronx.
And it was in that little house that Abraham
Lincoln was born, much to my father's surprise.
And that, boys and girls, was the beginning of the Lincoln Highway.
And now, friends, in view of the fact that Miss Potter's engagement... is being celebrated here tonight, so to speak,
I think a few words from her mother would be revolting.
I now take great pleasure in presenting to you... the well-preserved and partially pickled Mrs. Potter.
Come on now. Give the little girl a big hand. Speech. Speech.
Big speech.
Speech. Speech.
My good, good friends, if I could only tell you... how rosy-hued everything seems to me tonight.
As I look into your faces, they're all lit with gay laughter.
The whole world, and everything in it, is bathed in a soft, glowing, luminous haze.
The old gal is stewed to the eyebrows.
And now I want to wish you all a most enjoyable evening.
As for myself, I'm sad.
I simply can't go any farther.
I'll get off with you.
Now, friends, I want to take great pleasure in presenting to you... the groom Mr. Yates,
Mr. Harvey Yates.
Good evening, radio fans.
We are now back in the studio.
Stand by for your station announcer.
My dear, dear friends,
I, uh...
I, uh, really don't know what to say.
Well, shut up.
What a splendid suggestion.
Good, eh?
I feel highly honored, but I'm afraid I'm not much of a speech maker.
Nevertheless, Mr. Hammer, it was very nice of you to call on me.
You must call on me sometime.
I was just about to...
Yes, come up and see my flower bed.
What I intended to say...
I want you to see my pansies.
Well...
I got short pansies and long pansies.
I was just going to say that...
Next spring I'm gonna get some early bloomers.
As I was about to say...
There seems to be a steady stream flowing in and out over there.
I wouldn't dream of taking up any more of your time.
I really wanted to thank you all. Yeah.
And as I said before, I hadn't intended to make a speech at all.
Well, you certainly succeeded.
Now, friends...
Now what's the matter with him?
That's that good Gulf gas.
Goodness.
I'm so sorry.
Hey, hey. What are you doin'?
Don't do that.
Come on.
That's a not a good.
Mr. Hammer.
Mr. Hammer, can't you do something?
I don't have to. They're doing plenty.
Oh, this is awful.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, the, uh... the first musical, uh, number that we intend to portray... will be the, uh, beginning and the ending of a very...
We're gonna have music.
Music. We're gonna have music.
Now, the first musical number on the program... will be a piccolo solo which we will skip.
And the second number will be Senor
Pastrami, the Lithuanian pianist.
The Senor, for his first selection, will play " A Cup of Coffee, a Sandwich and You"...
from the opera, Aida.
Senor, allow me to escort you to the diet.
Uh, Senor Pastrami, what is the first number?
Number one.
And now, friends, I want to present to you a charming little lady.
Down in front.
Hey, sit down.
What's wrong with you? The little lady who is to become Mrs. Harvey Yates, over my dead body.
I know I have the sincere wishes of all my friends... and can only tell you how much I appreciate it.
I think I can honestly say this is the happiest moment of my life.
Look what I have here.
It's a little engagement present just given me by Mr. Yates.
He wrote it just now, but he wrote another yesterday when a necklace was stolen.
They are both in his handwriting.
Let me read it to you.
It shows how to get to Cocoanut Manor and the hollow tree stump... and reads,
"Hollow stump, jewels."
I don't believe it.
See for yourself.
Yates is gone.
Yates is gone?
And I gave him a check this morning for a thousand dollars.
It's a good thing it was my personal check. Mr. Hammer.
There's a man outside who wants to see you with a black mustache. Tell him I've got one.
Well, I think you will want to see him.
His name is Mr. John W. Berryman.
He has accepted my architectural plans for the development of Cocoanut Manor.
Well, happy days, old boy.
Thank you. Thank you.
Thank you.
He also wants to know if you can accommodate 400 guests for the weekend.
400 guests?
400 guests.
What in the world's the matter...
Mother, you must admit you were mistaken.
Mr. Adams, how can you ever forgive me?
Oh, please, Mrs. Potter.
Ladies and gentlemen, you're all invited to attend the wedding of my daughter.
The wedding will take place exactly as planned.
That is, with the exception of a slight change.
She will be married to Mr. Robert Adams.
Hooray! Hooray!
Hooray! Hooray! Hooray!
The skies
Will all be blue
When my dreams
Come true
And I'll be smiling
Through
When my dreams
Come true
That Spanish castle
I built in my mind
Will be our love nest
The practical kind
And I'll
Be there
With you
When my dreams
Come
True
Buster Keaton in The Navigator
Directed by Donald Crisp and Buster Keaton
Copyrighted MCMXXIV in United States of America and distributed by Metro-Goldwyn Distributing Corporation.
All rights reserved under
International Convention of Buenos Aires.
Our story deals with one of those queer tricks that Fate sometimes plays.
Nobody would believe, for instance, that the entire lives of a peaceful American boy and girl -
- could be changed by a funny little war between two small countries far across the sea.
And yet it came to pass. The spies of the two little nations were at a Pacific seaport, -
- each trying to prevent the other getting ships and supplies.
"Gentlemen, the enemy have just purchased the steamship Navigator."
"There she lies now, and it is our patriotic duty to destroy that ship."
"We will send her adrift in the fog tonight before the new crew goes aboard. -
- The wind - the tide - and the rocks will do the rest."
The wealthy ship owner who has just sold the Navigator.
And his daughter.
Rollo Treadway - Heir to the
Treadway fortune - a living proof that -
- every family tree must have its sap.
"I think I'll get married."
"Today."
"We'll sail for Honolulu tomorrow on our honey-moon - get two tickets."
"He had completed all arrangements
- - except to notify the girl."
"Will you marry me?"
"Certainly not!"
"I think a long walk would do me good."
"Your tickets, sir - - and congratulations."
"The boat sails at ten in the morning, sir."
"I don't get up that early - so I'll go aboard tonight."
Going on a honeymoon without a bride is like singing the words of -
- "Kiss Me Again" to the music of "Alice, Where Art Thou."
"What pier, sir?"
"Pier two."
"I must get some papers off the
Navigator, so stop at Pier 12."
Pier 12 >>> Pier 2
"Is there any one on board?"
"Nobody."
Under the cover of darkness the foreign agents prepared to carry out their plans.
"Help!"
The next morning found the Navigator drifting helplessly at sea.
"Will you marry me?"
"This is a fine time to ask me that.
I'm cold and hungry and - -"
"Put up that bright one."
"She's quarantined."
"Try and catch them!"
"Hey! Wait a minute!"
By the time they were ready to say "good-night" -
- they had found a couple of sea-going tuxedos.
Giant Fire Crackers
Candles...
Roman Candles
Asleep in the Deep - Wilfred Glenn
Danger is near thee -
Many brave hearts are asleep in the Deep -
BEWARE
Weeks later - still drifting.
We now find the crew -
- with a safe and quiet place to sleep.
"Land!"
"Cannibals!"
"We're safer on the boat."
"We're drifting toward them."
"We're safe! I've anchored the ship."
"We are sinking! It's just a matter of time until we're captured."
"Can't you fix it?"
"That would have to be fixed from the outside."
Instructions for Deep Sea Divers
Where ignorance is bliss - -
Danger
Men At Work!
THE END
Subtitle By Reza Fa
The best actress of all time.
No role is too difficult, every triumph adds up to an already glorious career.
A stunning beauty, an art that magically moves millions.
The Heads of State of Europe in rivalry to pay their respects.
Every new caprice of clothing is accepted by the world, as a fashion decree.
Rivals that come to mock, remain but to worship.
The most expensive dishes to seduce a whimsical appetite.
Power and wealth at your fingertips, but with a heart that remain faithful to the choices of a humble youth.
While he fervently devotes his life to preserving the natural palates, though exquisite of it.
There is one, but only one thing I desire;
A slice of wheat cake!
For those who bring glamor to life;
For those whose beauty is greater than any other woman;
For those who command our smiles, our tears, our dreams...
For the actresses!
Hang on!
You forgot that there are no other actresses in the world, only me!
Look... I'm Salome!
Hey, Jenny! Wake up!
Gloria Swanson as Jenny Hagen, whose dreams are of triumph as an actress and whose life was made of long hours, badly paid at a cheap restaurant.
Dreamy, do not leave customers waiting!
Mrs. Wagner, the box.
Tiny, the working daughter.
Look here, what's this?
Glass beads in my soup.
What did you expect for a nickel?
Diamonds?
Lord, I would not lose my accounts for.
Nothing in the world, Orme gave them to me!
For Wagner, Orme Wilson was only a widower showing himself;
To Jenny he was a genius.
Orme was the object of Jenny's secret worship. Someday I would wait for a smile of his. So far, the best he could get was a laugh.
Sister, give us another piece of wheat cake.
Here, small; Stay with the grill while preparing the dough.
A hungry crowd, trying to feed themselves before the whistle blows from the factory.
I just did it to be funny.
Only for this, you will not get paid this week either!
All Jenny's ambitions were for Orme... have your own restaurant... have him as your boss!
Orme worshiped all the actresses... with enormous fervor from a young man who has never met an actress before.
Yes, little...?
Where are your clothes to wash?
Tell the laundry to send the bill. I have not received it for 2 months.
The actresses are true companions.
There is no falsehood in them.
They know a thing or two!
It's the show boat! Maybe they have new actresses this season!
Hey, little one; Wagner wants me to peel the peas.
Be a good girl and help me.
This is the reason why Orme never received the laundry bill.
Flea, it must be great to be an actress... any guy puts his picture on the wall... and runs to find you.
Higgs Academy of Actors by Correspondence Higgs.
Dear Ms. Hagen,
We have good news for you!
You'll soon be an actress!
When we received five
($ 5.00) dollars, and knowing that you passed our final test.
We will be sending you a diploma, showing that you are a qualified actress.
What do you think he'll say when he finds out I'm an actress too?
Think about it, Flea!
Only five dollars... and we'll have a degree that will prove to him!
For forty seasons, the
Floating Water Queen Theater, performing performances all over the Ohio River, its actors changing constantly and always.
Waldo Buck, owner and manager, thought well about his cast... but a little better about your fucking drum.
Now the big surprise...
Our new lead actress.
MS. Lillian Lyons, straight from
New York, London and Paris!
MS. Lillian Lyons.
Among boys, meet Ms. Lyons.
While Orme was admiring the acts of the concert boat,
Jenny was getting ready to take her place.
Among the great exponents of theatrical art.
Final test.
Standing, facing a mirror, express expressions: Happy wife.
Your spouse enters the room.
You show fear and start crying.
He tells you he's leaving her forever.
You throw yourself against the door.
You scream "abandoned - abandoned "then faints.
Flea!!
I think we have to wait a little longer for that diploma.
Orme's shirt cost two dollars...
What Jenny replaced in her place cost five dollars.
Yes, little one.
Are my clothes here?
See, this laundry makes my old shirts look new,
You should take your clothes there, little one.
Where are you going, Orme?
Oh, I have a date... with the main actress of the show.
You should see her, she looks like a duchess!
You poor thing.
I could have broken it myself!
Tell Orme that there is an unaccompanied lady. He just came in.
You're as clumsy as a left-handed shoemaker!
Did you tell Mr. Orme that
I'm not used to waiting?
Jenny, you told Orme that the lady.
Are you tired of being alone?
Orme!
I cut my finger.
Poor girl, wipe this wound with water.
I can not peel the peas now,
You'll have to help me.
Rays! Just when I had a date, too...
Forgive me for making you wait, but
I was stuck on something important.
She was angry because you can not keep the date?
Oh, it does not matter.
I'll see you tomorrow anyway.
Do you know what that means?
Two peas in a pod?
Courtship!
Orme, are you going to the picnic?
I think we can have fun!
Yes, I'm going to have fun...
Cooking wheat cakes and avoiding them to burn.
I'll be there to help you.
You're a good helper.
Jenny... I bet you cut your finger on purpose.
It's all about love and war.
Jenny is not ready to take lessons from the enemy...
On the day of New Martinsville's annual grand picnic, a glance at the people present convinced to Orme that he would "have fun".
Grove Park Entrance Fee $ 50cts
Wagner Meals.
God damn it, little one! You look like an accident about to happen!
I just did it to be funny.
You're as funny as a murder.
If that actress can do it, I will not because I can not.
But you're not an actress...
I do not like you that way.
Among the actresses, two is good day... but three is good night!
This is Jenny Hagen, the best little waitress in my restaurant.
Yes...
Orme and I work in the same place.
It is not my habit to meet waitresses.
Oh I see... she eats on automatic devices.
I did not come here to be insulted.
Come in and buy your tickets, Do not be left behind, come here.
The same old Buck ever.
He cares more about this drum than most men in their wives.
Have you ever loved anything more than anything else in the world?
Yes, my Orme.
My arm, no! My Orme!
Does he have a crush on actresses?
Yes, of course.
I'm an actress too, just never had a chance to show it.
Look, I got an idea!
If you want to get on the stage, I'll put you there... but you should keep this as a secret.
A few days later.
All New Martinsville was bragging about Buck's announcement.
Meet her in Rio.
Water Queen Floating Theater.
First appearance of his own local star.
Who is she?
Come and see August 26.
We're looking pretty good these past few days, Jenny!
Wonder who this local star might be?
I have a box for Saturday night, for me and you small.
Excuse me, but I have an appointment on Saturday night.
This commitment is with whom?
It's a secret, but you'll know.
Saturday night,
The whole town went to check who the mysterious local star is.
A tribute to Buck's propaganda, received a tour from another city.
A photo of the little EVA, sold to you by herself, only for ten cents!
To the stage, folks!
Beautiful, but I have a better idea.
You will wear this stocking on your head and will be the celebrated actress, the Masked Wonder.
But I wish Orme saw me!
No, first comes the boxing match.
You will let the other lady knock you out,
She will not hurt you, so you'll lift.
He will remove his mask and recite a text.
Orme tries to figure out where Jenny is and more, who would have brought her here.
Sir, I do not want to fight her.
She will kill me!
Surely she understands.
She will let you knock her out in the first round.
First, let me introduce you the best interpreters of the world of the piece "The hut of the Father Tomas".
Now, Ladies and Gentlemen, before the regular performance begins,
I have a big surprise for you...
A girls' boxing match, in which the two incomparable will face in an exciting fight in pursuit of athletic supremacy.
I present Ohio River champion Kid Bellows.
I introduce the local challenger, the Wonder Masquerade...
Shoot her out the window... and do not open the window!
Jenny!
The day is over, the darkness has fallen from the wings of the night...
I see the lights of the village glowing through the rain and mist, and a feeling of sadness touches me.
That my soul can not resist.
I see the lights of the village...
Orme! Do not let her kill me!
Jenny...
What are you doing on stage?
I just did it to be funny.
Shoot her out the window... and do not open the window!
What's the matter with you?
This is a worthy profession!
Where is she?
If I put my hand on it...
I'll show her that she can not fool me!
I did everything I could...
There is no way, no one loves me...
My God, she jumped into the river!
She jumped in the river...
Man overboard!
Jenny!
Here I am.
Why did you do that?
Because I thought you liked actresses!
You fool, did you think I would marry an actress?
Big chance you had, you hick!
You think this is the way to treat me, Jenny.
When I'm saving money, so we get married and we can have a restaurant wagon of ours?
You do not care about me.
Shut up, little one! I love you!
Oh Lord, give strength to your pants.
Waldo Buck's prayer was answered, as was Jenny's.
The entrance of actresses is not allowed.
End
The Western and Atlantic Flyer speeding into Marrietta, Ga., in the Spring 1861.
There were two loves in his live.
His engine,
And--
"Fort Sumter has been fired upon."
"Then the war is here."
"Yes, dad, and I'm going to be one of the first to enlist."
"Aren't you going to enlist?"
"Your name?"
"Johnnie Gray."
"Occupation?"
"Engineer on the Western and Atlantic Railroad."
"Don't enlist him. He is more valuable to the South as an engineer."
"We can't use you."
"William Brown."
"Occupation?"
"Bartender."
"If you lose this war don't blame me."
"Did Johnnie enlist?"
"He didn't even get in line."
"He's a disgrace to the South.
"Why didn't you enlist?"
"They wouldn't take me."
"Please don't lie. I don't want you to speak to me again until you are in uniform.
A year later. In a Union encampment just North of Chattanooga.
General Thatcher, and his chief spy, Captain Anderson.
"I Know every foot of this railroad from Marietta to Chattanooga, and with ten picked men I cannot fail."
"We will enter the South as civilians coming from the neutral state of Kentucky to join the southern cause."
"At Big Shanty we will steal the train while the passengers and the crew are at dinner, and proceeding North we will burn every bridge, cutting off the supplies of the army now facing you."
"Then the day you steal the train I will have General Parker advance to meet you."
"As soon as I arrive I will let you know how seriously father is wounded."
"Big Shanty.
Twenty minutes for dinner."
"Three men stole my General.
I think they are deserters."
"Why not stop and fight them?"
"I'm afraid they have us greatly outnumbered."
The Southern army facing Chattanooga is ordered to retreat."
General Parker's victorious
Northern army advancing.
"There is only one man on that engine."
In the enemy's country, hopelessly lost, helplessly cold and horribly hungry.
"At Nine o'clock tomorrow morning our supply trains will meet and unite with General Parker's army at the Rock River bridge."
"Then the army, backed by our supply trains, will advance for a surprise attack on the rebels left flank."
"Once our trains and troops cross that bridge, nothing on the earth can stop us."
"This girl was in the baggage car when we stole the train, so I thought it best to hold her."
"We had better stay here until daybreak to see where we are."
"It was so brave of you to risk your life, coming into the enemy's country, just to save me."
After a nice, quiet, refreshing night's rest.
"We've got to get back to our lines somehow and warn them of this coming attack."
"I will get that spy before he reaches the Southern lines. You follow with the supply trains as planned."
"We must pick up more firewood."
The Rock River bridge.
The Northern division nearing the bridge to meet the supply trains.
"That bridge is not burned enough to stop you, and my men will ford the river."
Heroes of the day.
"Is that your uniform?"
"I had to wear it to get through the lines."
"Take it off!"
"Enlist the lieutenant."
"Occupation?"
"Soldier."
Buster Keaton in "Battling Butler"
Directed by Buster Keaton
"Alfred, your father thinks a hunting and fishing trip -
- in the mountains might do you a lot of good."
"Yes - get a camping outfit -- go out and rough it. Maybe it will make -
- a man out of you if you have to take care of yourself for a while."
"Arrange it."
And so Alfred went out to rough it, leaving the -
- city behind - there was no other place to leave it.
"There doesn't seem to be a thing here to shoot."
"Isn't she pretty?"
"This is my papa and brother."
"Have you any more brothers or fathers?"
CHAMPION BIG FAVORITE OVER BATTLING BUTLER
ALFRED "BATTLING" BUTLER
New Arena Will Open Monday -
- Large Crowd Expected, Every Ticket Has...
"Some prize fighter has taken your name, sir."
"Arrange to stop it."
Advice to the Lovesick by
Beatrice Faircatch I have -
- Outlined the following proposal, with the answers...
"I'd like to marry that pretty little mountain girl."
"Shall I arrange it?"
"Mr. Butler would like to marry you."
"That jellyfish couldn't take care of himself -- let alone a wife."
"We don't want any weaklings in our family."
"Weakling!
You don't know who he is."
CHAMPION BIG FAVORITE OVER BATTLING BUTLER
MR. ALFRED BUTLER
ALFRED "BATTLING" BUTLER
New Arena Will Open Monday...
"What's he doing here - training?"
Advice to the Lovesick by Beatrice Faircatch
I have outlined -
- the following proposal, with the answers you may expect:
He - "Do you think you could learn to love me?" 
She- "Why -what do you mean?" 
He - "I'm crazy about you." 
She- "This is so sudden."
He - "You're the only girl I ever loved." 
She- "Give me time to think."
He - "No, I must know now." 
She- "Have you ever proposed to any other girl?"
He - "Don't you care for me just a little?" 
She- "I don't know."
He - "It means everything to me." 
She- "What will father say?"
He - "Will you marry me?" 
She- "Do you really mean it?"
He - "Yes."   She- "Yes."
Then use your own Judgment,...
"Do you think you could learn to love me?"
"I have."
"When are you going to fight again?"
"When I'm drafted."
"I mean, who do you fight next?"
"Yes."
"Sir, it's time to take your liniment."
"These people will never know the difference - the champion -
- will win and no one will ever hear of Battling Butler again."
"If you're going to fight tomorrow you'll have to hurry to catch the train."
"Arrange the train."
"In this corner we have Battling Butler."
Butler's trainer and manager.
"- the Lightweight Champion."
"The Alabama Murderer challenges the winner."
"I'm champion."
"That means you cannot go back to the mountains, sir."
"You're wrong, I'm going back and tell her the truth. I'd rather lose her that way."
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
World's Lightweight Champion
BATTLING BUTLER TO FIGHT ALABAMA
MURDERER New Champ to Defend Title -
- Thanksgiving Stars Training at Silver Hot Springs tomorrow
"That means you have to leave right away."
"Arrange it."
"I'll hurry and pack my things."
"I'm sorry, but you can't go."
"I want you to know me as I am -- not as the brutal, -
- blood-thirsty beast that
I am when fighting."
"Promise me you will never come near the training camp or to see me fight."
"Where do we go from here?"
"We'd better go to Butler's training camp, sir, -
- so that you can answer her letters from there."
SILVER HOT SPRINGS
Hotel Register
Alfred Battling Butler & Wife.
NO ADMITTANCE
"Drive carefully. These country folks may not be used to city speed."
Alfred Battling Butler & Wife.
Alfred Butler and Man.
NO ADMITTANCE
"How's your heel?"
"He's all right."
"Let's go out for a little road work."
Eight miles later.
"I'm glad you came to see me -- now you must go right back home."
"I won't go home! I'm going to stay right here and help you train."
"Compliments of Mr. Butler."
"That woman says she's married to you, too."
"-- so you see, sir, it would wreck his home if she knew -
- the truth. Won't you be a good fellow and fix it for him."
"My dear, we are not the only
Butlers here. This is the -
- Lightweight Champion, Mr.
Battling Butler, and his wife."
"Don't forget your date Thanksgiving."
"What date?"
"With the Alabama Murderer."
"If he wants to be Battling
Butler let him fight the Alabama -
- Murderer, and he'll never flirt with anybody else's wife."
"I'm through - get him in shape the best you can."
"Don't you think it advisable, sir, to give this up?"
"No, Martin, I'd rather be killed by the
Alabama Murderer than have her know."
"Put up your hands."
By dinner time the only thing Alfred had on his mind was his stomach.
And so for three weeks Alfred trained and starved and suffered and ached -
- and bled and groaned and hoped and prayed and - and then came the storm.
OLYMPIC Auditorium 
THANKSGIVING NIGHT NOV. 26 1925
CHAMPIONSHIP BOUT
BATTLING BUTLER VS. ALABAMA MURDERER 15 ROUNDS
"I persuaded her to stay at the hotel
- so she won't see you fight."
"I thought it best to prepare for the worst, sir."
"See that she gets a good seat."
"I hope you win -- father and brother wrote that they've bet all their money on you."
"Butler!"
"BUTLER!"
"That was Battling Butler - he fought!"
"You didn't think we'd throw away a championship just to get even with you."
"Thanks - for saving me."
"I've been saving you for three weeks."
"That was Battling Butler."
"I lied to you -- I'm not even a fighter."
"I'm glad."
THE END
Subtitle by Reza Fa
# I'll lay the dish here
Ooh, là là là là
# To hold the fish here
Ooh, là là là là
# The serviettes here and now the cigarettes here #
# And matches too
They mustn't complain #
# A little candy
Ooh, là là là là
# A little brandy
Ooh, là là là là
# A bunch of roses to show the way we entertain #
# And a little bottle of champagne ##



-
- 
She's terribly jealous.
Oh!
Voilà!
- Mon mari!
- Her husband!
Oh.
Paulette!
Paulette! Ma Paulette!
Paulette!

S'il vous plaît.
Voilà.

Count Renard, this scandal will be your last.
At any rate, your last in Paris.
As the ambassador of Sylvania...
I cannot any longer permit our military attaché... to disgrace the name of our illustrious country with his shameless escapades.
Your Excellency, please -
But that is an end.
You will leave at once for Sylvania and report to Her Majesty the queen in person.
But, Your Excellency, I'm sure the stories you've heard about me are horribly- are horribly exaggerated.
Count Renard... for one week, I made it my business to follow you about personally.
Oh. I'm sorry I didn't know it,
Your Excellency.
I would have taken you to some real places.
How dare you.
I know more about you than you think.
My wife has told me everything.
You are to take the first train.
I think I had better take the first airplane.
You are going by plane, monsieur?
Yes, Jacques.
And I've got to leave you.
You're not going to take me with you?
- I'm sorry.
- But what will you do without me?
Think how good I am at making up excuses for you.
Why, I can even imitate your voice on the telephone... and pretend you're at home to one lady... when you're really having supper with another.
Yes, Jacques.
You're a very good servant.
And you can tell lies better than anybody I know.
But I won't need you anymore.
In fact, I will probably be sent to a military prison.
But even so, you'll need me, monsieur.
Supposing someone you don't want to see calls at the prison.
Who's going to tell them you're not at home?
I can't see how anybody could be so anxious to leave this beautiful Paris.
But, monsieur, I am a Frenchman.
And to be a Frenchman in Paris is nothing... because everyone in Paris is a Frenchman.
- That's true.
- But to be a Frenchman in -
- What is the name of your country?
- Sylvania.
That is different.
Why, even my stories will be new there.
I can actually tell them the one about the Frenchman and the farmer's daughter.
Oh, please, monsieur, take me to Pennsylvania.
- Sylvania.
- Take me to Sylvania.
All right, Jacques. I'll take you there.
Go and pack the bags.
Oh, thank you. Thank you, monsieur.
I am so happy.

I am not.
# You'll never miss me when I'm gone
Paris #
# But I know that I'll miss you #
# You took a lot of pains in teaching me #
# Why must we say adieu #
# I've seen your mild days #
# And some of your wild days #
# Down where the Seine flows #
# And where the champagne flows
# You taught me all that a kiss could be #
# Paris, your judgment was good enough for me #
# With you each night meant the thrill of excitement #
Montmartre and ladies
# That love to raise Hades #
# If I've been happy then you're to blame #
# Oh, Paris please stay the same #
# I've seen your blonde girls #
# With beautiful blonde curis #
# Sweet Paris daughters #
# In all of your quarters #
# They taught me all that a kiss could be #
# Paris, your ladies were good enough for me #
I've met brunettes here
# And little grisettes here #
# I've lost my station and my reputation #
# If I've been happy then you're to blame #
# Oh, ladies, please stay the same #
# I'm like my master
Now I'm leaving you #
# He's sad
So am I, Paris #
I try to follow in his footsteps too
# A few may remember me #
# I've seen your mild maids #
# I've see your wild maids #
# Both shy and sporty #
# Tried all under 40 #
# They taught me all that a kiss could be #
# Paris, your servants were good enough for me #
# If I've been happy then you're to blame #
# Oh, Paris please, stay the same ##
Ladies and gentlemen, on your right you see the Royal Opera House.
And on my left, the residence of
Her Majesty, Queen Louise I of Sylvania.
The construction of the castle was begun under Maximilian I in 1537...
and finished in 1687 under Maximilian VIII.
The castle contains one of the most beautiful picture galleries in the world... and its collection of art treasures is unsurpassed.
The castle represents a value of $110 million.
$110 million?
-
- 
Company...
- halt!
- 
You call that a goose step?
Why, that isn't a chicken step!
- You blackguards!
- Lieutenant!
Don't you realize Her Majesty is still asleep?
Quiet here! Take them away.
- Yes, sir.
- Shh!
Yes, sir.
Company... left... face!
Forward- on tiptoes- march!


Good morning, Your Majesty.
Good morning, Your Majesty.
I'm so hopeful Your Majesty rested well.
Why am I always awakened from my dreams?
I'm sure it was a nice dream,
Your Majesty.
Oh, it was wonderful.
It was gorgeous.
Mmm. Oh.
Mmm.
I hope Your Majesty's dream comes true.
No.
I'm afraid it will always have to remain... a dream.
# There's a land of charm that I know #
# Land of sweet romance where I love to go #
# And its bounds touch my room #
# In the gloom where the shadows creep #
# Someone I meet there waits for me #
# Someone tender as a lover should be #
# And I whisper each night #
# As I close my eyes #
# In sleep #
# Dream lover #
# Fold your arms around me #
# Dream lover your romance has found me #
# I'm held #
# In your spell #
# Knowing so well #
# Dreams never tell #
# We two can leave the world behind us #
# Nobody indiscreet can find us #
# Oh, dream lover mine #
# Secrets divine #
# I will share them #
# With you #
# Dream lover fold your arms around me #
# Dream lover your romance has found me #
# Oh, my darling
I am just longing for a love of my own #
- # Nobody indiscreet can find us #
- # Nobody indiscreet can find us, I know #
# Dream lover #
# Secrets divine #
# I will share them #
# With you ##
Please, Your Majesty.
Won't you tell us more about your dream?
I'm afraid I can't.
It wasn't just exactly the sort of dream for a queen.
Was it the sort of dream for a lady-in-waiting?
I hope not.
I had a lovely dream myself- about Your Majesty.
I dreamed that Your Majesty got married.
And you call that a lovely dream?
Why not, Your Majesty?
We all wish, we all hope, we all pray...
- that very soon Your Majesty will be -
- Married.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- Marriage. Marriage.
In all my country, nothing else is ever spoken of.
What do the children learn at school?
"The queen is unmarried still."
What do the papers write about?
"Is the queen to marry?"
What does my Parliament debate?
"When shall the queen marry?"
And from my ministers:
"Whom shall the queen marry?"
Marriage. Marriage.
That's all I hear, morning or night.
Didn't I tell that conductor never to play the "Wedding March" again?
But, Your Majesty, it is not the same conductor.
- This is a new one.
- Where's the old one?
He is being married today.
Oh.
Oh.
Phew!

-
- 
- Good morning, gentlemen.
- Good morning, Your Majesty.
Well?
Whom can you suggest today?
For what, Your Majesty?
For my husband.
Now don't tell me you weren't talking about it.
You're always talking about it.
We have no one to suggest,
Your Majesty.
We have given the matter up.
- Really?
- Yes, Your Majesty.
Oh, what a relief.
Oh, how glad I am.
And, uh... why have you given the matter up, may I ask?
Well, uh -
- You see, it's rather difficult.
- Very difficult.
Difficult?
You tell me it's difficult to find a husband for me?

Yes, Your Majesty.
Excuse me, Baron.
How does Her Majesty feel today?
And that's final, Admiral.
I certainly don't need any help from the navy.
Yes, Your Majesty.
But surely Your Majesty must realize that the field for selection is limited.
If marrying you were to make a man a king... that would be different.
But Your Majesty's husband would be simply prince consort.
After all, what is a prince consort?
He is a gentleman with a thousand duties and no rights.
- He has nothing to say, nothing to do.
- Well, I wouldn't say that.
Of course, he has something to do, naturally.
And yet, uh, he has nothing to do, if you see what I mean.
I see.
He is Your Majesty's husband and nothing else.
Nothing else?
- But isn't it enough to be my husband?
- But, Your Majesty-
It never seems to occur to you gentlemen that there might possibly be some men... who would enjoy being my husband even if I were not a queen.
My face isn't actually painful to look at.
My complexion's quite good.
And in case you're too serious-minded to notice such things... let me inform you... my legs are perfect.
There's only one other leg like that in the whole of Sylvania.
And that's it.
Do you see?
Thank you.
I didn't see, Your Majesty.
How do you think I should behave?
Should I be humble, proud, apologetic?
Say as little as possible.
I don't think your French accent will please Her Majesty.
Is it still very notice-able?
No. It's very noticeable.

Oh. But that's terrible.
No. It's terrible.
How did you acquire this accent?
I'll tell you.
Once, in Paris,
I had an awful cold.
I went to see a great French doctor to cure it.
I rang the bell.
The door was opened by a lady.
- Mm-hmm.
- A beautiful lady.
Mm-hmm.
The doctor's wife.
And in less than a month...
I had lost my cold... but I had a terrific French accent.
 And if I'm talked to like this again,
I'll dissolve the cabinet.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- I'll dismiss the whole general staff.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- And if that band...
plays the "Wedding March"once more...
- I'll give orders to shoot!
- Yes, Your Majesty.
I'm sorry, Count.
You're next.
- What do you want?
- Count Alfred Renard...
Your Majesty's military attaché at Your Majesty's embassy in Paris.
Ordered home for an audience with Your Majesty.
- You'll have to wait.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- What do you want?
- Count Alfred Renard...
Your Majesty's military attaché at Your Majesty's embassy in Paris.
Ordered home for an audience with Your Majesty.
- Didn't I tell you to wait?
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- Then wait.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
Count.
Count Alfred, I understand you've been seriously involved... in a disgraceful affair with a woman.
No, Your Majesty.
With several.
Aren't you ashamed of yourself?
Yes, Your Majesty.
I don't think it's funny.
I think it's serious.
Very serious.
- And I shall have to punish you.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- I shall have to punish you very severely.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
Otherwise you'd start all over again.
Yes!
I shall think of a punishment that will cure you forever.
An awful punishment.
Let me see.
An awful punishment.
You shall be ordered... to grow a beard.
- A beard, Your Majesty?
- Yes.
That will stop all your philandering.
You'll have to be serious in a beard.
And am I to be permitted to attend
Your Majesty after the beard is grown?
Certainly. I shall want to see that my instructions have been obeyed.
Then I fear Your Majesty will regret the order.
I look terrible in a beard.
- Really?
- Oh, dreadful.
Of course, there are men who look fine in beards, like sheiks.
- Well, yes. That's what I thought.
- But I don't.
- No?
- Oh!
Oh, I grew one once to see.
Ah, it came out all red and scraggly.
Oh, no. No, I assure Your Majesty... it would be the most awful-looking beard in Sylvania.
And -
That's saying a great deal.
- Well, then don't grow it.
- No, Your Majesty.
- Don't do it.
- No, no, Your Majesty.
- No beard.
- No, no, Your Majesty.
- You promise me.
- My word of honor.
But what can I do with you?
I've got to punish you.
May I make a suggestion?
You want to suggest a punishment for yourself?
Yes.
Of course.
Please.
Well, tell me.
If I were in Your Majesty's place...
I would say this:
"Count Alfred...
"the sort of life you've been leading must stop.
You shall not return to Paris."
Very good.
Then I would say:
- "Alfred" -
- Hmm?
"Count Alfred, you shall stay here...
"in the palace...
"attached to me.
And from morning till night, never dare to leave my side."
And you call that a punishment?
You're the most impudent man I've ever met.
You seem to forget you're talking to your queen.
Count Alfred will dine with me tonight.
At 8:00?
Yes, Your Majesty.
White uniform.
Yes, Your Majesty.
You understand?
Oh, yes, I understand.
# With such a bad report of you
I wonder what I ought to do with you #
# You really can't be too severe when my regret is so sincere #
# And true #
# If you were on probation #
# Could I depend on you #
# To make you think more kindly #
# Let me obey you blindly #
# You mean you'd really do #
# Anything to please the queen #
# Everything to please the queen #
# Morning, noon and night #
# I'm yours to command me #
# You want me good
Then I'll be good #
# You want me bad
Then I'll be bad #
# I mean, I could be both #
# If you demand me #
# Understand me #
# What if I demand your head #
# Perhaps you'd like my arms instead #
# I've lost my head the moment I saw you smile #
# Remember you're on trial #
# Will you do as I advise #
- # Madame, you will be surprised #
- # You mean #
# Anything to please the queen #
# Anything to please the queen #
# Everything to please the queen #
# Morning, noon and night #
# I'm yours to command me #
# You want me cold
Then I'll be cold #
# You want me bold
Then I'll be bold #
# I'll be bold or cold or hot #
# As you demand me #
# Understand me #
# You'll keep watch all day for me #
# A good night watchman I will be #
# I've learned that duty in Paris
You leave it to me #
# You'd better wait and see
We shall find how good you are #
# I've had no complaints so far #
- # You mean #
- # Anything to please the queen #
# Anything to please the queen ##
Perhaps you didn't quite follow me, Count.
You're invited for dinner, not for tea.
I followed Your Majesty perfectly.
Hmm. Too perfectly, I'm afraid.
Remember. 8:00.
Oh, Count.
Don't forget. No beard.
Oh, no, Your Majesty.
# Anything to please the queen
Everything to please the queen #
# Morning, noon and night
I'm yours to command ##



Just a minute, monsieur.
In case some lady should telephone, am I to say you have a date with the queen?
- No lady will telephone.
- But if?
Impossible. There is no telephone.
Do you know the story of the Frenchman and the farmer's daughter?
I know it.
I am the Frenchman.
You are not.
How do you know?
I am the farmer's daughter.
Go home.
Are you talking to me or to the dog?
- Is this your animal?
- Yes.
Then take it away. Don't you see it is eating out of the same dish as the queen's dog?
Listen here. If my master's good enough to have dinner with the queen... then his dog can eat dinner with the queen's dog.
- So, that's your master.
- Yes.
- That naughty boy from Paris?
- Yes.
Do you know why the queen has invited him for dinner?
Because the king's away.
There is no king.
- She hasn't got a husband?
- No.
Oh. Now I know why she invited him.
But, gentlemen, even if she liked him, would he be eligible to become the prince consort?
Why, absolutely. His great grandfather was the illegitimate son of one king... and his grandmother the sweetheart of another.
Oh.
I had no idea that he came from such a distinguished family.
And do you think Her Majesty is serious?
Why, how can you doubt it?
The first time she sees him, she invites him to dine with her alone.
- And if it goes on at this rate -
- Then we're entitled to the highest hopes.
Shh! They're coming.
They sit down.
They are seated.
She smiles at him.
He smiles at her.
They both smile... at each other!
At each other?
- She is laughing.
- That's the way they always start.
And how she laughs.
He must have told her the story of the Frenchman and the farmer-
The lackey is bringing in champagne.
Now they are clinking glasses.
She drinks his health.
He drinks hers.
He tells her, " This is the most beautiful moment of my life."
How do you know that he does?
You can't hear anything.
What else could he say?
They've opened the window.
What does it mean?
- The queen is warm.
- The champagne.
No. It's him.
She's going to her boudoir.
She opens the door.
- She enters the boudoir.
- Heavens!
She beckons to him.
He enters.
She closes the door behind them!
Heaven save the queen!
You know, Count... this is the first time
I've ever dined with a man alone.
And this is the first time
I have ever-
Don't lie.
The first time I ever dined with a queen.
But with women?
Of course.
Of course I have dined with women.
These dinners in Paris... were charming?
Yes.
The food in Paris is very, very good.
And the ladies?
Oh -
Well, I feel, by comparison... it must be very dull... dining with a queen.
It would be the most delightful experience of my life...
dining with a queen, if-
- lf?
- If one... could forget -
That I am a queen.
Yes.
Very well. Forget it.
I am no longer
Queen Louise I of Sylvania... but a woman.
A mere woman.
And you're meeting me for the first time.
What would you do?
Oh.
What would you do?
Hello, Louise.
All this the first time you meet?
Yes.
Oh.
Oh, but if it's like this at first... what can be left for later?
Plenty.
If she appeals to you... and if you find out that you love her... oh, there's plenty left...
- if she were like -
- Like?
If she were like -
# Loves I have known are buried in the past #
# They couldn't last with you #
# None of them could ever hold me fast #
# In the way you do #
# Yet their memories seem to cling to me #
# Something from each one you bring to me #
# Eyes of Lizette #
# Smile of Mignonette #
# The sweetness of Suzette #
# In you displayed #
# Grace of Delphine #
# Charm ofJosephine #
# The cuteness of Pauline #
# In you arrayed #
# Those other charms #
# With yours need not be told #
# No other arms but yours could ever hold me #
# Lips of Lucille #
# Beauty of Camille #
# You are my ideal #
# My love parade #
# Eyes of Lizette #
# Smile of Mignonette #
# The sweetness of Suzette #
# That's in you, displayed #
# Delphine #
#Josephine #
# Pauline #
# That's in you, arrayed #
# Those other charms #
# With yours need not be told #
# No other arms but yours could ever hold me #
# Lucille #
# Camille #
# You are my ideal #
# My love parade #
# Living in the shadow of a throne #
# I've gone my lonely way #
# But I have a love that's all my own #
# To bestow someday #
# Still I'm glad to know you find in me #
# All the charms you love #
# Combined in me #
- # Eyes of #
- # Lizette #
- # Smile of #
- # Mignonette #
- # The sweetness of #
- # Suzette #
# In me arrayed #
- # Grace of #
- # Delphine #
- # Charms of #
- #Josephine #
- # The cuteness of #
- # Pauline #
# In me displayed #
# Those other charms #
# With yours need not be told #
# No other arms but yours could ever hold me #
# Lips of Lucille #
# Beauty of Camille #
- # I'm your ideal #
- # You are my ideal #
- # Your love parade ##
- # My love parade ##
Go now.
No.
I want you to go.
No.
Please.
Alfred.
Yes.
Louise!
# You are my ideal #
- # My love parade ##
- # Love parade ##

We two can see the world behind us
Nobody indiscreet can find us
Oh, dream lover mine
Secrets divine
I will share them
With you
# Dream lover #
Fold your arms around me
Dream lover
# Your romance has found me #

I'm held in your spell
Knowing so well
We'll never tell
# We two #
# Can leave the world behind us #
# Nobody indiscreet #
# Can find us #

Oh, dream lover mine
Secrets divine
# I will share them #
# With you ##


Stop. Stop that whistling.
- It's unlucky.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
And don't call me Your Majesty.
I'm not a king.
Oh, but you'll be a sensation.
Everyone will applaud when you enter the throne room.
Nonsense.
I feel sure you'll run away with the wedding.
Now, how do I look?
I don't like that medal.
What's the matter with it?
The man looks cross-eyed.
Cross-eyed?
King Stanislaus XXll cross-eyed?
Oh, no. No. That can't be.
That was never taught at school.
Still looks cross-eyed.
Maybe - Maybe it's a silly superstition... but each time I have seen a cross-eyed man...
I've had bad luck.
To me, it's even worse than whistling.

Come in.
Her Majesty is ready.
Just a minute, sir.
It's all right.
-
- 

Long live
Her Royal
Majesty
The queen
Long
May she reign
Serene
Proudly
We serve her
Here at her command
Queen
Of our hearts
And Sylvania
Our land



By personal order extraordinary...
Your Majesty has bestowed upon Count Alfred the title of prince... and by this merciful act has uplifted him to a station... where marriage between you is possible.
Is it still Your Majesty's wish... to select Prince Alfred as Your Majesty's husband?
It is.
Is Your Majesty willing to be a loving wife to the prince consort?
I am.
And will Your Majesty protect him from all danger?
I will.
And you, Prince Alfred... you abide by Her Majesty's selection... and are happy to accept the station of prince consort?
Yes.
You promise always to love Her Majesty?
Yes, I do.
You promise further to fulfill Her Majesty's every wish...
to execute Her Majesty's every command...
and to be an obedient and docile husband?
- He hesitates.
- Incredible.
- He hesitates at promising to obey.
- And to be docile.
He should've thought of that before.
Yes, I do.

I pronounce you wife... and man.
What does he say?
He says,
"Man is man, and woman is woman.
And that to change that causes trouble."
He does not see how any man could stand being a wife.
And therefore he hopes this will be a most unhappy marriage.
For heaven's sake.
If he reports this to Afghanistan -
Tell him this is a love match... and will be the happiest marriage in the world.
No tschungu.
No tschungu.
No tschungu.
Halt. Left face.

Have that firing stopped.
- Your Highness, that is impossible.
- Stopped at once.
I can't. It's etiquette.
Etiquette or no etiquette -
Can't you understand?
- Perfectly, sir.
- Ah.
But I can't help it.
- I command it.
- Very sorry.
I can take orders only from Her Majesty the queen herself.
So. We shall see.

Alfred?


Do you hear those cannons?
Yes. Isn't it glorious?
Our bridal music.


How many-
How many more shots will there be?
What?
And each time they fire, you shall kiss me.

I wish now I'd ordered 500.



That was the last.
- Too bad.
- Thank heaven.
I wish we could have a cannon when we get married.
Let's get married too.
Make it a double wedding.

Jacques.
Jacquesy!
- Lulu. You're cross -
- I'm not cross.
I'm thrilled!
Eh, don't get thrilled.
Perhaps we'd better wait with our marriage and see how they get on first.
But there's no chance of their marriage going wrong.
Why, it even started wrong.
What does that lady think she's marrying - a trained poodle?
She is not a lady.
She is a queen.
Well, he's not a king.
He's a gentleman.
But when royalty marry, they don't quarrel like common people do.
They can't afford to.
That's just the trouble.
They can't let off steam with a good old row like you or I.
That's true.
But we common people can take life easy.
We can act natural, and nobody will care.
We can eat chicken with our fingers.
Look at the names I can call you.
Look at the things I can throw at you.
Oh, it's wonderful being common.
# Snuggle near, baby dear #
# Why so haughty and severe #
# Let's get together and cuddle up right here #
# Bear in mind I'm refined #
# And I'm not that way inclined #
# Where's your proper pride #
# Why be so dignified #
# Squeeze me once
Squeeze me twice #
# S'most improper but, oh, it's nice #
# Let's be common #
# And do it again #
# Hug me do close to you #
# S'a beautiful feeling and thrills me through #
# Let's be common and do it again #
# I'll surely smother #
# Oh, let me go, sir
This isn't right #
# Oh, darling Mother #
# If you could see your daughter tonight #
# Grip my neck, grab my hand #
# S'most improper but, oh, it's grand #
# Let's be common #
# And do it again #
S'a lovely moon
S'a lovely night
# What's the matter with you
You're so polite #
# So let's be common #
# And do it again #
# You crush me
I'll crush you #
# S'possible we'll be black-and-blue #
# Let's be common #
# And do it again #
# Can't you be gentle #
# You'll bruise me till I'm ultramarine #
# Be sentimental #
# But don't act like a threshing machine #
# So let's be rough
You know how #
# S'no use struggling
Too late now #
# So let's be common #
# And do it again ##


Don't do it again!
Ladies and gentlemen... four weeks ago today, our illustrious queen was married.
The desire of her subjects to celebrate this date... is readily understood.
But in consideration of the royal honeymoon...
I must ask the public to refrain just a little longer... from any serenades, torchlight processions... or public demonstrations of any kind and, in particular... to patriotically observe quiet within the limits of the castle... especially in the early morning hours.
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
Thank you.
And don't forget, ladies and gentlemen, this program comes to you... by courtesy of the Sylvania Hardware Corporation... the company that gives you two pots for the price of one.


Louise.
Louise.


# Grenadiers
Stand at arms, every man #
# And obey the trumpets' call #
# Give the word #
# Stand at arms spick-and-span #
# Let your queen be heard by all #
# My heart is aflame with your loyalty #
# For you, we stand or fall #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady and strong marching along #
# Singing a song of motherland #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady in war, ready in love #
# Living to serve no other land #
# Every uniform #
# Taking our hearts by storm #
# Who could be true as the grenadiers #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady and strong marching along #
# Heroes who scorn all fear #
# Royal men
The royal grenadiers #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady and strong marching along #
# Singing a song of motherland #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady in war, ready in love #
# Living to serve no other land #
# Every uniform #
# Taking our hearts by storm #
# Who could be true as the grenadiers #
# Grenadiers
Steady and strong, marching along #
# Heroes who scorn all fears #
# Royal men
The royal grenadiers #
# Left, right, left, right left, right, left, right #
# Sing out ##
Why, you're up, dear?
Yes. I'm surprised myself.
I might as well lie in bed all day.
I have nothing to get up for.
Well, what a charming reception.
I spend all morning reviewing the household guards, distributing medals... and now on my way to an audience with the prime minister...
I steal away to have a look at my husband, and-and -
He doesn't even say good morning to me.
Good morning.
Well, that finishes my morning's work.
What can I do now?
I have already shaved.
I had my hair cut yesterday.
There's nothing left.
So, you're bored.
All I'm waiting for now is to have you tell me I'm neglecting you.
Do you realize that not once since we've been married... have I left you alone at night?
And I never will.
Thank you.
It's very kind of you.
And after this foreign loan is arranged...
I'm going to take you to Vienna... and buy you a lot of nice new uniforms.
That's it. You think all you have to do is to buy me a few new uniforms... and I'll be satisfied.
That's the opinion you have of me, is it?
Oh, don't be silly, Alfred.
Oh, I'm sick of being treated as if I were a sort of plaything.
- You're in a horrible mood today.
- Am I?
- You have a cold?
- No.
Why do you cough?
Listen, Louise. You have the power to exclude me from all military affairs... from all cabinet meetings.
But, please, do not interfere with my coughing.
I cough when I want to.
At last, I've found something to do.
I will repair this today.
Yes. Immediately after-
I almost forgot something very important.
Alfred, where are you going?
Something very important.
I am going to have breakfast.
Where is my breakfast?
May I remind Your Highness... that Her Majesty the queen has not as yet appeared.
- Well. And?
- Well, I'm sure Your Highness knows... that breakfast cannot be served before the appearance of Her Majesty.
I want my breakfast.
Your Highness, I am very sorry.
- We must wait.
- I can't wait.
I want my breakfast.
I'm hungry.
Your Highness, I regret it, but it's impossible to -
Her Majesty will not appear for breakfast this morning.
Breakfast for His Highness.
Please, Your Highness.
- Do you speak French?
- No, Your Highness.
You're the only one in the palace who looks up to me.
#Just look at me #
# I think my heart will break #
# Nobody seems to take me seriously #
# Honestly #
# I'm just as lonely as a man can be #
# The days mean nothing at all #
# And when the shadows fall #
# The moon is only wasting time on me #
# Candidly #
# There must be something awful wrong #
# With me #
# I have a pair of hands #
# To hug and hold #
# But nobody's using them now #
# I've loads of love #
# That could be told #
# But nobody's using them now #
# I've a world of time #
# That's all my own #
# They say that you go silly if you spend it alone #
# I'm telling the truth
I'm just wasting my youth #
# 'Cause nobody's using it now
No, no, no, no #
# Nobody's using it now #
# There's a bridal suite #
# In gold and blue #
# But nobody's using it now #
# I've learned to wear pajamas too #
# What's the use of wearing them now #
# I've sown wild oats #
# I have indeed #
# But now that I've stopped sowing them
I'm going to seed #
# For years and for years
I've had great ideas #
# But nobody's using them now
No, no, no, no #
# Nobody's using them now #
# I have a big settee with patent springs #
# I've some pleasing ways and - other things #
# I'm a family man who's out of sorts #
# I'm just a loving papa to a great lot of thoughts #
# I blush to admit
I've still plenty of"it" #
# But nobody's using it now
No, no, no, no #
# Nobody's using it now
Zum, zum ##


...try to see the prince.
Isn't there standing room?
Oh, but I must see the prince.

Oh? Oh.
Oh, is that so?
Mm-hmm. All right.
The moment it was announced that Your Majesty... would attend the opening of the opera in person... the place was completely sold out.
- Your Majesty is still the biggest drawing card in the country.
- Yes, indeed, Your Majesty.
Have the spotlights been focused on the entrance to the opera house?
Oh, yes, Your Majesty.
Twelve motion picture cameras will photograph the arrival... of Your Majesty and the prince consort.
The crowd will cheer and press forward with such enthusiasm... that it can be kept in check only by the most heroic efforts of the police.
And has all this been well rehearsed?
Oh, yes, Your Majesty.
The crowd is the same one that we used at Your Majesty's wedding.
They all know their parts perfectly.
Good. Go on.
When Your Majesty and the prince consort appear in the royal box... the whole audience will rise.
For two minutes, we will have silent homage.
Your Majesty and the prince consort will reward your loyal subjects with happy smiles.
You are both in the best of humor.
- In the best of humor?
- Oh, yes, Your Majesty.
And does the prince consort know he's to be in the best of humor?
Well -
Your Majesty, I-I -
- Well, you'd better tell him, to be safe.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
Your Majesty frightens us.
Tonight is your first opportunity of showing your matrimonial happiness to the public.
- And if the prince consort does not smile in joy- - It will mean disaster.
The diplomatic representatives of the whole world will be guests in the royal box.
And unfortunately, the Afghan ambassador too.
And if he sees any coolness between you, he'll report it to Afghanistan.
Well, let him.
But surely Your Majesty knows that if Afghanistan hears anything...
Baluchistan hears it too.
And if Baluchistan hears it, then all Persia will know it.
And what is talked of in Persia spreads all over Turkey.
And when anything is known in Turkey, the Armenians get onto it immediately.
And you know how many Armenians go to America.
So if Wall Street hears of a rift in the matrimonial happiness of Your Majesty... it will stop all credits and we do not get the loan.
- And without that loan, we are broke.
- Broke!

So, unless I have a smile on my face tonight, we are broke.
- Yes, Your Highness.
- And you call yourselves statesmen.
Borrowing money is all that you're able to do.
Prince Alfred, what are you permitting yourself?
I permit myself to make the following suggestion.
We do not need a loan.
We have enough natural resources.
There is my plan for the national budget.
I have worked out everything - in my sleepless days.
The country can be saved without a loan.
Go on.
Read it.
It includes everything.
Even your dressmakers' bills.
I am not permitted to receive suggestions in the affairs of state... from the prince consort.
Not even when they are good?
Not even then.
- Do you speak French?
- Yes, Your Highness.
Too bad.
Prince Alfred, I must ask you once and for all... not to interfere in affairs of state.
I know.
I'm Your Majesty's husband and nothing else.
Prince Alfred, you may leave the room.
Stay, gentlemen.
Prince Alfred, you will meet me here at 7:00... in full gala uniform - all medals and decorations - and in the very best of humor.
And in case I don't feel like complying with Your Majesty's wish?
This is not my wish.
It is my command.
If Your Majesty had not already commanded me to smile...
I would laugh.


# When they went riding yesterday they never spoke a word #
- # You don't say #
- # Is it true #
- # Think of that #
- # Who's to blame #
# And he asked for garlic in his soup at dinner, so I heard #
- Something's wrong
- Did you hear
- Are you sure
- What a shame
# I know the queen regrets it but of course the man's to blame #
- # Good for you #
- # Not at all #
- # I'm for that #
- # Let it go #
# Well, here I am, still single
May my children stay the same #
# Drink to that
Here's to you #
- # Poor old prince #
- # Is that so #
# Don't you dare to say a word against the queen #
# The queen is always right #
# The queen is just a woman and she's just as mean #
# Say that again, we'll fight #
- # Don't forget she has a husband #
- # Don't forget she is the boss #
# And Her Majesty can run him out of town #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right # - # The queen is right #
- # That's enough from you #
- # Sit down #
# Don't you dare to say a word against the queen #
# The queen is always right #
# The queen is just a woman and she's just as mean #
# Say that again, we'll fight #
- # Don't forget she's got a husband #
- # Don't forget she is the boss #
# And Her Majesty can run him out of town #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
- # The prince is right #
- # The queen is right #
# That's enough from you
Sit down ##
You can tell him my patience is exhausted.
If he won't come here voluntarily,
I'll have him brought here... even if I have to send soldiers.
Yes, Your Majesty.

His Highness, the prince consort.

Why are you dressed like this?
What does it mean?
It means I'm dressed for traveling.
I'm going to Paris.
You go change at once.
You're going to the opera with me.
Only with soldiers and handcuffed.
Alfred, you know very well how much depends on this - my name, my position, my reputation as queen.
If you fail me tonight, all will be over between us.
It is already over- and forever.
- Alfred.
- You have gone too far, madame.
You thought you could order the former military attaché around and command the husband.
But you forgot one thing, madame - that first, I am a man.
- I know that, Alfred.
- No, you do not.
But I'm going to prove it to you.
Good-bye, madame.
- You mean you're really going?
- Yes.
Oh, but, Alfred, won't you love me anymore?
Only with soldiers and handcuffed.

Alfred!
Alfred!

# Dream lover #
# Fold your arms around me #
# Dream lover #
# Your romance has found me #
# I'm held in your spell #
# Knowing so well #
# Dreams never tell -##
-
- Grenadiers
Steady and strong marching along
Singing a song of motherland
Grenadiers
Steady in war, ready in love
Living to serve no other land
Every uniform
Taking our hearts by storm
# Who could be true as the grenadiers #
# Grenadiers
Steady and strong, marching along #
Heroes who scorn all fears
Royal men
The royal grenadiers
# Grenadiers #
Steady and strong marching along
# Singing a song of motherland #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady in war, ready in love #
# Living to serve no other land #
# Every uniform #
# Taking our hearts by storm #
# Who could be true as the grenadiers #
# Grenadiers #
# Steady and strong marching along #
# Heroes who scorn all fears #
# Royal men
The royal grenadiers #
# Left, right, left, right left, right, left, right #
# Sing out ##


As for myself, you needn't have come at all.
All right, good-bye.
Stay here.
Beg me to stay.
I ask you to stay.
Don't ask me. Beg me.
I beg you to stay.
Not commanding.
Begging.
Begging.
I beg you to stay.
Since you beg me so lovingly...
I'll be generous.
I'll stay.
You want to humiliate me.
That's why you came here.
No. I came because -
Why?
Because, after all...
I didn't want to ruin the woman
I once loved.
But tomorrow, I'm leaving for Paris.
And as soon as this loan of yours is signed...
I will file papers for divorce.
If you don't treat me nicely,
I'll go right home.
All right. Go on.
Still here?

If you don't take those glasses from your eyes,
I'll tear them away.
Go on.
You can't do it, eh?
You're a queen.
You must behave.
If you were just a mere woman, you could make a scandal.
But you can't.
That's what you get for being a queen.
Huh?
Ah, yes. Thank you.
Thank you.
Oh!
He'll never get these glasses back.
- ##
- 
Applaud.
Smile.
Oh! We are in the very best of humor, eh?


I blush to admit
I've still plenty of"it"
But somebody will use it now
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Somebody will use it now
She is in her room, and he is in his.
Yes. Sad, isn't it?
When we get married, let's be common... and only have one room between us.
Why even one room between us?


Who is it?
Louise.
What do you want?
A mouse is in my room.
Call your soldiers.

What are you doing?
Packing.
- Can I help you?
- No, thanks.
-
- 





Please.

The key, please.
So, you're trying to use force again, madame?

Where shall we live in Paris?
- We?
- Yes.
I'm going with you.
Wherever you go,
I'll follow you.
You can't get rid of me.
Well, there is no use for me to leave then.
No. No use at all.
I suppose I might as well stay here.
I suppose so too.
But how am I going to punish you?
- And you must be punished.
- Yes.
- And severely.
- Yes.
But how?
Let me see.
An awful punishment.
Let me see.
It's really not so easy.

May I- May I make a suggestion?
Yes.
Sit down.
If I were in your place, I'd say:
"Louise, I don't want a divorce.
- I love you too much for that."
- No, no, no, no, no.
But I'd say: " Louise...
"you can't order me around any longer.
" From now on,
I shall take command -
"not only of the affairs of state...
"not only in the Department of the Navy... but also here at home."
And my first command would be...
"Louise, don't dare to leave this room.
"You shall stay here...
"at my side... attached to me from morning till, uh" -
"from night till morning."
And you call that a punishment?
Yes... my king.
- # Eyes of #
- # Lizette #
- # Smile of #
- # Mignonette #
- # The sweetness of #
- # Suzette #
- # In me arrayed ##
- # In you arrayed ##
"IT" is that quality possessed by some... which draws all others with its magnetic force.
With "IT" you win all men if you are a woman - and all women if you are a man.
"IT" can be a quality of the mind as well as a physical attraction.
<u>Elinor Glyn</u> [signature]
WALTHAM 
THE BIGGEST STORE 
IN THE WORLD
Leaving his department store to his son, Cyrus P. Waltham... has gone to Herrin, Illinois, for the shooting.
"A gentleman to see you, sir."
Good luck
"For a good boy - on his first work day."
"If you ever go to work, Monty,
I'll do as much for you."
"IT" by Elinor Glyn
"IT" is that peculiar attribute that some people have, which attracts the opposite sex. 
The possessor of "IT" has it unconsciously and has irresistible sexual magnetism.
Mothers spoil boys with "IT", and women never refuse them!
"Old fruit, you've got 'IT'!"
"What the devil are you doing?"
"No - too bad - but you haven't any 'IT'!"
"Run away, Monty, the keepers are coming."
"I'm to look over the store. Come along."
"Hot socks - the new boss!"
"Sweet Santa Claus, give me him!"
"Let's have a double wedding - you and him - and me and the Prince of Wales!"
"Where do you figure?
The Prince is going to be our best man!"
"I've inspected all the lady employees - and not one of them has 'IT'!"
"You went over big, dearie!"
"Just you wait - I'll take the snap out of your garters yet!"
"Look! If I ever saw 'IT', that's 'IT'!"
"Shall we gnaw a chop at the club tonight?"
"Thanks, but I have an engagement at the Ritz."
"Could I - is it asking too much - would it be possible for me to - to drive you home?"
"I'd be very glad to go with you - if you'd ride in my car."
Betty lived in that fashionable downtown suburb -
Gas-house Gables -
"Would - could - do you ever dine?"
"I'd love to -"
"- at the Ritz!"
"Shall we dress?"
"Of course - how absurd!"
"Then I'll pop around at eight?"
"Toodles is hungry."
"The doctor says I can't go back to the store for a month - and
I can't let you do any more for me."
"Don't be sill, Molly! I won't go back on a pal!"
"That pest of a landlady and her friend just left.
The baby shouldn't do this - and I shouldn't do that -"
"If this was my baby,
I'd tell 'em where to head in!"
"I'm dining out tonight
- at the Ritz!"
Every evening in America, eighteen million blondes prepare to dine with gentlemen. One of the eighteen million -
"Mother, would you approve of my being Mrs. Cyrus T. Waltham?"
"He hasn't proposed yet
- but he's going to!"
"Mademoiselle's car is without."
"A nice, quiet table - in the corner, Mr. Montgomery?"
"I don't crave this table.
When I'm in the swim,
I want to be with the goldfish!"
"I'll take the same!"
"Who is the girl with Monty?"
"I don't know - but isn't she attractive?"
"Who's the blonde with
Mr. Waltham?"
"Adela Van Norman - they've been friends for years. Some day they'll marry and end it all."
"Of course you're reading
Elinor Glyn's latest story, 'IT'?"
"Monty was raving about it today. What is 'IT'?"
"Here's Elinor Glyn herself!
Let's ask her to tell us something about 'IT'."
"Madame Glyn, we've been talking about your latest story.
Just what is this 'IT'?"
"Self-confidence and indifference as to whether you are pleasing or not - and something in you that gives the impression that you are not at all cold. That's 'IT'!"
"If you have 'IT', you will win the girl you love."
"Cyrus, do you believe in 'IT'?"
"I certainly do!"
"I'm going to get my wish!"
"Oh, I must telephone!"
"Who is that charming girl with you?"
"This is a great pleasure."
"I'll bet you won't even recognize me, the next time we meet."
"I'll take the bet - and you can name the stakes."
In a shopgirl's day, the first thousand customers are the crabbiest.
"She always takes goods on approval - wears them around for six months - and then finds she doesn't approve!"
"- and the girl insulted me!"
"See that the garment is replaced - and send the salesgirl to my office."
"Young lady, in this store the customer is always right -"
"I'm the salesgirl!
Go on - bawl me out!"
"Well, anyway, I lose the bet for not recognizing you. What's the forfeit?"
"Oh, that wasn't a real bet.
I don't want anything -"
"Thanks, Adela, I'll be very happy to dine with you tonight."
"If you insist on paying your bet, you can take me out tonight."
"All right! Where?"
"Let's go to the beach - and do it up right!"
HOT DOGS!
Tasty and satisfying!
The best on the beach!
House of Amusements
"Hold me tight,
Mr. Waltham."
"Happy?"
"So you're one of those 
Minute Men - the minute you know a girl you think you can kiss her!"
Poverty is no disgrace -- until meddling neighbors hear of it.
"There's no use arguing!
We're going to take that baby to the Home, until you're well!"
"Get that story."
"If women like you would stay home and have babies of your own, we'd all be better off!"
"We're doing our duty.
The mother is ill - and she has no means of support."
"This is my baby!"
"I don't believe it."
"I'm the baby's mother -
I'm not sick - and I've got a job! Laugh that off!"
"Haven't I a job, Monty - at Waltham's? Tell 'em!"
"Is that the baby's father?"
"Him? He couldn't even give birth to a suspicion!"
"Who is your husband?
Have you a husband?"
"None of your business!"
"I say, Betty, this isn't really your child, is it?"
"Are you blind? Can't you see the resemblance?"
...forgive me for last night, Betty, and come to the theater with me tonight?
I promise not to make the same mistake
"I have tashted the milk of human kindnesh - an' it's a lot of Fermillac!"
"B'lieve it or not - my baby is its mother!"
The young mother fights hard for her baby, like a tigress in the sand confronting social workers.
A sharp-dressed man of the city declared that the girl had means enough and was able to keep all the obligations
"I'm the chappie - the man about town -
I'm the ample means!"
"We are investigating the case of a girl who says she's employed here -"
"- she - she - there's a baby."
"She gave the name of Betty Lou Spence."
The young mother clutched the little boy to her chest and defied all who tried to take the child.
"Thank you. You see, we had to verify her story."
"She's the one. She told me it's her baby - told me with her own lipsh!"
"Will you issue the bonus checks now, Mr. Waltham?"
"Are you mad at me because I slapped you?"
"I'm sorry - but a girl
has to do that.
You know how those things are!"
"Let's forget it.
We've got each other straight now, haven't we?"
"Yes - we have!"
"It's a star sapphire."
"It's pretty - but
I like diamonds better."
"Would you like some diamonds for yourself?"
"Betty, I'm crazy about you -"
"I love you, too."
"I'll buy you diamonds - clothes - everything you want -"
"What are you trying to do?
Offer me one of those left-hand arrangements?"
"I'm crazy about you!
Isn't that enough?"
"I suppose that's what you men call love!"
"Cancel my appointments, please. I'm leaving town for a week."
Betty was too poor to quit her job - and too proud to stay. So she quit!
Woman Offered Job
"I - I've come to forgive you."
"You don't mean you thought the baby was really mine?"
"There's its mother!
Can't you see the resemblance?"
"What a joke on Waltham -
I told him it was your baby!"
"He thought it was mine?"
"And he wouldn't even give me the benefit of the doubt!"
"I'll make him propose to me - and when he does, I'll laugh in his face! And you're going to help me do it!"
"But - he's going on a yachting cruise and - and I'm going with him!"
"Fine! I'll yacht with you."
"But, I say - what about your clothes?"
"That's the joke on you - you're going to buy them for me."
"Give me your word you won't tell him - anything!"
"Is Mr. Waltham aboard?"
"Not yet, sir."
"The party's off. We might as well go back."
"Oh no, sir! Mr. Waltham's expecting you - he'll be here any minute."
"Shall I show you to your cabins?"
"Something I can get for you, Mr. Montgomery?"
"No, thanks - I'm just prowling about."
"Just going for some - some - cigars."
"Everything ready, Captain?"
"Let's get under way."
"I'm not feeling so well."
"Tea, sir?"
"Feeling better, Monty?"
"I feel so low, old chap, that I could get on stilts and walk under a dachshund!"
"Shall I call Miss Van Cortland, sir? She's in her cabin."
"I say, I almost forgot about Miss Van Cortland."
"Miss Van Cortland - the - the girl I asked when you asked me to ask someone."
"Monty, who is Miss
Van Cortland?"
"You - you tell them, old thing."
"She's a very nice girl. I -
I believe Monty met her in Paris last summer."
"You idiot!
Who is this girl?"
"She's a ripping sort, really!
She's positively topheavy with 'IT'."
"Oh, Monty, am I late for tea? I'm so sorry."
"Mr. Waltham! It's been years, hasn't it?"
"Won't you have some tea?"
"Haven't I seen you some place?"
"In Paris, perhaps.
I'm there so often."
"Desirez-vous du sucre?"
"What do you mean by bringing her?"
"You know what sort she is - with her fatherless child!"
"But, I say - it isn't fatherless -"
"I won't have her on board! We'll put back to port."
"Do you think we'll have as nice a day as this all day, Captain?"
"That's the last time I'll get you out of a scrape!"
"Miss Van Cortland seems to be rather lacking in reserve, doesn't she?"
"Personally, I think she has plenty - in reserve!"
"Betty, I've something to say to you."
"Won't it wait until morning?"
"I've been thinking things over, Betty. I want to talk to you - seriously."
"Be serious - with you?
How silly!"
"I don't care what you've been - I want you to marry me!"
"I'd rather marry your office boy!"
"He asked me - and I laughed at him - and now it doesn't seem so darned funny, after all!"
"It was a ghastly joke, old man - her baby's just a moth -
I mean a myth!"
"It's her friend's baby!
And she's crying for you -
I mean Betty, not the baby -"
"But you said yourself it was her baby -"
"Take the wheel, Monty
- I'm going to find her."
"The ballast has shifted to port, sir - but there's no danger!"
"Silly of me, but I'm afraid I overdid it - made a left-hand turn and what not -"
"Take your girl friend.
I had to knock her cold - but maybe it'll do her good."
"Betty, where are you going?"
"I'm going home!"
"Monty will get you."
"Monty, I wonder if there's anything between them?"
"I'm afraid there is."
"We're just a couple of
It-less 'ITS'!"
THE GRAND DUKE'S FINANCES
An adventures tale by Frank Heller, adapted for motion pictures in six chapters by Thea von Harbou.
Chapter 1, wherein we will know an incredibly small island which might be in the Mediterranean Sea, the Great Dukedom of Abacco, its charming tyrant,
Ramon the 12th (Harry Liedtke), last heir to a little crown and to a quite big public debt,
Don Esteban Paqueno (Adolphe Engers), its pitiful Secretary of Economy, and the earthly Grand Duke's gods:
Augustina, his chief cook, and Joaquino, his personal aid (Hugo Block).
Unfortunately, we won't be able to help making awkward aquaintances:
Two people with no manners or conscience,
Semjon Marcowitz (Guido Herzfeld) and Mr Bekker (Hermann Vallentin), and some more evil characters, the four conspirators: the Dangerous (Georg August Koch), the Mysterious (Max Schreck), the Hunchback (Hans Hermann), the Miser (Walter Rilla).
And now begins the story.
"His Highness cannot be found anywhere in the castle!"
"Your Excellency, the Secretary of Finance, Don Esteban Paqueno."
"... but His Highness is still sleeping."
"Then I'll wait until he wakes up."
"His Highness enjoys throwing away what's left of his patrimony!"
"Marcowitz insists he must meet with His Highness!
The payments are due in three days time!
"His Highness must speak with him personally!"
"Well, dear Mr Marcowitz, what is it that you want?"
"My money, Your Highness!"
But these are not the only grey clouds in the Great Dukedom of Abacco's skies.
"Were I not to get my money within the next 3 days,
I'll keep your entire island!"
"My knowledge is gone, Your Highness!
How will we be saved now?"
"Yes, dear Paqueno, we'll have to find another solution..."
"Your Highness' marriage to the Great Duchess
Olga would save Abacco."
"God knows how grateful I am to the Great
Duke Nicolai for opposing to his sister's wedding to a man whose Dukedom is nothing but debt."
"Howdy, gentlemen!"
"I must speak to the Grand Duke!"
"His Highness, the Grand Duke of Abacco, does not wish to speak to anyone!"
"A great sum of money wouldn't do the trick?"
"Take a sit, I beg you, sir!"
"My name is Bekker, Your Highness, and I am here to buy Punta Hermosa."
"Punta Hermosa!?"
"If I were to give you 5 million Francs for Punta
Hermosa, you shouldn't care what I want it for."
"If it was up to me, even 10 million."
"Either you speak more clearly,
Bekker, or..."
"Mr Bekker, His Highness has terminated this meeting"
"This means I have discovered a vast deposit of sulfur at Punta Hermosa!"
"Sulfur...?!"
"...and, you intend to exploit the deposit with the help of my countrymen?"
"... for ten million...!"
"Never!!"
"¿Paqueno, do you really expect me to become a scoundrel to my subjects?"
"Someone, such as yourself, who is endebted up to his neck cannot be so choosy!"
"Maybe you think ten million is not enough, sir!"
"Maybe you want part of the profit!"
"Wait for me, kid!
I'll get you this time!"
"Thank God!
Abacco is saved!"
"I see no other solution for Abacco, unless it comes down from the sky!"
"Argggh, what a disgusting fellow!"
I have decided to become the Grand
Duchess of Abacco.
I know you as little as you know me, but I like you since I heard the trouble you went through... to help the shipwrecked people from the "Palestrina".
It doesn't matter that you don't have money,
I have plenty.
I'll get your economy under control!
Summing up -
Yours, Olga,
Grand Duchess of Russia
"Isn't she great?"
"Get the Grand Duke now! Throw him out of the island, which isn't even his anymore!"
"Revolutions cost money, gentlemen!"
"Never mind, gentlemen... I also have some unfinished business with the Grand Duke of Abacco."
"All right, then?"
End of Chapter 1.
Chapter 2, wherein we expand the number of our aquaintances including Philipp Collin, aka Profesor Pelotard (Alfred Abel), a gentleman who changes name and trade, and Mr Isaaks, businessman and recently elected Congressman
(Julius Falkenstein).
(His still recent follies of youth grant him our simpathies beforehand)
"Mr. Isaaks, can I congratulate you for being elected?"
"If you're not able to help me, my career in politics is over."
"One upon a time there was a spicy young lady..."
"... and those letters of mine, those incredibly reckless letters, belong now to the greatest blackmailer in the world."
"Trust me, Mr.
Isaaks, it will pass."
"You haven't found the letter yet?"
"I must confess to something to His Highness"
"Your Highness, I wanted to... get a deferment from Marcowitz with the Grand Duchess' letter."
It doesn't matter that you don't have any money,
I have plenty.
I'll get your economy under control!
Summing up -
Yours, Olga,
Grand Duchess of Russia
"No, dear, I'll keep the letter"
"So, the letter, the Grand Duchess' letter,
Marcowitz has it now?"
"Then, we'll have to go get the letter!"
Meanwhile, Philipp Collin was considering the matter.
Mr. Semjon Markowitz, I hereby let you know that I have come to own a letter for which certain people would pay great sums of money.
If you're interested, you may find me between 5 and 6 at Melchiorstr. 12, by the greenhouse, Boston and Klix."
Grand Duchess Olga -
Grand Duke Ramon -
It doesn't matter that you don't have any money,
I hace plenty.
I'll get...!
"Out!!"
Boston and Klix
Animal voices impersonators.
"Better is better."
"Now, professor, what are the fees?"
"50 thousand Pounds, Mr. Isaaks"
"As a loan."
"¿What the heck will you do with all that money, professor?"
"An amazing gamble in Abacco's treasury stocks."
"The head you just pulled from me is worth more than the whole of Abacco."
"And I can assure you that, if you buy Abacco's treasury stocks, you'll be able to buy India's throne within the next 8 days."
Should Philipp Collin not hurry with his
Stock Market's scheme, some people may ruin his plans.
"I therefore give you enough money to start a revolution and I support your Presidency.
In exchange, I get Punta Hermosa as it is."
"We're leaving tonight... in secret!
I don't anyone to find out about this trip to the continent. I believe we'll be back within the next 8 days."
"... You'll govern in the meantime."
"This is cracking."
"We must tell Mr. Bekker."
"Telegram, telegram!"
Today, at the Stock Markets in London,
Paris and Rome, 80 % of the Grand Dukedom of Abacco's public debt was purchased by an unknown buyer.
There's great unrest in all financial circles.
What's going on? Wire your answer.
Perez Agency.
"A play with Abacco's stocks...
That's the end of the world."
End of Chapter 2.
Chapter 3, wherein two misterious cars play an important role, and a young lady shows up who doesn't want to be recognised for now
(Mady Christians), because a descendant (Robert Scholz) from Ivan the Terrible is chasing her.
Stock Market's sensation!
Stranger buys Abacco's stocks.
Who is behind this play?
"Save me, sir, if you're a gentleman...
Talk to me as if I were your fiancée."
"Brandy, quick."
"I get dizzy when someone passes out."
"Is that car gone now?"
"I'm fine now. I'll pay the bill and then leave."
"How much for the brandy?"
"Will you... will you accept a ring as surety for your expenses, sir?"
"So far, my lady, you have granted me the honour of considering me a gentleman...
Surely I am not a pawnbroker!"
"Will you not tell me what I can do for you?
Are you running away from someone?"
"Would you be so kind as to take me to the Hotel l'Europe?"
"Turn around, driver, turn around."
"I have seen the red car drive past, but he wasn't in it!"
"The train for the South leaves at 7:45, your Imperial Highness!"
"To the station!"
"I'd rather be dead than found!"
"Do you trust me... unconditionally?"
"How long does it take to get to the station?"
"Twenty minutes!"
"Unconditionally!"
"I always pictured my wike like this!"
"Not in the train either!"
End of Chapter 3.
Chapter 4, wherein Mr. Philipp Collin meets the greatest problems caused by professor Pelotard, whom he had taken under his wing unsensibly.
"I have called you, professor, because I've been at the bank and I want to settle my account."
"First, let's see the bill!"
"No, some brandy first."
Mr. Philipp Collin sees a light!
Berlin Diary
Stock Market's sensation!
"Find out, Paqueno, when we'll be able to resume our journey,
I cannot leave so quickly my world fame!"
"... In Abacco!"
Revolution at Abacco!
The Grand Duke overthrown!
"Enjoy, Mr. Collin...!"
The Grand Duke's missing, possibly murdered.
The Grand Duke overthrown!
Louis Hernandez, President of the Republic.
"For God's sake, does His Highness know...?"
"In the long run, dear Paqueno, my abdication would have been inevitable."
"My throne in India!"
"Do you happen to know who's worst off in this story?"
"Can you imagine how quickly he will come here?"
"I know who is behind this!"
For overthrowing the Grand Duke all the people mentioned below will be paid 2.000 $.
Should the Grand Duke lose his life, the pay will rise to 5.000 $.
The delivery of Punta Hermosa
"We must return to Abacco at once!"
"All communications with Abacco are interrupted."
"Some boat must go there!
Listen, I must get to Abacco!"
"Perhaps Captain Treponte..."
"I've been told at the Port's Office captain, that he's a man who doesn't fear a single thing..."
"I must get to Abacco!"
"Yes,... this is the Grand Duke
Nicolai's car,
200 powerhorses!"
"I've been told at the Port's Office captain, that he's a man who doesn't fear a single thing..."
"My Stork has just been chartered for another trip to Abacco.
By professor Pelotard."
"By my wife!?"
"I appeal to your sense of justice, madam!"
It would be far worse than mere unsolidarity to leave for Abacco without me."
"Professor, see us as two simple travellers who must go to Abacco inexcusably."
"If you want to get to Abacco you don't need my consent, but my wife's!"
"I believe he's well tamed!"
"Two gentlemen from Abacco."
"Revolutionaries?"
"Friends to the Grand Duke!"
"Are you out of your mind, getting down with no disguise?
Don't you remember you're being chased?"
"I hope you want to go to Abacco to help the Grand Duke."
"I must go to Abacco at once!"
"Wait! Wait! I'm going too!"
"Didn't I tell you Marcowitz is in a hurry?"
Philipp Collin has had a new moment of inspiration and decides to address all his travel companions as "Highness" from then on.
"What ship is this?"
"It's a single engine... to the service of His Imperial Highness, the Grand Duke Nicolai of Russia..."
"I'll go to Abacco on that ship!"
End of Chapter 4.
Chapter 5, wherein some people reveal their identities and the Republic of
Abacco is threatened.
"Admiral! I beg of you!
I must get aboard, Admiral!"
"No way! His Imperial Highness is in a terible mood!"
Semjon Marcowitz, who can show recommendation from
Her Imperial Highness, the Grand Duchess Olga.
"Destination Abacco!"
"Are you aware that your interest in Abacco may be dangerous for your life?"
"I'm... a journalist!
I have to be where things are happening!"
"And your wife?
Is she a journalist too?"
"You wouldn't be asking that if you knew my wife!"
"For God's sake...!"
"What an extraordinary effect a little sea breeze has had!"
"I can't wait to get to Abacco!"
"What newspaper does your husband write for?"
"I... I've known him only for a little time!"
"Ah, you're on your honeymoon?"
"Good afternoon, Mr. President!"
"What have you done to
Joaquino and Augustina, you rascals?"
"... at the White Pavilion!"
"It's too much for your nerves, Your Highness.
Get some rest. I'll manage to find the White Pavilion."
End of Chapter 5.
Chapter 6
Heil the Grand Duke!
"Nice gallows, Your Highness!
Wouldn't you say so?"
"Revenge is sweet, my son!"
"Let's hang the
Grand Duke of Abacco!"
"... He's the Grand Duke!"
"... I'll buy his life from you!"
"How much is it worth for you, honey?"
"A million francs... each, will it do?"
"Don't let her fool you! If she has that much money, let's take it from her!"
"Don't touch him! As true as I am the Grand Duchess Olga,
I tell you I'll take your lives if you take his!"
"Well, you'll see him hung!"
"My brother!"
"Are you the Grand Duke of Abacco?"
"Get the gallows ready now!"
"Will you tell me why?"
"A man who uses the letters of the woman who loves him as an exchange item, deserves hanging."
"You'll have to prove it first!"
"Will you be deceived by this ridiculous forgery of my handwriting?"
"If this letter is false, where is the real one?"
"Here!"
"Caught!"
"Get the ship's chaplain! Get him to arrange a wedding! A punishment must take place!"
"I must have something, I always pass out when someone gets married."
"A toast for your marriage to be as happy an operation as mine with Abacco's public debt has been!"
THE END
FULTAH FISHER'S
BOARDING HOUSE
That night, when through the mooring chains
The wide eyed corpse rolled free.
To blunder down by Garden Reach
And not at Kedgaree.
The tale the Huglali told the shoal
The lean shoal told to me.
It was Faltah Fisher's boarding house
Where sailor-men reside,
And there were men of all the ports
From Mississip to Clyde,
And regally they spat and smoked,
And fearsomely they lied...
And there was Hans the blue-eyed Dane,
Bull-throated, bare of arm,
Tho carried on his hairy chest
The maid Ultruda's charm...
The little silver crucifix
That keeps a man from harm.
And there was Jake
Without-the-Ears
And Pamba the Malay,
And Carboy Gin the Guinea cook,
And Luz from Vigo Bay.
And Honest Jack who sold them slops
And harvested their pay.
And there was Salem Hardieker
A lean Bostonian he...
Swiss, German, English,
Halfbreed, Finn,
Yank, Dane and Portuges,
At Fultah Fisher's boarding-house
They rested from the sea.
They told their tales of wreck and wrong.
Of shame and lust and fraud.
They backed their toughest statements with
The Brimstone of the Lord.
And crackling oaths went to and fro
Across the fist-banged board.
How Anne of Austria shared their drinks
Collinga knew her fame,
From Tarnau in Galicia
To Jaun Bazar she came.
To eat the bread of infamy
And take the wage of shame.
She held a dozen men to heel...
Rich spoil of war was hers,
In hose and gown and ring and chain,
From twenty mariners,
And, by Port Law, that week, men called
Her Salem Hardieker's.
But seaman learnt-what landsmen know...
That neither gifts nor gain
Can hold a winking Light O'Love.
Or Fancy's flight restrain,
When Anne of Austria rolled her eyes
On Hans the blue-eyed Dane.
But cold was
Hans the blue-eyed Dane.
Bull-throated bare of arm.
And laughter shook the chest beneath
The maid Ultruda's charm...
The little silver crucifix
That keeps a man from harm.
"You speak to Salem Hardieker,
You was his girl, I know
I ship mineselfs to-morrow, see,
Und round the Skaw we go,
South down the Cattegat, by Hjelm,
To Besser in Saro."
When love rejected turns to hate,
All ill betide the man.
"You speak to Salem Hardieker..."
She spoke as woman can.
A screa-a sob-
"He salled me-names!" and then the fray began.
An oath from Salem Hardieker.
A shriek upon the stairs,
Across the broken chairs.
A dance of shadows on the wall
A knife-thrust unawares...
And Hans came down, as cattle drop,
When Anne of Austria's trembling hands
The weary head fell low:...
I ship mineselfs to-morrow, straight
For Besser in Saro:
Und there Ultruda comes to me
At Faster, und I go.
"South down the Cattegat -
What's here?
There-are-no-lights-to-guide!"
The mutter ceased, the spirit passed,
And Anne of Austria cried
In Gultah Fisher's boarding-house
When Hans the mighty died.
Thus slew they
Hans the blue-eyed Dane,
Bull-throated, bare of arm.
But Anne of Austria looted first
The maid Ultruda's charm...
The little silver crucifix
That keeps a man from harm.
SHOW PEOPLE
To hopeful hundreds there is a golden spot in the map called...
HOLLYWOOD.
Golonel Pepper had motored all the way from Georgia to prove that his daughter, Peggy, was a grat actress.
It must be Hollywood.
I like this place, Peggy... even if it ain't Georgia.
It is John Gilbert!
I am General Marmaduke
Oldfish Pepper, of Georgia.
You ain't gonna blame me for that, are you?
I'd like to see the president of your company.
What about, General?
I'm going to let him put my daughter in the movies.
Casting office...
Mr. Oldfish.
I want to introduce my daughter,
Miss Peggy Pepper.
Got one a little more recent?
Got one a little more recent?
The idea is, can you act?
She will now present the various moods. The first will be meditation.
Passion.
Anger.
Sorrow.
Joy.
Very funny. Fill out this card.
There is many a slip between the casting office card and a menu card... especially when one's capital has dwindled to forty cents.
I'm Colonel Pepper of Georgia, Miss.
At first I thought you were
Gloria Swanson.
You big beezark! I gotta notion to knock yer block off
What an uncouth saint he is!
Billy Boone... a custard pie artist from the slapstick "lots". de esos de 'tartas en la cara',
As a Southern colonel your make-up is very
Indiana.
Father, who is this coarse person?
One has to come to
Hollywood to meet such common people.
Aw, boloney... and you're slicing it too thick.
Say, are you punks trying to crash into the movies?
My daughter, suh, is considering a few offers.
My acting is talk of Savannah.
My acting is the scandal of Hollywood.
Crashing the movies is no cinch... but I thing
I can help you.
What'll you have for dessert?
They've got the swellest cocoanut cake today.
Isn't he wonderful!
The Comet Studio, where serious comedians went through the daily grind though of "getting laughs".
Where's the dame you were going to bring out?
She'll be here, all right... you couldn't keep her away.
Gee, Dad... won't they be thrilled back home when they see me as a great dramatic actress?
Stage 4, Lot 5... turn to hour right as you enter the left wing and keep going.
Are you Mr. Comet?
If you don't say yes
I'll kill myself.
I'm Miss Pepper, the new actress.
Remember, Baby... you're not painting a bungalow.
You gotta fall harder... and funnier.
Can she act?
Go on, Baby... show him what they're talking about in Savannah.
Ah, my brave toreador!
In all Spain none is more skillful with the bull.
You have reduced to beggary, kidnapped my husband, and murdered my aged mother... but beware!
Don't go too far!
That's darn good hokum.
I shall always give my public best that's in me.
When I call just come in and show mid surprise, like this...
Remember, the one law of the pictures is, don't anticipate!
Now we'll rehearse it.
Is that all I do?
Until the jolt. Then just take it natural... don't anticipate!
Don't get camera-shy,
Baby, and you're a cinch.
I didn't think they made them that green!
Baby, you did that like a real trouper.
I came here to do drama.
Why didn't you tell me it was this?
Bat, Baby, all the stars have had to take it on the chin... Swanson,
Daniels, Lloyd... all of them.
Come on, Baby... you've gone this far... it'll be easy from now on.
She did that so nifty we'll take it again... in a close up.
Success in this game means work. Show them that you've got the stuff.
Just think of that first big thrill you'll get when you see yourself in a theatre.
I've backed you to win, Baby... show them I'm right.
You're great on water stuff... I'm gonna get you a lot of it.
Go ahead. I'll take it on the chin.
The preview... that trying ordeal when a new picture is tired out before
Mr. and Mrs. Audience.
Don't anticipate!
What's the matter, Baby?
Don't you know you're a wow?
That girl's got real personality.
I'll have Billy Boone bring her over tomorrow.
I can't keep it from you any longer...
I'm the director.
Come on. Let's get out front and hear what they have to say.
What do you want to see a punk drama for? Come on.
That's the kind acting
I'm gonna do some day.
That's real art!
Don't be sil. Make them laugh and you make them happy.
I tell you, Mr. Chaplin... that girl is a find.
Will you please sign my album?
I'm crazy about signatures.
Who is that little guy?
That guy is casting director for High
Arts Studio.
Bring me a nice big piece of custard pie.
Why, I'd be afraid I'd throw it at someone.
The thrill that seldom comes... a call to the
High Arts Studio!
Lew Cody and
Elinor Glyn.
She writes a lot of those IT stories.
I like Mr. Cody... he has such an open face.
Maybe Mr. Morton will only see you... and not me.
I Won't sign up unless he takes you, too.
You want Miss Pepper also, don't you?
I want Miss Pepper only.
I won't sign up unless he takes you, too,
Billy.
Oh, that's all right.
I can take it on the chin
Nothing for you now,
Billy. Maybe next year.
A contract from the "big studio" and the thought of leaving her old friends... brought to Peggy mingled emotions of gladness and sadness.
Goodbye, Jim... I'll always think kindly of you for giving me a chance.
I hate to see you go, Peggy... but I knew I'd make something of you.
I'm all through, Billy.
You mean you're just beginning.
It's going to be hard... working without you, Billy.
But we'll see a lot of each other, won't we?
Yes, but it Won't be the same.
It's all in game, Baby. I guess it's the crossroads... your path leads one way and mine another.
Then I won't go!
"You're going to be a big success, Baby... and I'm going to watch every step of your career.
At the High Arts Studio preliminary test were being made for Peggy's first drama.
That's Marion Davies.
Mr. Telfair, I want you to meet Miss Pepper, your new leading lady.
I understand you're quite popular also.
You're at the Countess De Fray's reception. Yoy look over there and see the man you hate...
Then you look over there and see the man you love.
The man you love!
The man you hate!
It is six months later. You have just received a letter that your lover is dying.
I know there's nothing written on it, but read it anyway.
Your lover is dying... suffer.
Give me tears!
Tears... please!
Would you please ask them to play "Heats and Flowers"?
Louder... and sadder!
Tears... tears... please, Miss Pepper, if you have any respect for me, give me tears!
That's no way to let a lover die!
Imagine your poor old father starving to death.
You don't know my father!
Can't you do something to bring tears?
Imagine forty thousand starving Armenians...
Now that we've got her going... no film in the camera!
Imagine you're very much in love with someone... you're at the crossroads of your lives...
Just once more... a big yelp!
That's what I call good commercial crying.
Stop crying!
Stop it, I say... we've got a big laughing scene to do!
Everybody go to lunch.
Now that you have graduated from cheap comedy, you must forget it...
You must acquire new personality... a superior manner... new friends...
I will be glad to introduce you to the elite of
Hollywood.
Confidentially, I am
Andre d'Bergerac, le
Comte d'Avignon...
And so plain Peggy Pepper acquired the manner of the "elite"... and became known as Patricia Pepoire...
My paper is SO anxious to have a true story of your past...
When I first came on a movie lot I thought a pie was...
Miss Pepoire is fatigued.
With her permission I will speak for her.
First, allow me to inform  you that
Miss Pepoire is a direct descendant of General Robert E. Lee.
This is going to make a splendid story.
Being a lady of quality, she chose the cinema as a medium of self-expression.
She has the temperament of Nazimova, the appeal of Garbo, the sweetness of Pickford, and the lure of Pola Negri!
Hold it! Hold it!
Don't move!
My being in the picture will help get it in the big magazines.
While Billy struggled on the same old way.
Let's have Peggy come over and have chow with us...
Peggy's too busy these days... I seldom get a chance to see her.
I'll bet if ask her she'll come.
Miss Pepoire won't be able to see you tonight. She has important business to them to.
We haven't seen each other for so long...
I was wondering if you'd come over and have dinner... like we used to?
I'm sorry, but I have another engagement.
You're not going out with your leading man, are you?
It's all part of work... won't you please try to understand?
Sure I understand. I'll see you some other time, eh?
No one realized Patricia
Pepoire's importance more than Peggy Pepper.
I'm terribly, terribly sorry if I kept you waiting.
Waiting is such sweet sorrow where you are concerned, dear lady.
Today we're going to do the kidnapping and rescue stuff.
Is it necessary that it be done so roughly?
...one thrust of his sword, and he takes you in his arms.
Ten thousand dollars or your life!
Another troupe on location.
Now we'll take it once more.
Better beat it... Miss
Pepoire's nerves ain't right today.
Miss Pepoire, will you please freshen your make-up?
...we're still making them, but the old troupe sure misses you.
Baby... it's a kick to see you doing so good.
Why, Peggy... surely success hasn't gone to the bean!
Of course not! Don't be absurd.
I knew you were only clowning.
Same old Peggy... anything for a laugh.
I wish you would please refrain from using slag.
Oh, for crying out loud!
Patricia, they are ready for the next scene.
Andre, this is Billy Boone...
I used to know him in the old days.
Why, Andy used to serve me spaghetti down at Tony's.
How can you be so insulting!
Gee, Baby, I'll bet you miss the laughs we used to have!
I never miss lowness, cheapness and vulgarity.
...but I suppose you'll always be the same... a cheap clown.
Would that I had the right to protect you... always.
Come on, Billy... forget the sob squad and jump off that rock.
Studio lunch... at the stars' table.
The boss wants you to come up to his office right away.
I'm having my luncheon.
He says you'll have lots of time for lunch after he gets though talking to you.
Pardon me, Doug... just another one of those boring conferences.
Read these... Miss
"Patricia Pepoire".
NEW ORLEANS SEPT 2 1928
CANCEL PATEICIA PEPOIRE FEATURES
AUDIENCE TIRED OF HER
DETROIT 2PM SEPT 1928
CANCEL BOOKING PATRICIA PEPOIRE
IN "THE LOVE HOUR"...
OUR AUDIENCRSDO NOT
LIKE HER WORK LATELY
FILADELFIA IOAM SEPT 4 1928
CANCEL PATRICIA PEPOIRE PICTURES
NOT WHAT SHE USED TO BE
What's it to me if a few theatres don't know art!
Sit down... Sarah Bernhardt!
"Pati Pepper, when I first signed you, you were human... regular... full of ambition...
You're not on the level with the public that made you... and from now on I want to see the real Peggy
Pepper in the screen.
I'll give you one last chance to change... and
I want your answer now.
If you'll pardon me,
Mr. Morton, I shall finish my luncheon.
These producers are so disturbing... to one's equilibrium.
They don't appreciate what a great artist you are.
You are so understanding!
SCREEN ROMANCE
Wedding oh Patricia Pepoire and Andre d'Bergerac, le Comte d'Avignon, to be solemnized today.
The wedding promises to be one of the most outstanding social events of the season and will be attended by many screen notables.
Just think, Patricia, you'll be a real countess.
It must be wonderful to be in love!
Sorry, but I can't admit you unless you have an invitation.
I must see her right away!
You tell her I've got to see her... and I don't mean maybe.
Pardon my depravity... but that terrible comedian person is downstairs.
You don't realize what you're doing!
I do not know what I'm doing, and I won't have you interfering in my affairs.
"You've ruined your career... just when you were becoming so successful.
...and now you're going to marry a man you don't care a rap for... just for a phoney title.
I'm not pleading for myself... it's for your own happiness.
Think a minute... remember the old days.
I don't want to remember the old days.
I'm going to bring you to your senses... now!
Don't worry... everything is quite all right.
You were right! I'm all you said I was... just a clumsy fool!
Look at yourself! Look at me! We're only fakes... just clowns!
He was the only real person... and now
I've lost him!
But, Patricia... our wedding!
There will be no wedding!
Don't talk to me...
Don't touch med!...
You... you... pie-face!!!
Peggy's trip "down to earth" had brought a clearer view of things worth while.
Peggy, I hope you were right in recommending this new leading man... but can he really act?
He's marvelous, Mr.
Vidor... and we work together so well.
Don't tell him I'm in the picture. Just start the scene...
I want to surprise him.
Mr. Vidor, I want to thank you for giving me this chance.
It's up to you, Billy... and don't let enlarge your hatband.
You boys have been separated from your outfit... and make for this village...
The camera's going... you can't quit now.
Take them on the chin... it's all in the game.
Buster Keaton in The Saphead
Directed by Herbert Blache
Written by June Mathis
"The New Henrietta" was a
Broadway play in which...
Douglas Fairbanks scored a major success in 1913.
It was first filmed with him
1915 under the name THE LAMB.
When it was to be remade by Metro in 1920,...
Fairbanks himself suggested Buster Keaton for his former role.
Keaton was then under an exclusive contract with...
Joseph M. Schenck who agreed to loan him to Metro.
It was Keaton's first appearance in a feature-length film.
THE SAPHEAD'S great success earned Keaton star billings in his subsequent films.
A little street where money is everything- and everything is money.
Nicholas Van Alstyne- known, loved, and feared as "The Old Nick of The Street."
Old Nick's very private secretary -- "Mr. Musgrave."
"You tell him that Jim Hardy from Arizona is here."
"I used to pal with this old boy out west."
"What the blazes brought you east, Jim?"
"The Henrietta mine -- she's the all-fired biggest proposition I ever seen."
"Jim, you know more about a mine than anybody on earth -- except me --"
"I want a broker -- send for Watson Flint."
"If you say the Henrietta is that big -- watch me gamble on her!"
Mark Turner had succeeded in marrying Old Nick's daughter -
- but had never succeeded at anything else.
MARK TURNER
BROKER
His morning mail as usual was all bills and no business.
"There's a girl outside that wants to see you personal."
I am destitute and very ill. I must see you. Henrietta Reynolds
"Your wife's outside, sir."
"Go back and tell her she'll hear from me in a day or two."
"I came to invite you to lunch."
"I'm afraid you'd find me rotten company."
"I work like a dog, Rose -- but I don't get anywhere."
"Your father's commissions are worth a fortune to a broker -
- but he never gives me an order."
"I'll have a talk with Dad about you
-- when he gets home this afternoon."
Old Nick's castle.
Bertie Van Alstyne, Esquire, his father's hope and pride, breakfasts early -- in the afternoon.
"I want to talk to you about the way you treat Mark."
I am destitute and very ill. I must see you. Henrietta Reynolds
"You keep away -- I'll see her, and try to get your letters back."
"If you'll stop talking I'll see what I can do for your Mark."
Bertie had been in love for years and decided something must be done about it.
Nick's ward, Agnes, was the girl
Bertie loved. He had confided this -
- to his sister and his valet -- but had never mentioned it to her.
"Agnes has telegraphed that she's coming home from school today."
"Don't get excited ---- you'll have plenty of time to meet her ---
- the train doesn't arrive until 6:30."
"What's happened to you lately?
Getting home at daylight -
- and having a picture of Henrietta, the dancer, in your room--"
"I am leading a fast life because
I am in love with Agnes."
How to win the modern girl by Judith Blakely
How to win the modern girl. THE Modern Girl has no use for the old-fashioned man. She prefers -
- sports to saints. Few girls now-a-days can resist a dashing, gambling, drinking devil.
Agnes was to arrive at the Grand Central -
- so Bertie went to meet her at the Pennsylvania.
Six-thirty at the Grand Central.
Agnes was an orphan -- whom Nick has brought up as his own child.
"Nobody met me."
"The saphead! I suppose he forgot all about you."
"Ask Hutchins to let me know as soon as Mr. Bertie comes in."
"Mr. Bertie is never home before three in the morning, Miss."
"I was waiting for someone
-- but she didn't come."
Trash
The Gay White Way failing to cheer Bertie - his friends try the side streets.
"I'm having rotten luck -- lend me a couple of thousand."
"Are those things worth two thousand dollars?"
"What are they made of?"
"I'm awfully tired of this -- would you mind very much if I stop?"
"Your winnings, Mr. V.
-- thirty-eight thousand."
"Are you quite sure you can spare it?"
Bertie sees a chance to get a real reputation as a sport --
"Will you see to arresting me, please?"
Morning
RAID ON GAMBLING PALACE.
SON OF NICHOLAS VAN ALSTYNE
AMONG THOSE PRESENT.
Young Men of Prominent Families
Given Free Ride to Police Station.
"But they might come and take him to jail!"
"Is it true you were in that dreadful place?"
"I was there because I love Agnes."
"If you love Agnes, why didn't you meet her?"
"I did -- but she didn't come."
"Bertie -- you've changed somehow."
"I heard you tell Rose that you loved me -- and I love you, too."
"I've tricked you into loving me -- when you know the truth -
- I'm afraid you won't care for me any more."
"Tell me --"
"I'm good!"
"I've tried my best to get over it -- but I can't -- and I still kneel down -
- and say my prayers every morning -- before I go to bed."
"Bertie, who is Henrietta?"
"I bought her picture- but I never met her."
"Agnes, you'd better go."
"You've got to get out and shift for yourself --
- this is the last check you'll get from me!"
Bankers Trust Company
10,000 $   -  Nicholas Van Alstyne
"How can you be so cruel!
I love Bertie, whether you do or not, and I'm going to be his wife!"
"If you've had the impertinence to ask Agnes to marry you--"
"-- I suppose I've got to give you a little more."
Bankers Trust Company
"Not another cent!"
"Not another word about marrying
Agnes until you go to work ----
- and make something of yourself!"
Poor Bertie-- cut off with a million -- moved into humble quarters at the Ritz.
Watson Flint -- Nick's broker, and a friend of the family.
"I've got to go into business like you and Mark Turner."
Dearest Agnes, you wanted me to go into business so I have gone.
"I bought a seat on the Stock Exchange for a hundred thousand dollars."
"A hundred thousand dollars for a seat?"
"Well, furniture is way up now-a-days."
"I want to show you an engagement ring."
"You asked me to look after it, sir."
"If father won't let us marry, perhaps you'll keep it to remember me by."
"No matter what Uncle Nick says, I'll marry you whenever you want me --"
"We can't now, Bertie -- we must make arrangements first --
- let's say next Tuesday!"
"Leon, we're to be married secretly Tuesday evening --
- please make all the arrangements."
"It would be a wonderful surprise for her --
- if we could only get it ready in time."
"We must!"
You can never be sure a woman will be on time -- even for her wedding.
"I'm going to marry Bertie tonight."
"But, Agnes -- you mustn't run away
-- we'll have the wedding here!"
"Get out one of her little white dresses
-- and she can wear my wedding veil."
"I'll manage father, and send for the Reverend Murray Hilton."
"I took you into business because Rose wanted me to -
- and you're making good!"
"I've given you power of attorney because
I'm going on a cruise Wednesday -
- and you'll be in charge while I'm away."
"Bertie and Agnes are going to be married tonight --"
"Perhaps they've locked her up."
"All right -- let 'em be married in here
-- or down cellar -- or on the roof --"
"-- but I won't see them."
"I have called for Agnes."
"I'm through with you --"
"-- and as for Agnes, she has disobeyed me --"
"Now ask Bertie to forgive you."
"We're going to be married here!"
For the Minister
"Anything else?"
"I'll put one in every pocket -- then when the minister asks me -- there you are!"
Henrietta Reynolds
518 S. Vine St, Omaha, Nebraska
"If I die -- promise me you'll put these into Mrs. Turner's hands."
"I want Mrs. Turner!"
"Henrietta is dead -- and I gave her my sacred word I'd put these into your hands."
A dying mother appeals to you -
Have mercy on my little one. -
- The letters from her father which I send with this will tell you the rest.
Henrietta Reynolds
"I'm sorry this blow has come, Rose
-- I've tried to keep it from you --"
"Bertie, these belong to you
---- they're from Henrietta."
Bertie's valet had planned a great surprise for the bridal couple.
Tortured by thoughts of Agnes
-- Bertie hopes a visit to -
- the Stock Exchange may help him to forget.
"This is a new member
-- Mr. Van Alstyne."
"Mr. Turner wants to see you at
Van Alstyne's office right away."
"Do all these seats cost a hundred thousand dollars?"
HE'S NEW
MAKE HIM WELCOME
Knowing that the truth about Henrietta
Reynolds must soon come to light,
Mark has induced Nick to go on his yachting trip as planned.
With Nick out of the way, Mark sees a chance to clean up a fortune -
- before his relations with Henrietta
Reynolds are discovered.
"Mr. Van Alstyne notified you that I would be in -
- complete authority here during his absence -- ?"
"I want you to sell 'Henrietta
Mine' until you have -
- knocked the price down fifty points!"
"I can't accept a commission of that size without security."
"Great heavens, Turner! -- these securities belong to your father-in-law!"
"While he is away they are mine."
Bertie's introduction to the Floor grows more and more informal.
"All they do here is knock off hats -- but I enjoy it -- it occupies the mind."
"I'm going out to get some new ones so I can play it again."
The raid on Henrietta.
"They've started a raid on 'Henrietta'
-- you ought to be on the Floor!"
"When I want your advice
I'll send for you!"
"Mr. Tildon of the National City is here."
BIG SLUMP IN HENRIETTA MINING STOCK
"Mr. Van Alstyne won't return for a week
-- and Mr. Turner is in charge."
"Tell Turner if we don't receive collateral by three o'clock we'll be forced to -
- throw Van Alstyne's holdings on the market!"
"Thank God you've come, sir!"
"Thank God!
I was seasick--"
...PA           ...HEN               ...INP
"Call up Mr. Tildon -- and send to the Stock Exchange for Mark Turner!"
"Mr. Turner hasn't been on the Floor today!"
"Mark Turner is responsible for this raid, sir."
"Because he's a cheat -
I found out he was responsible for -
- that Henrietta girl, and put the blame on Mr. Bertie-"
"I'm sorry to hurry you -- but it's two-thirty, and your securities must be in the bank before the market closes."
"It's almost three o'clock.
There's nothing on earth I can do."
"You're too late. Flint's on the Floor now, knocking the last breath out of -
- the 'Henrietta' -- and I can buy your holdings for next to nothing!"
"Get the police!"
"All the police in the world can't prevent your losing control of the Henrietta Mine -
- when the gong rings in the
Stock Exchange!"
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA!
-HENRIETTA!!
-HENRIETTA!!
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
"Sir, you're insulting me!-- and I demand that you stop yelling that woman's name!"
HENRIETTA!
HENRIETTA
"They're all yelling that woman's name at me --
- and I can't make them stop!"
"Bertie, listen! -- I'll tell you something that will stop them!"
"Every time you hear a man yelling 'Henrietta' -
- you grab him and say -- 'I TAKE IT'!"
It seems to Bertie that the whole Stock Exchange -
- is taunting him by yelling
Henrietta's name.
"She's up forty points and going like a rocket!"
Van Alstyne's Henrietta Pounded to a Pulp
...HEN                                   LAST
"I've been saved, Flint!
-- saved by a miracle!"
"It was no miracle -- it was Bertie!
He's the latest member of -
- the Stock Exchange!"
"He's bought a cottage on Long Island
-- this is his address."
"I have been on the Floor of the Stock Exchange."
"Why, my boy -- you've saved 'Henrietta'!"
"I mean the Henrietta mine! Now get dressed, because I've sent for
Agnes and the minister."
THE END
Subtitle By : Reza Fa
The Cinders resince in Roseville... where the first bowl of wax banabas appeared on an Am;erican sideboard.
Ella Cinders, the stepdaughter slaves for the entire family.
Ella's father waw the secont husband
Ma Cinders had talked to death.
I'm sorry Mam...
You told me to clean the furnace.
Ma's first husband had been Alonzo Pill, author of "Follow the Swallow"... and Prissie Pill.
Lotta Pill... Always anxious to look her best and the best is none too good.
Hurry up and fix my breakfast.
Waite Lifter, Ella's best friend and champion.
AFTER ONE RUB
YOU'LL NEVER KNOW YOUR BABY
You're shiftless, lazy... like your father was til the day he died.
I was a fool to marry him!
It's a darned shame... the way they treat you.
Every second Thursday, the
Pollyanna Club met at the Cinders' home... and cheated one another at cards.
Are You an Actress? Gem Film Company offers
Expenses to HOLLYWOOD
AND CHANCE TI STAR
Send Your Photo to the Mayor AND
APPEAR IN PERSON AT
THE MOVIE CONTEST BALL
Who could represent Roseville in Hollywood like Lotta?
The Art of MOTION PICTURE Acting.
As Explained by Hollywood's
Greatest Directors and Stars
In that contest lay way out...
Ella decided it was time to act... and to act she must get that book.
EYES: The greatest requisite to stardom is the eyes. Master the art of expressing every emotion with the eyes. The following pages contain eye exercises.
FLIRTATIOUS
LOVE
CROSS-EYED
Cross Eyes... or ability to make the eyes appear crossed have brought great fortunes to certain moving picture actors.
Those photos for the contest cost three dollars... so for three evening
Ella minded the neighbors' kids... at one dollar per mind.
When Ella got into her best clothes for the photographer, six moths laughed until they died.
I'm sorry, sir...
You'll be sure to get my photo to the judges on time?
The Night of the Ball.
Ma Cinders and the two Pills were going. So were
Ella's last font hopes.
They wouldn't let me go to the Ball.
Well, Ella, I'll take you.
I'm sorry... I... I haven't anything to wear.
Nonsense! Wear one of their dresses!
Later... at the ball given to pick the winner of the contest.
Now will all the pretty girls just leave all the nice boys... and line up pretty here by the platform...
Oh, dear me... yes...
Miss Lotta... one of the Pills...
By morning, Ella had decided to try for a fresh start... under a new roof.
TUCKER'S
EMPLOYMENT AGENCY
I can place you right away... with the loveliest, sweetest woman in town...
I'll teach you not to run away.
You put her up to that funny business at the Ball last night.
Your daughter has won the Contest, Mrs. Cinders.
Lotta! Lotta!
She's not the one.
But Prissie wasn't in the Contest.
I have no other daughter.
Ella! Ella!
Miss Cinders, I am pleased to announce that you are the winner of our Movie Contest.
Enclosed please find the cash prize and your ticket to Hollywood.
Now, Miss Cinders...
I suggest a speech...
I'm sorry... but I'm so happy!
Do you mean to say this won the prize?
Beauty means nothing. We firemen see the best-looking woman at their worst. The movies needs and funnier faces.
You're a lot of cheaters... cheaters... cheaters!
Why, you old Eaglebeak... you tried to vamp me all over the place... so Lotta could win!
They're making fun of me...
Not everyone can make people laugh, Ella.
It's a great thing... making people happy.
Outfitted by Roseville merchants... all ready for Hollywood...
Ella was willing to let bygones be has-beens.
I came in to say goodbye, Ma.
A crowd gathered at the station to bit Ella "bon ami". But were, oh where, was Ella?
You've been so wonderful to me, Waite...
I'll never forget you...
I'm sorry, sir... that I'm late...
FELLOW CITIZENS OF ROSEVILLE, WE ARE GATHERED
TOGETHER THIS DAY IN HONOR OF MISS ELLA
CINDERS, WHOSE GOOD FORTUNE IT HAS BEEN TO
WIN THE BEAUTY CONTEST HELD IN OUR FAIR CITY
MISS CINDERS HAS KNOWN NOTHING BUT THE
BEAUTIFUL THINGS IN LIFE, SHE HAS BEEN
CHERISHED AS A FRAGILE FLOWER BY HER LOVED
ONES AND WE HOPE THE STEM WON'T BREAK BEFORE
After the state of Colorado, came the State of Amazement.
Ella never expected to have a whole car to herself.
She spent the second day dreaming of Hollywood.
Hollywood, the knicker district of
Los Angeles, seat of the bosom heaving industry of America.
I'm Ella Cinders, the beauty contest winner.
I'll keep your secret...
Resolute to follow the roof to
Fame and never count the cost, Ella taxied to the studio.
Gem Film Company.
NOW WORKING IN EGYPT
I'm Ella Cinders, the Roseville
Contest winner.
You poor child. That contest was run by a couple of sharpers.
They've been arrested.
Maybe you'd be better off back home...
I... I can't go back.
The whole town would laugh at me.
For days, Ella haunted studio gates... eating less than an ant at an
Armenian picnic... but still game.
GENERAL MANAGER
PLEASE KNOCK
I'm Ella Cinders, the beauty contest winner. I'd like a job, please.
They're after me, too!
Is that girl ready for this scene?
We're all set... I've told her just what to do.
Help... please... a lion...
No... no... it's your baby that's burning up...
I'm sorry, sir... but it's a lion...
She's been trying to crash the gate all day.
She's working in this picture.
I've never worked in pictures...
I just sneaked into the studio...
I'm Ella Cinders, the Roseville
Contest winner.
Well, you win the red apple. You can radio
Roseville that you'll be in my next picture.
An Iceman's Home...
Local Ice Man is Son of wealth
Roseville Agog With News
That Waite Lifter is College
Football Hero, and Rich
Ella Cinders Romance Prospers.
Waite Lifter, who for the past three months was employed in Roseville as an iceman has been identified... as George Waite, University of Illinois football hero and son of wealthy business
Dad, I'm leaving for Hollywood tomorrow..
First you disgrace me by turning iceman and now you've fallen head over heels in love with a nobody!
She's read that story in the papers... and she's out to trick you and trim me. Tell her you're broke... and see how she acts.
You're all wrong about her, Dad.
Anyway, I'm going to Hollywood.
But Tragedy continued to haunt poor Ella...
Great work, Miss Cinders...
We've decided to give you a long term contract.
When the news reached Roseville...
Well, it takes firemen to pick them...
Ella sure is making Roseville more than a fly spot any map.
OUR ELLA MAKES GOOD IN HOLLYWOOD
Ella Cinders on Her Way to fame Puts
Roseville on World's Map
FILM TO SHOW IN ROSEVILLE
ELLA CINDERS IN:
From Poverty To Riches
GRANADA THEATRE
NO ADVANCE IN PRICES
The scenes for Ella's next picture were "shot" far from the studio... but Ella was quite "at home" in her part.
You said that train didn't stop here!
Why didn't you let me know you were in want?
Miss Ella Cinders - Hollywood
Arrive Tomorrow - Something very important to ask you
Waite.
I'm sorry... you see, I'm dressed for a part in a picture...
Get new star to do your scrubbing... we're going to get married.
And later on, a new iceman came to Hollywood.
MASTER OF THE HOUSE
This is the story of a spoilt husband... a type that is extinct in the country, but exists abroad.
And it is the story also a heroine... not the brilliant, beautifully gowned... and shingled heroine of the film play-- but just and ordinary wife and mother... whose life is compassed by the four walls of her suburban home.
6.30 AM.
And because Mary Allmen faced the sacrifices, the heavy tasks, the drab monotony so cheerfully,
John her husband, had come to take everything for granted.
''I'l light the fire, Kathleen - you mustn't spoil your hands.''
''Where are my slippers?''
- This was going to be one of his bad days.
''Get the breakfast tray ready for father.''
''Hurry up, mother -
Dad's getting up.''
''Mother, will you hear my tables?''
''How many times I've asked you to let me have my coffee first!''
''I'll try and squeeze enough out of the housekeeping money to get your other pair back from the menders, dear.''
''No spoons!''
''Bread and scrapel!''
''Oh, so you weren't short of butter?''
''Those wretched birds!''
''Oh, never mind now!''
''Has my coat been brushed?''
''There's a little of yesterday's joint left for lunch... will you have it hot or cold, dear?''
''Cold!''
''Oh, heavens, are we going to have you here again to-day?''
''Nana'' Marsh, who had nursed John as a baby, and who now lent an occasional helping hand in the little home.
''I can't do anything with this stocking of Dick's.''
''Look! They'll make Kathleen a fine pair of mittens.''
''What are nine eights?''
''Seventy-two.''
''Baby's awake.''
''Look... there's Nana!''
''Each day brought its allotted tasks; each morning was a struggle against time, in order to be ready for father.''
''It's no use unless you pull... hard!''
''Tell Dick to run and get a pound of cooking apples.
Father loves them baked.''
''That's too heavy for you, dear.
Run and get me some potatoes instead.''
''Kathleen haven't I told you not to do the vegetables?
You'll simply ruin your hands.''
''Whatever has become of Dick?''
''Buck up, Dick... father will be here soon.''
''No wonder you've never got a decent pair of shoes to your feet!
Do you think
I'm made of money?''
''I can hear John outside... grambling as usual!''
''Go and serve the porridge, so as not to keep father waiting.''
''Nana, dear, don't say anything... for my sake!''
''I'll teach you, you young scoundrel!
You'll stand in th corner instead of having any lunch!''
''Why can't you keep an eye on the boy?
You've nothing else to do all day!''
''For goodness sake, keep that brat quiet!''
''The dozens of times I've said
I won't have clothes drying in here!''
''Can't the boy change his wet stockings first?
He might catch cold.''
''Let him catch cold.
Perhaps it'll teach him a lesson.''
''Hands behind your back!''
''I said good afternoon,
Your Highness!''
''This stuff is full of lumps.''
''Why does nobody hear that kettle except me?''
''Are we never to have a meal without you jumping up and down the whole time?''
''Go and put the water on for the coffee, dear.''
''Cold meat again!''
''Three apples between five people!''
''I'm not going to stand by and see you treated like this any longer...''
''I'm going to feth your mother!''
''BRUTE!''
''I'm so glad I've met you,
Mrs. Nelson... I was just on my way to fetch you.''
''If it were only a question of money I could help, but it's just his selfishness that is doing the mischief.''
''In spite of everything,
I'm certain they're still fond of one another.
Let us two old women see if we can't put matters right.''
''Why aren't you more careful?''
''Your mother brought them, did she? I hate this
Lady Bountiful treatment.''
''When you were a schoolboy
I gave you a trashing that I expect you have remember to this day.''
''It did you a lot of good.''
''If your mother and that old harridan are not out of this house... by the time I come back.
I'll clear out for good.
You can choose between us.''
''Well, I've done my part; now it's your turn.
You must get her to leave here before he comes back.''
''Get a porridge plate.''
''My dear, this state of things cannot go on any longer... even you must admin that.''
''I expect I'm partly to blame...
I must try to manage better.''
''John's the only one to blame, my dear - he's wearing you out, body and soul.''
''You all say that John is bad...''
''But he's not... he's not!''
''Since he lost his business he's had a hard struggle... to keep us going, and it's made him irritable.''
''But I shared the good years with him... and I couldn't have had a better husband.
I've got to be patient with him now.''
''Sonny, hadn't mother better hear your home lessons for tomorrow?''
''From page thirty-six, down to the paragraph marked with a cross.''
''...and he ruled over his House wisely and well...
...but gradually he became...
...a fierce tyrant and those who had once loved him...
...now went in hourly fear of him..."
''What's a tyrant, mum?''
''My girl, don't you realise that you are on the verge of a serious break-down?''
''You must leave all this and get away for a complete rest...
John will appreciate you all the more when you come back.''
''But who is to look after my home and kiddies?''
''Will you do it, Nana?''
''Promise me that you won't be hard and cruel to John.''
''Cruel - no! Hard? - well that depends - on John!''
''Go and fetch a cab, Dick.''
''I've saved these few shillings to get little extras for John... but don't let him know they're from me.''
''Let him catch cold.
Perhaps it'll teach him a lesson.''
''It's your bath night, Dick.
Bring the big tub in...
I'll get it ready for you.''
Later.
''Good evening, dear.''
''Yes, those are mine.''
''Where is Mary?''
''Gone away!''
''Your wife is seriously ill.
She's gone away for a complete rest.''
''A very ingenious idea!''
''I suppose you meddling old women... have made Mary think
I illtreat her?''
''And I'm to be frightened into rushing up to my mother-in-law's... to beg forgiveness for things
I haven't done?''
''Well, your plan won't work!
Mary will be the one to apologise not I!''
''We must economise now...
I'm not the good manager your wife is.''
''It's no use trying to show off with me, young man... and I'll ask you to be a little more polite.''
''I'm mistress here now!
Do you understand?''
''Take that kettle off!''
''Do it yourself!''
''That just proves you're a fool, John.
Now you'll have to pay to have 'em washed all over again.''
''I'm not going to have you here.
Take your rubbish and clear out!''
''Daddy!''
''FATHER!''
''Brute!''
''Where is your mother?''
''I don't know... Granny's taken her away because she's ill.''
''You've made mother ill, and if she dies, it'll be
your fault!''
''Mummy made me promise
I wouldn't tell you... but I think you ought to know...''
''For months she's been sitting up at night sewing... so as to be able to buy you little extras with the money she earned.''
''Daddy! What are you going to do?''
''I'm going to Granny's... to fetch mother.''
''Yes, dear, it hurts us to punish those we love... but for your mother's sake, we must make... your father really repentant.''
''At her mother's house
Mary had at last succumbed... to the weariness of mind and body which her gallant spirits... had defied so long.''
''Your daughter's only chance is to get away into the country, somewhere she can get a complete rest.''
''And, of course, she must not be worried with any domestic affairs.''
''Dear, for your own sake, promise me not to let John know where you are.''
This is a plan case of a woman over-working... and half-starving herself for the sake of her family.
Only complete isolation and rest will restore her to health.
''Take my advice... go home and wait patiently... until my treatment and the country air have done their work.''
''It was a very humbled
John who returned home...
He had seen himself through the eyes of others... and the picture was not pleasant.''
''Good-night, Nana.''
''In the space of one short month, thirty years seemed to have rolled back... and John was one more a small boy... terrified of his nurses wrath...''
''It's takem you a long time to stir yourself.''
''Take the bird's glass with you.''
''What on earth have you been doing all this time?''
''Put this lamp oil away.''
''There is a Mrs. Higgins outside.''
''Oh, it's the washerwoman.
Ask her in.''
''Did you imagine I was going to slave at a wash-tub... to save you a few shillings?''
''Take this bucket down please.''
''Pretty Dick... tweet...''
''You do like the birds really daddy don't you!''
''Come and sit here by me, Kathleen.''
''Don't you wish mother were back with us?''
''Haven't you any idea when she will be home?''
''Nana says she won't let mother come home until you've... stood in the corner!''
''Kathleen, fetch a tea spoon.''
''Do you know what I've been thinking of buying for you?
A bicycle... as soon as I can spare the instalment.''
''If I buy it for you will you tell me where mother is?''
My dear Nana,
I am pleased to say... that I am feeling almost well again in spite of the way in which I miss...
John and the children,
I feel happeir than
I have ever done.
''Much as Nana enjoyed her victory over the fallen tyrant... she often secretly pitied him.''
''Here are a fes goodies, John... you know my old habit.''
''Mother, you must tell me where Mary is...
I can't stand this uncertainly any longer!''
''I've been utterly miserable since she's been away...
I can't go on without her.''
''Is that so?''
''You've changed John.
A month ago you would not have admitted that!''
''What fools we men are!''
''Just because we bring home the wages, we imagine we do all the work, whereas...''
''Whereas your wives do three times the works... and get no wages but grunts or black looks!''
''I swear I'll turn over a new leaf... if only Mary will give me another chance.''
''You must try to arrange things with Nana... you know her terms.''
''Take the opportunity while I'm out in the kitchen.''
''Nana, I want to talk to you about something.''
''You're... er... losing a hairpin.''
''John. I want to talk to you about something.''
''Your... er... tie isn't straight.''
I've found out where Mother is.
But I am not going to tell.
''Have you taken leave of your senses?''
''Attend to the stove.''
I no longer feel lonely now that I have Peter... who seems to think that
I am the most wonderful woman in the world.
Yours sincerely Mary.
''Do shut that stove!''
''Who is Peter?''
''Seems to be a man.''
''That's enough!
Now I want to talk!''
SIT DOWN!!!
''You men are all alike!''
''Arrogant.''
''Selfish.''
''And stupid.''
''When first you marry, your wife is an angel... you want to kneel at her feet and worship her...''
''But later on, when she really deserves your homage... you treat her like a galley slave!''
''Will you admit that you deserve a good thrashing?''
''Well. I'll let you off that but if you want to know where Mary is... you've got to do as I said... stand in the corner!''
''Hands behind your back!''
''Ssssh!''
''John, my dear!''
''Dick, come up quickly... mother's home!''
''Who is Peter?''
''It has been a pretty severe lesson, dear, but it has made me realise... all that you mean to me.''
''But my teeth are nice and clean, mother!''
''You're not going to be rude about my
''tuck box'' any more... are you John?''
OPTICIAN'S SHOP
A fine optician's shop situated in a provincial town... is immediately for sale.
10.000,- Kroner cash.
Write box 4327.
''And here is the money in cheque so that you can take over the shop!''
''Are you two love birds going to stay there all night?
The coffee's getting cold!''
''And the wise old clock seemed to tick:
''Mary's back - at's all right,
Mary's back - at's all right''... ''
THE END
BY ROCKET TO THE MOON
("WOMAN IN THE MOON")
This film is the result of collaboration by:
And the cast:
Scenario:
Thea von Harbou
Direction:
Fritz Lang
Photography:
Cast:
Prof. Georg Manfeldt:
Klaus Pohl
Wolf Helius:
Willy Fritsch
Engineer Hans Windegger
Gustav von Wangenheim
Astro Student Friede Velten:
Gerda Maurus
Gustav:
Gustl Stark-Gstettenbaur
The man who presently goes by
Walter Turner: Fritz Rasp
Five brains and chequebooks:
The man at the microphone:
Karl Platen
The mouse:
Josephine
Artistic collaborators:
Scientific collaborator:
Prof. Hermann Oberth
Head of production:
Eduard Kubat
The novel Woman In the Moon by Thea von Harbou is published by
August Scherl
For the human mind, there is no Never, - only a Not Yet.
Georg Manfeldt, Ph.D.
Professor of Astronomy
You should have let that skunk break his neck, Helius -!
For thirty years I live like a dog for the sake of my ideas - and then comes this louse-fellow speculating on my misery, and wants to buy my manuscript from me as a curiosity -!
I'd like to have dinner with you,
Professor - can you spare some bread?
I found this in my coat when you left the other day - buy yourself some bread with it, Mr. Helius -!
Spare me having to take handouts from my only friend, Helius...
If you don't join me, Professor,
I won't be able to enjoy it!
FOOL OR SWINDLER?
Thursday, 17 August, 1896
Hypothetical Account
of the Gold Content
In the Mountains
of the Moon
I maintain, after many years of comparative analyses, that primitive moon-rock contains more gold than the earth's mountains.
One day, the first spaceship will fly to the moon, to bring its gold back to the earth!
Laughter, gentlemen, is the argument of idiots against every new idea -!!
The progress of the world will not fail due to learned ignoramuses lacking in fantasy whose brains work in inverse proportion to their calcification -!!!
Professor - I've decided to go...
But not without me, Helius - not without me -!!
Now your idea will triumph after all, Professor...
Naturally Windegger will go along?
What -? Windegger won't -? Your collaborator and best friend?
Friede Velten, student of astronomy, and Hans Windegger, Chief Engineer of Helius Hangars are engaged.
Dear Friede!
Best wishes to you and Hans!
Don't be upset that I can't come tonight to your engagement party!
Please accept the flowers as a substitute.
Yours, Wolf Helius.
He doesn't even know anything about my decision - no-one does - except for you...
I tell you, Helius, more people than you and I know of your plan -
- and the fellow whom I threw down the stairs before is one of them -!
Three nights ago -
So you think someone knows of my plans and is thus also interested in your moon-gold theory?
Helius, don't be angry - it's my life's work - go home -
I can't rest until I know the manuscript is in your safe!
Dear Helius! I write to you in incomparable bliss and you should be the first to know that Friede has agreed to be my wife.
Perhaps I took her a bit by surprise, but she said yes!
Come tonight to the engagement party at Friede's apartment!
I am ridiculously happy!
Windegger
Fresh violets, sir?
Wolf Helius, Bergstr. 86-3
To be delivered in person
Mr. Helius isn't home...
Please... let me wait for Mr. Helius anyway. Mr. Windegger sent me...
To be delivered In person
Dear Helius! Accept this poor soul, if you can, and give him work and a chance to make a life - he won't disappoint you.
Warmest regards,
Windegger
Drive to the nearest police station - don't hold things up with long explanations - just bring some sort of officer here to me!
MINGO:
NICK CARTER OF THE SKY
Saturn-Pirates
The thieves' craft approaches
unlucky Saturn!
God in Heaven: You must have some idea when you last phoned -!
Did you leave the flat unattended -?
Only for a moment, when
Gustav came to get me... but then there was that man whom Mr. Windegger had sent -!
Would you allow me to use your telephone?
My phone isn't working...
Christ, madame - someone has to pick up - there's at least half a dozen people sitting around that phone -!
I'm only the foreman of Helius Hangars - but if you keep working like this, you, Miss Friede, will soon be the forewoman of us all!
I was supposed to have sent you somebody with a letter of recommendation -?!
I'm begging you, Hans, get over here...
I can't tell you over the telephone what this is all about... just, please, come...
You can be assured, Hans, that I would not call you away from your engagement party if it weren't absolutely necessary...
We'll be there right away,
Helius!
Allow me to introduce myself -:
Turner...
If you go flying down those steps again, Mr. Turner,
I won't be standing at the bottom to catch you...
Believe me, Mr. Helius, there's no wiser way to pass the time till the arrival of Ms. Velten and Mr. Windegger than to have a chat with me...
First, a small request... tell your chauffeur it's no longer necessary to inform the police...
The police have already been informed, Mr. Turner...
Just a measure of caution,
Mr. Helius, - as well as this...
Also a measure of caution,
Mr. Turner?
I now grasp the phenomenon,
Mr. Turner, how you haven't been whiling away in prison all this time -!
You do flatter,
Mr. Helius!
Perhaps you can also reveal to me, Mr. Turner, where the stolen manuscript - and the contents missing from my safe are located -?!
Five of the wealthiest and cleverest minds who wish to keep the earth's gold-reserve under their control -
One of the most interesting documents, madame and sirs...
To prove the accessibility of the moon,
Helius sent the unmanned trial-rocket H. 23 filled with magnesium, moonward - the explosion of which, upon impact, was viewed and photographed from the earth!
Thanks to the competence of our representative
I can show you something completely different - things that Helius himself has thus far not made available to the scientific community.
Cinematographic images of the surface of the moon by H. 32 during its first orbit of the moon.
The unmanned register-rocket H.32, equipped with automatic imaging-instruments.
The rocket-jet.
In its nose-cone...
...is located the egg-shaped register-chamber with the automated imaging-instruments.
The imaging-instrument, linked to a clockwork.
The mirror tele-objective.
Schematic depiction of the H.32's trajectory.
Gravitational Field
of the Moon
Zero-G Zone
Trajectory of H.32
Necessary starting speed
11,200 metres per second
First image of the moon,
36 hours after liftoff:
Distance of the rocket from the moon: Approx. 40,000 km.
At an altitude of approx. 1000 km
H.32 flies over the moon-crater Eratosthenes -
- in its depths the astronomer
W. H. Pickering, director of Mandeville
Observatory, Jamaica, believes to have observed swarms of insects.
The objective's eye sees what no man's eye has ever seen:
The opposite side of the moon turned away from the earth.
Cryptic, monochrome planes of colossal dimensions -
Vegetation? Fog?
Water? -
- all seem to confirm the theory of Prof. Peter Andreas Hansen
- of the Seeberg Observatory near Gotha - that on the opposite side of the moon exists an atmosphere and, therefore, life.
Why lose more time?
I for one want the moon's riches of gold, should they actually prove to exist, to fall into the hands of businessmen and not visionaries and idealists!
At this moment our representative is making
Mr. Helius aware of our intentions in a very concrete manner...
You have only two choices,
Mr. Helius:
Either make the trip to the moon in our employ -
- or not at all...
If we don't come to an agreement, Mr. Helius, five minutes after my departure, your hangar, along with the nearly completed spaceship, will be reduced to a heap of rubble...
What would you gain, by killing me off, Mr. Helius? - at the most, a travel companion who is less considerate!
You still don't get the picture, Mr. Helius... we'd rather annihilate all of your plans than let you shut us out of the operation...
Tell your clients,
Mr. Turner, that I do not aim to found upon the moon a criminal-colony...
Give me 24 hours to think it over...
Will your... plans be seriously affected by the theft, Helius?
Don't worry about the plans -!
I have duplicates of everything, safe in my desk's secret compartment!
Hans dear, if I were you, I wouldn't be so sure about that!
Why did you conceal from us,
Helius, the fact that you now actually want to take on the voyage to the moon?
You've called me your good comrade so often at work - in the laboratory - in this very room... now you want to lie to me, Helius?
I didn't mean to lie to you, Friede -
I just wanted to spare
Hans the conflict between his love for you and his sense of duty towards the work we've been doing!
But do you really believe, Helius, that Hans would ever be capable of letting you down?!
Oh no, Helius! You won't make the trip to the moon without Windegger...
- and not without me -!
Have you forgotten, Friede, how those fared that dared this trip to the moon before us -
IN MEMORY OF...
TO THE BOLD PIONEERS
OF SPACE NAVIGATION
WHO DID NOT RETURN FROM
THEIR JOURNEY INTO OUTER-SPACE
THE Y LIVED AND DIED FOR
A GREAT IDEA
HONOUR THEIR MEMORY
Friede - don't you get it?!
I just couldn't stand to know you were in danger -
God in heaven - and what danger indeed -!!!
He's decided to travel to the moon, Hans...
So when do we start -?
And who will go with us?
Ask Friede...
Friede... you want to go with me -?
...in exactly 24 hours...
Mr. Helius, the 24 hours for consideration were up 61 minutes ago...
The explosion is of no concern, Mr. Helius - it's nothing but a small accentuation of my offers...
The price of this first warning, Mr. Windegger, is the hangar:
Just a shack... the second one will cost the lives of men... the third, the spaceship...
Don't force me, Mr. Helius, to take stronger measures:
Choose the lesser of two evils -: Me!
I give you my word,
Mr. Helius, the very hour that we come to an agreement, you'll get your stolen material back, complete and in perfect condition...
...the Spaceship "FRIEDE"
("Peace") is ready for launch...
...at moonrise the spaceship will soar into outer-space...
...only to land - if God sees fit - 36 hours later upon the opposite side of the moon...
...at this moment bells will ring - the sirens of all the factories, trains and ships around the world will wail to honour the pioneers of space navigation...
In this final hour I must once again warn all of you...
You, Manfeldt, and you -
Mr. Turner:
I'm leaving out Windegger:
And as for you... Friede -!
Friede... in this last minute... -
I'm begging you -
Don't beg me, Helius!
Helius, in this last instant, do you want to shame me as a woman?
...the whole world's eyes are directed upon us... -
...the whole world's ears are listening to us...
Everyone to their stations...
We launch in 50 minutes -!
...the whole world's eyes are directed upon us... -
...the whole world's ears are listening to us...
Just now
Just now the
Just now the spaceship
Just now the spaceship has
Just now the spaceship has reached
Just now the spaceship has reached the
Just now the spaceship has reached the launch pad...
...because the spaceship is built too light to stand freely, it's submerged in a water-basin in which it floats upright...
From the moment of launch till attaining the necessary speed of 11,200 km per second...
SPEED
...there will be 8 critical minutes in the battle with the increase in speed, with G-force, which has a fatal effect upon human organisms when it goes over
40 metres per second...
G-FORCE
...after these 8 minutes, during which we'll feel an intolerable burden pulling our bodies back to earth, we'll be victors in the battle with gravitational force... or -
...and if we aren't able to maintain our speed of 11200... then we'll hurtle - and hurtle - further - and further still -
- irretrievably lost in outer-space - never again... never again... to return to the earth...
I'll be the one to pull the stop-lever, Windegger!
60 seconds to go -!
20 seconds to go - lie still - take a deep breath -!
10 seconds to go -!
Seconds to go!
NOW
Launch-rocket depleted!
Full-throttle on middle-rocket!
Win-degger... jet-tison... middle... - ro-cket...
Turn... back!!!
Maybe this chap is dead?!
I think Josephine needs a brandy!
I think Mr. Turner needs one even more -!
Don't you see, someone is stowed away in the cargo hold!
Okay, you wretched scoundrel, how did you get in here?!
I've devoted my whole life to moon-issues, Mr. Helius!
Moon Vampire
The Mystery of the
Deadly Moon-Rays
The earth... where is our earth -!?
The sun is rising on our earth...
Logbook of the Spaceship
FRIEDE
Turning the spaceship's black side toward the sun... to absorb warmth. -
All's well on board.
227,000 km from earth.
Stopping the last jets, flying without propulsion.
Weightlessness on board.
Have entered the moon's gravitational field. -
Are within 9000 km of the moon.
Through the directional boosts mentioned above weight regained on board.
Turning the spaceship with the jets in direction of destination to fire brake boosts to prevent premature crash on the moon. -
Are about to reach the side of the moon facing away from earth.
Watching the earth set.
We're seeing it again, Hans... we're seeing it again!
And when are we finally going to land?!
If we had a spark of reason in us, we wouldn't ever land -!
You're just afraid - you wimp -!!
Tell him he has no right to jeopardise all our lives for the sake of his ambition!
By God now is not the time for arguments, Hans -
Shut the window-hatches -!
Full brake-power - we're plummeting -!
Hold on tight -!!!!
The ignition cable probably isn't going to fix itself!
The moon awaits!
First though we have to do an air-sample, to tell whether we can breathe outside!
Do what you want!
I'm only interested in how
I'll get back out of here!
I'll tell you just one thing, Friede, as soon as I have the spaceship ready to launch again, I'll fly back to earth - and neither Helius nor
Manfeldt will stop me -!
Do you really aim to stab Helius in the back?
Do you really aim to stab me in the back?
Now Helius has no choice but to prepare right away for the trip back -!
But Helius is convinced that we'll find water with the divining rod!
You know what the only thing is that we'll find on the moon -!
- Death!
Professor, please, help me with the air-sample!
For God's sake, don't open it -!!
If he opens the outer door and outside there's no breathable atmosphere, then we're done for good!
He's taken the divining rod with him!
It's as if the rod is pulling him forward!
Mingo would follow this trail, Mr. Helius!
The main objective should be to look for water!
I have enough to do, to get us ready to launch again!
May I volunteer to look for Professor Manfeldt and, at the same time, water?
Atmosfere breathable, not yet analised.
Törner on the trale for 3 hours of Manfeldt searching for water.
Since when is Gustav your secretary?
I can't stand it anymore...
I'm going to look for Manfeldt -!
From Miss Friede... so you won't go hungry!
Professor -!
Professor -!
Professor -!!
Professor -! Manfeldt -!!
Professor -!!!
Don't let him into the ship!!
Don't let him into the ship!!!
Is there anyone in the world to whom we should relay your last regards - if we get back to earth?
The oxygen containers - the shot hit the oxygen containers -!!!!
What does this mean,
Miss Friede, with the oxygen containers?!
Let's pray to God it means nothing!
We've lost more than half of the oxygen!
That means: One of us can't go back to earth -!
One of us has to stay on the moon -!!
Yes, Windegger:
One of us!
Do you know what this means - do you?!
To stay here - alone on the moon - just because you didn't want to listen to me - you and him!!
Short one loses - long one wins... and we draw three times... how's that?!
You draw -!
So draw then -!
Would it be easier for you, Hans, if I stayed with you on the moon?
I have only one desire:
To get back to earth -!!
Let's drink to a happy homecoming to earth - for all of us...
...to a happy homecoming - for all of us, Hans!
The base-camp is ready,
Mr. Helius!
Now you must prove, Gustav, that I can rely upon you!
I'm staying back here on the moon...
- and you will guide the spaceship away from the moon!
Do you want Mr. Windegger to perish -?
And Miss Friede, who loves him -?
The enormous shock of the launch will naturally wake the sleepers - and then Mr. Windegger will take over the command...
Dear Hans! I am convinced that you won't let me down just as I haven't let you down.
I shall wait calmly and with confidence that you'll come to get me.
My greetings to Friede! - Helius.
Farewell!
THE STRONG MAN
Where once a Belgian
Orchard Bloomed.
"Here's another Yankee letter for private Paul Bergot!
Where is he?"
"...Two days ago I saw him in No-Man's Land!"
"Next time, Cootie, you'll keep your head down!"
Private Paul Bergot, c/o Belgian Red Cross,
Ostend, Belgium.
I hope you are better.
Your letter have been a great joy to me...
...and my heart is warmer for knowing I have as a dear, dear friend...
...a brave soldier of another nation.
Your English has im...
Because an ocean rolls between us...
...and we are never to meet,
I find the courage...
...to put my whole heart on paper and to tell you...
I love you, I love you,
I love you.
Mary Brown
With love
Mary Brown
Then the Armistice,
Peace and fleets of liners...
...laden with immigrants seeking a newer Rainbow in the Land of Promise.
Ellis Island, the Funnel of America.
THE GREAT ZANDOW
Strongest man in the world
The Great ZANDOW and co.
"Well, where's the Company?"
"My company - I captured him in the war!"
"The Crown Prince gave me this hat!"
"Take that!... and that!... and that!... and... ..."
"I lift the heavest weights in the world... and when I shoot myself from a cannon to a trapeze it's a sensation!"
"I tell you I'm NOT Mary Brown, and I never wrote to any soldiers..."
"And if you don't stop following me I'll turn you over to a truant officer!"
"Pardon, Major, do you know a girl named Mary Brown?"
"Sure... she passes that corner every day!"
"Sink that roll, Lily, there's a 'dick' trailing me!"
"Out of jail a week, and at it again, huh?"
"You were looking for
Mary Brown, were you not?"
"Well, I'm Little Mary."
"What's a nickel! I've got plenty of money."
"The Russell Apartments!"
"Hey, there! You can't leave your women lying around like this!"
"Room three, upstairs."
"You let me out of here or I'll holler!"
"Don't let this leak out!"
"Where will I find the studio of Madame Browne?
"In two days we open my big act in Cloverdale...
...and the loafer is late for the train!!"
Cloverdale had once been a peaceful little border town.
But over-night Cloverdale had changed....
Certain interests found it ideally located for a defiance of law.
The Town Hall was re-named
"The Palace" and the profits ran into thousands.
"The Palace" and its attractions were taking their toll from village homes.
"Come on, Sir, come on home."
"If my Dad was here... he'd fix you!"
Justice and decency had fled before the new law... Money.
The only force left opposing
"Mike" McDevitt, owner of
"The Palace", was Parson Brown.
"...It's useless to fight me any longer. Money talks louder than you!..."
"...Every man has his price!
...Now what's YOURS?"
"The House of God is founded on a ROCK. For the miseries...
...you have caused,
The Master will destroy you!"
"Listen, fool! Continue these demonstrations against me...
...and I'll give you something real to pray for!"
The church people of the town, horrified by conditions...
...rallied at the call of their pastor.
"Bretheren, stand firm!
The Good Book says 'Faith can move mountains!'..."
"...For the Lord said unto
Joshua 'March around the walls of Jericho seven days...
...and on the Seventh day the walls shall fall'..."
"...This is the Sixth day of marching around OUR Jericho...
Believe ye and Behold!
The Miracle shall be repeated!"
"Hymn 339... 'Onward
Christian Soldiers'."
"Here comes 'Holy Joe' playing Joshua again!"
Onward, Christian soldiers,
Marching as to war;
"I believe in this... and wish I'd led a cleaner life."
"Aw, shut up! ...pretty soon you'll be washing your neck!"
"'Holy Joe' out there again trying to sing the shingles off the roof!"
"If that Psalm-singing idiot bothers me much more...
...I'll have his daughter in here as the main attraction!"
A few hours later... another meeting behind the church.
Mary Brown, the Parson's daughter, saw the world through the eyes...
...of optimism... perhaps because she was blind.
"Miss Mary; tell us that story again about the Belgian soldier who won the war."
"Once there was a plain little girl who dared to love a brave, handsome soldier...
"...But when he wrote that he was coming to America, she stopped writing and hid...
...for she had never told him she was... blind."
COMING The Great 'ZANDOW'
Strongest Man In The World
"Yes, this has been a dirty trip!
Last night I gave my boy a bath and..."
"Say, what did you swallow?
...A fish horn?"
"If you feel like you sound you need a plumber."
"What's the time, please?"
"One more germ out of you and the Smith Brothers lose a good customer!"
Camphor Rub
KRAUSS LIMBURGER CHEESE
"My head's clear!
...I'm beginning to smell!"
"Glad you're here, Big Boy; the whole town's crazy to see your Cannon Act!"
STAGE ENTRANCE
"Where do you get the water?"
"Behind the church."
"Ask Mary Brown."
"WHO?"
"MARY BROWN."
"Are you Miss Brown?...
Miss Mary Brown?"
"The little Mary Brown who wrote such a nice letters to a boy in Belgium?"
"...And now he's right here in town..."
"I'm him."
"Aren't you surprised to see me?"
"...And in that town there was only one Mary Brown... and she was a Chinaman!"
"...And another one said
'I'm little Mary'."
"They're howling for you... do your stuff or there'll be a riot!"
"If you want to get out of town alive...
...you'd better please that gang out there!"
"Where's the Strong Man?
Show us the big Bum!"
"Do something... the longer they wait the tougher they get!"
"I paid for a Strong Man... and I'm going to have one!"
"Mister Zandow...
I can't do the Cannon trick!"
"Bring on the Cannon trick!"
"Come on! Get shot out of that cannon!"
"We must be quiet...
There's a funeral!"
"The Kid's right! Let's bow our heads and pray for poor old 'Holy Joe'!"
"...And if 'Holy Joe' must sing, get him a ukulele!"
"...And may we soon have the honor of entertaining
Mary Brown in our midst!"
"A... Men!"
"It's a riot! Lock the doors and protect the money!"
DUMP TRASH HERE
"Drive the money changers from us!"
Once again Cloverdale tucked the bed covers beneath its chin and slept in peace...
...protected by the majesty of the law.
"Run along home, honey,
I don't need any help!"
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
CARROT TOP
A drama in five parts from the book by Jules RENARD
Directed by Julien Duvivier
In a small provincial town.
Mrs. Lepic, gossipmonger, hypocritical, spiteful.
Mr. Lepic, indifferent, egoistic.
She gathered the town gossips together once a week to let her tongue wag freely.
"They just can't keep their mouths shut, those cursed magpies!"
"Are you going out again, my dear?"
"You don't like it when I have people over!"
"To think that I've put up with that boor for twenty years!"
"Can you tell me where the Lepic family lives?"
"My name is Annette.
I'm the new maid."
"With Mrs. Lepic, life won't be easy."
"But Mr. Lepic is a good man.
I know him quite well."
"If you're honest and hardworking, you'll get along with him."
"This is Felix, my favorite son."
"But I don't see any pictures of the youngest boy?
"Carrot Top?
He's a lying, thieving, stupid redhead!"
At the local county school.
Francois, the Lepics' youngest son, came into the world when the dissension between his parents was a fait accompli.
COMPOSITION
Your thoughts about the family.
The family is a group of people living under the same roof who cannot stand each other.
In a so-called artistic cabaret in town.
Felix, the Lepics' oldest son, spent most of his evenings in this place.
"Your schoolboy admirer has arrived."
Maria Milon, a realist singer.
By the time the holidays came around
Felix had succeeded in softening pretty Maria's heart.
"Will you come join me? Promise me!"
"You promised, don't forget!"
An intimate family scene.
Ernestine, the sister of Felix and Francois.
"Felix, my son, help yourself."
"There's no more melon for you.
Anyway, you're like me, you don't like it."
"Can't you answer when you're spoken to?"
"I've told you never to talk with your mouth full!"
"Could you pass me some bread to finish off my compote?"
"Stop meddling, will you?
Just do your job, that's all that's asked of you!"
The next day.
"Whose turn is it to go hunting with me?"
"Hey, you hens!
I'm going hunting!"
"Felix! Dad's taking me hunting with him!"
"Fighting with Felix again!
Leave him alone!"
"Go get me some cream from the farm."
"Mom, please...
Let me go hunting with dad..."
"Do as I say!"
"Are you ready? Let's go!"
"After thinking about it,
I'd rather stay here."
"Another one of your whims!
You're as fickle as the wind!
Stay here then, my friend, and whine all you like!"
"Why do I act like that?
To avoid getting a thrashing and since dad thrashes less..."
You're so far away, not being able to see you,
I can't bear it anymore. Come, Felix.
Maria, who was only interested in Felix as a source of money, sought out information on the Lepics' wealth.
Felix Lepic is the oldest son.
The Lepics are well-off.
A small, but secure fortune.
"Annette, have you put the hens in the henhouse?"
"Go close up the henhouse!
"It's dark, I'm scared!"
"I'm not a coward...
I was just pretending to be scared!"
"You were scared, weren't you?"
"Carrot Top, you'll close up the henhouse every evening."
"Please, God...
I don't want to go to the henhouse again tomorrow night."
"Where's the chamber pot..."
"What in heaven's name have I done to deserve such a child!"
"There was no pot in the room.
I'm sure there wasn't...
She just put it in there now."
"There wasn't any pot here last night... I promise!"
The next day, while Mr. Lepic was in town.
"It's my day off.
Come, I'll take you for a stroll."
"No one will ever love me like that!"
"No one loves me.
Everyone rejects me."
Mathilde,
Carrot Top's little girlfriend.
"Why doesn't your family like you?"
"My mother says it's because I'm so ugly."
In the train that was bringing
Mr. Lepic back home.
Pretty Maria was coming to see Felix.
"I forbid him to play at getting married to my little Mathilde."
"Why did you go off with Annette without my permission?"
Seeing her husband,
Mrs. Lepic changes her attitude.
"Who do you like better, your father or your mother?"
"I like mommy better."
"Go away, Annette...
It would be better if I were dead."
"Not everyone can be an orphan."
"I should never have come.
You don't love me!"
"I'm dying of boredom here,
I'm going to leave tonight."
"The person who truly loves me would take me to Paris."
"To run away, we need money.
Wait a little longer and I'll get some."
Felix's sister, Ernestine, happened to come upon this scene.
"I won't say anything if you give me money."
"Mr. Lepic, your son is treated unfairly. He's unhappy."
"No, Carrot Top. Mrs. Lepic is always going after him."
"If you want to get on Mrs. Lepic's good side, say bad things about me."
"I know my father isn't happy... but he doesn't want anyone to know."
"And Mrs. Lepic doesn't like me because I take pity on him."
"Carrot Top!
It's always Carrot Top!"
"I can't take it, no other boy could be as unhappy as me."
"What are you doing here,
Carrot Top?"
"You know...
I'm going to kill myself."
The next day, a delegation came to ask Mr. Lepic to run for mayor.
"Please be our candidate for mayor!"
Then he thought about his little friends.
"Where is Carrot Top?
Have you seen him?"
"You've completely lost your mind!
You stupid boy!"
"My son, Francois.
"My little Carrot Top..."
"My little Carrot Top, go feed the dog."
"It's your turn to work, you go feed the dog."
"Mom, don't cry...
I'll go feed the dog."
Meanwhile, the way Felix was acting with Maria was scandalizing everyone around.
"The Lepics' son..."
"This small change is hardly enough to keep me here with you."
"Just wait,
I'll get the money we need."
"Someone stole another 100 francs from me today."
"You're the one who stole it!"
"Oh, Madame!
Francois would never do that!"
"Stay out of this,
I didn't ask you!"
"Did you see him? Are you sure?"
"I think so..."
"He who starts by stealing an egg!"
"Will steal an ox!"
"And finally end up in prison!"
"Leave the boy alone!"
"I told you to leave the boy alone!"
"That's enough!"
On Sunday, the next day,
Mr. Lepic's election fell on the same day as the village fair.
The barn...
A beam...
A rope...
"The train doesn't leave for another two hours.Let's go to the fair!"
The barn...
A beam...
A rope...
A beam...
A rope...
"We'll never get married, Mathilde, because I'm going to kill myself."
To distract Carrot Top from carrying out his plan,
Mathilde had Annette take her to the fair.
"Gentlemen,
I declare my three ideals to you: unity - equality - morality."
"Rather than look after the town's business, you should look after your own!"
"What do you mean?
You'd better tell me!"
"Are you saying you don't know your wife ill-treats your youngest son?"
"I say that your son Felix is scandalizing the town!"
"A girl, of the worst sort!"
"What is Francois doing?"
"He's going to kill himself."
"Where is Felix?"
"Naturally, you accuse Felix!"
"Goodbye, old Dick!"
"What have you done with the money! Thief!"
"I didn't take anything, and I can go out with anyone I want!"
"You! You'd better keep out of this!"
"Madame, the boy is going to harm himself."
"Sir, Carrot Top is trying to kill himself!"
His life... His pathetic life still held him back...
"What were you doing?"
"Go ahead, cry, my boy...
Tears will do you good."
"Why did you want to die?"
"I have a mother... who doesn't love me and I don't love her."
"What about me, do you think I love her?"
"Be quiet...
After all, she is your mother."
"My poor little boy..."
"You came into the world too late, against your mother's will.
She never forgave you."
"From now on, no one will hurt you anymore."
"Now, the two of us are together."
THE END
Hello.
- Nice day' isn't it?
- Yes, isn't it!
It's swell.
It's perfect.
- Just like you.
- Ah' shut up!
You know' it's a lucky thing
I didn't go out on my yacht today.
- I wouldn't have met you.
- Have you a yacht?
Have I?
A regular floating palace!
You know' I had to put straps on it for people to hang on to...
I have so many friends.
I never heard of straps on a yacht.
Well, ya see, I got the idea... when I was going to work every morning... on the subway to Wall Street.
Are you in Wall Street?
Am I!
Say, I've got 80 acres right in the center of the financial district.
Why, if it was out in California,
I'd subdivide it... and I'd buy you the whole world.
You're kidding.
- My name's Jim. What's yours?
- Mary.
- I'll bet it's Mary Smith.
- I'll bet it isn't.
Well, Mary... you found your little lamb.
Now I'm gonna follow you wherever you go.
Gee, we're alone!
And our day is almost over.
Oh, it isn't over.
It's just beginning.
- For I'm going to make you a promise.
- Promise what?
That we'll never be lonesome anymore.
If I had known when I first saw you... that you were only a telephone operator instead of a swell...
I'd have proposed to you right on the spot.
And if I had known that you were just a punch presser...
I... I would have accepted.
Gee, it's funny how lonesome a fella can be... especially with a million people around him.
You know, you just can't be happy in a hotel room... especially when all your friends... have homes and kiddies.
All my life I've wanted a little white house... out in the country, with blue shingles.
I don't like blue shingles.
But you like the white house.
And I'd paint the shingles any color you like.
- Lavender?
- Sure!
Or pink?
Oh, Mary,
I'd rather have them blue.
Then they'd be just the color of your eyes.
Of course, you could have them black, or brown, or green, or... any color you like, just so long as you're there.
Mary...
Mary.
Gee, that's a pretty name!
- But Sergeant, I —
- Calm yourself, baby!
I'll get to you in a moment.
Now tell me where you found him.
A jane was hurt down at the roller coaster.
This monkey tried to run over me about it!
- Disturbing the peace, eh, kiddo?
- Oh, listen to me, Sergeant.
That's what I was trying to tell this man: that it was my girl that was hurt.
I was trying to get to her to help her.
So it was your girl that was hurt, eh?
What is her name?
- Mary, sir.
- Mary what?
I... I don't know.
You see, we only met today.
- Picked her up, eh?
- Oh, no, sir.
You wouldn't say that if you saw her.
She's not that kind of a girl.
She's a good kid, a sweet kid.
That ain't much of a description.
You're officially charged... with picking up girls and resisting arrest.
- Take him away.
- I wish I could make you realize, sir... that you've got to let me go.
I don't know that girl's name, but I love her.
And if I don't get to her,
I'll lose her.
And I'm gonna marry her... if she'll have me.
Dear me!
Isn't that thrilling!
- Do go on!
- Yes, I'll go on... and I'll tell you what I think of you.
You don't know when a man's sincere and when he's not.
What a great policeman you are!
You're so used to dealing with lousy, rotten people... you're rotten yourself!
Run along to your little Mary, sonny.
I hope you find her.
Do you — do you mean it?
Sure I mean it.
Don't mind me.
I'm just playful today.
Now run along.
Thanks.
As for you, you big ham, you go jump in the lake!
Hey, you go jump in the lake!
I'll be loving you always
With a love that's true always
When the things you've planned need a helping hand
I will understand always
Always
Days may not be fair always
That's when I'll be there always
Not for just an hour
Not for just a day
Not for just a year but always
Lonesome me
Poor little lonesome me
So near and yet so far
From happiness
How I pray
We'll meet again someday
To love and laugh
Subtitles by mahdi.hsh94 mahdi.hsh94@gmail.com
HAROLD LIOYD
IN
FRESHMAN
Do you remember those boyhood days when going to...
...college was greater than going to congress and you'd rather be Right Tackle than President?
The home of Harold Lamb.
His father was the best bookkeeper in the county ... and the worst liar in the state.
"Look, Pa, how much Harold has saved to take ...
...to college for spending money, just by selling washing machines. " date || withdrawn || deposited || balance
"He's been upstairs in his room all evening ...
... dreaming about going to college, he simply can't thinkof anything else. "
College Yells
"Static !"
"I've got China !"
"I guess he learned it at that movie show,
''The College Hero" ...
... he saw it six times yesterday. "
LESTER LAUREL in
"THE COLLEGE HERO"
"I'm just a regular FELLOW ...
... step right up and call me 'Speedy' "
CLEVER COLLEGE CLOTHES
HOW TO PLAY FOOTBALL
Jack Merrivale at College
Tate College Year Book 1924
Chester A. (Chet) Trask
Voted the Most Popular Man in College ...
... Our Football Captain 1924
Harold Lamb
Voted the Most Popular Man in College ...
... Our Football Captain 1925
"I saw it in the movies, ...
... the college hero did that jig every time ... he was introduced to anyone. "
"I took me a week to learn it, Dad ... but I bet it will make a hit at college !"
"I'm afraid, Ma, if Harold imitates that movie actor ... at college, they'll break either his heart or his neck !"
The Opening of the Fall term at Tate University ...
... a large football stadium with a college attached.
The Dean of the College ... he was so dignified he never married for fear ... his wife would call him by his first name.
The peril of the Freshman ... an upper class bully who made Simon Legree  ... look like the Good Samaritan .
On the Tate Limited. Peggy, ... the kind of girl your mother most have been.
"Hello, Peggy ... are you still helping your mother with the boarding house ? "
"Yes ... and I have a new job at the Hotel Tate ...
... in the check room. "
"I think I know the word for number 19 vertical ...
... 'a name for the one you love love.' "
"Sweetheart."
"Darling."
"Dearest."
"Precious."
"Honeybunch."
"Isn't it wonderful to be in love ?"
"Pipe the latest sport-model Freshman with the ...
... old fashioned trimmings, let's ride him !"
"My name's Harold Lamb ... what's yours ?"
"I am the Dean of this college."
"Have you been assigned a car to take you to the college ?"
The Tate Auditorium.
The student body was waiting ...
...to be annoyed by the Dean's opening address.
"See that everything is ready ... the Dean is due any minute. "
TATE AUDITORIUM
STAGE ENTRANCE
"Aren't you going to say a few words of greeting to the students ?"
"Why, every new student must make a speech ... if you don't, you'll be the most unpopular man in college !"
"My friends, I am here ...er... yes, there is no doubt but that I am here ... ... "
"Yes, I repeat that I am here ... er...you are here...
...in fact, we are all here ."
NOTE FROM THE COLLEGE HERO
"I'M JUST A REGULAR FELLOW ...
...STEP RIGHT UP AND
CALL ME SPEEDY "
"I'm just a regular fellow !"
"... and I want you to step right up and call me 'Speedy' !"
"Come on... I'll stand treat for some ice cream !"
A day spent in spending changed Harold's plans ...
...for living quarters ...
FOR RENT
FURNISHED ROOM
3$ PER WEEK.
"I'll spend my daughter up to finish washing these windows ...
...while you're out to to dinner ."
"I ...er... took this little room so
I'd have a quiet place ... to hide away and study ."
As "Speedy" splurged through the dizzy days,
...even the Tate Tattler ast up...
...and took notice ...
This Frisky Freshman is
Just a Regular Fellow,
...Who is Leaving a Trail of
Empty Ice Cream Cones ...
...on his Dizzy Dash to Popularity.
"You see, you can never be as popular as Chet Trask ...
...unless you play on the football team ."
Football practice ...
Where men are men and necks are nothing.
The head coach ... so tough he shaves with a blow-torch.
"The boys are getting careless ...
...I'll have to jack 'em up. Get them together and I'll tear 'em to pieces !"
"What this team needs is the fighting spirit !...
...You dubs are dead from your dandruff down !"
"There's the only man on your team ...
...with the real Tate spirit !"
"There's the man to model yourselves after ! He's worth more than...
...the whole bunch of you put together !"
"He's a regular go-getter ...
...a red-blooded fighter ...
...the kind of man that
Tate is proud of !"
"You're all afraid of getting hurt !...
...I'd like someone to show me a real ROUGH tackle !"
"I'd like to play on your football team if you don't mind."
"Can you kick a football ?"
MIKE
MASCOT
"Get off this field ...
AND DONO'T COME BACK !"
"The boys need tackling practice more than anything else ...
...we've GOT to have a dummy !"
"This is no Petting party !...
...That's not half hard enough !"
"Never tackle a man this way !
You might get hurt !"
"You see... that didn't hurt me a bit ."
"And besides, if you tackle high, they'll get you with the straight arm ...
...now, watch me !"
"You see, that's not the way to do it ."
"Now, I'll show you the right way to do it."
"You guys are weaing me out !...
...This team is going to learn to tackle if it takes all night !"
"We had a great work-out,...
...didn't we, Coach ?"
"That kid's got a great spirit ...
...I hate to tell him he can't make the team. "
"Why not keep him on the squad as a water boy ...
...and let him think he's one of the substitutes? "
THE WHITE COMPANY
AMBULANCE
"I've got a new one on Speedy...
...he thinks he made the football team ...
...and he's only the water boy !"
"Harold Lamb has more spunk in his little finger than you have in...
...your whole conceited make-up !"
"Harold, I've something to tell you ..."
"I MADE THE TEAM !"
"I...I congratulate you."
And so in Speedy's fancy,...
...Chet Trask was tottering on his throne ...
The Tattler wonders ...
...who will step forward this year to be our host...
...at the customary Fall Frolic.
It will be remembered that the host of last year's gala event was ...
...Chet Trask, who was later voted ... the most popular man in college.
Harold (Speedy) Lamb requests the pleasure of your presence at his Fall Frolic
October 25, 1924 at the Hotel Tate
The host -- how he hoped to look for $38.50
"It 's one of his dizzy spells, Mr Lamb ...
...a little brandy always fixes him right up."
"There's no danger of not having my suit ...
...ready for the party, is there ?"
The Fall Frolic
The crowning achievement of Speedy the Spender.
"It's after ten o'clock...I wonder what's keeping Speedy."
"With the whole college waiting,...
...you pick out a day like this for dizzy spells !"
"I only had time to baste it ... so be careful...
...it's just loosely sitched together."
"Easy ... EASY ... EASY !...
I'd better go with you in case anything happens !"
"All hail ... our host !"
"If anything rips, I'll ring this bell."
"Speedy, old pal, can you let me have ten dollars ?"
"I'd be all right ...
...if I could only get a little drink. "
"Just for that, you little fool,...
...I'm going to tell you what this bunch really thinks of you !"
"You think you're a regular fellow ...why,...
...you're nothing but the college boob !"
"Ever since you came to college,... we've just been kidding you... look ...."
"I'm just a regular fellow ...
...step right up and call me Speedy !"
"It doesn't bother me a bit...
...really; a fellow has to expect those things, you know."
"For he's a jolly good fellow !"
"Harold, you haven't been true to yourself ...
...you've been pretending to be what you though ...
...they wanted you to be."
"Stop pretending, Harold...be yourself ! get out and make theme like you for...
...what you really are and what you can do !"
"There's just one chance left ...
...if I ever get in that big game against Union State,...
...I'll show them !"
The day of days!
When every heart in
Tate stood still ...
...and all the world watched football history in the making.
"Look at Speedy on the bench...
...he still thinks he has a chance to get in the game !"
QUARTER: 4TH
MINUTES TO PLAY: 14
"I'm afraid Union State is too heavy for our boys... they've knocked out almost the whole Tate team."
"Quick, see if any of the boys who were hurt ...
...can get back in the game...
...I have only one substitute left !"
"There's only two of us left, old boy !...
...we'll get into this game yet !"
"Wait... I'll get Speedy to change sweaters with you."
"Hard luck, Dave, old fellow !...
...They're sending me in ahead of you !"
"Take off your sweater and give it to Miller ."
"There's only ten minutes to go...I won't quit now, ...
...I tell you... I won't !"
"Why, we've just been kidding you
...you're only the water boy."
"You listen, now ! I wasn't kidding !...
...I've been working...and fighting ...
...just for this chance... and you've got to give it to me !"
"You've had enough time out, send in your substitute !"
"You have one minute to send in a substitute ...
...or else forfeit the game !"
"Come on, you old women !...
...Are you afraid of mussing your hair?
...Don't you know how to fight ?"
"Atta boy, Speedy... a twenty yard again !"
"When you hear this whistle, put that ball down !"
"They may kick ...
I better play back... hey ?"
"Two minutes to go!"
"One minute left to play ... and you've...
...thrown away our last chance !"
"I can't look !
Is it over the line ?"
I knew you could do it...
...I'm so proud ... and I love you ...
The End
THE IMAGINARY VOYAGE by Renè Clair (1925)
One summer morning,in a small country town.
A poor and shy young man was going to work in a bank.
Auguste, a work mate.
Albert, another employee.
Lucie, a typist.
The bank manager.
Rosa Koslex,
"authorized" palmist.
"I see three men who love you!"
"You will marry the man you love!"
"You will marry the woman you love!"
"A most beautiful future!"
That afternoon...
"Jean, don't be upset at me!"
"I don't love Albert"
My dear Jean, it's you I love. here is your engagement ring.
Your Lucie.
"Thanks to your kiss, I Gracias a su beso, I've recovered my power! Look..."
"I am a fairy! Hundreds years ago a magician stole my powers away.
Only a young man's kiss could restore them..."
"Follow me: you shall be rewarded!"
"We are in the hospice for old fairies"
"Nowadays, nobody believes in fairies anymore.
So, my old sisters shut themselves up in this antrum."
"They want you to kiss them... all!"
"Resign yourself!"
That one is Silvayne, a bad fairy.
Watch out, she is really evil!
"These are your old friends,
Puss in Boots..."
"Bluebeard..."
"... Cinderella and the Prínce..."
"Be happy, the fairies will give you immortality.
You're going to live with us forever! "
"I don't want to live forever, if Lucie is not with me! "
"Since you can't stay without her, we shall bring her here!"
"Look, your fiancée!"
"I wanted your friends to be here also!"
A fascinating life begins.
Thanks to the two sweethearts, an atmosphere of... tenderness permeates the old antrum of the fairies.
The evil Silvayne is jealous of
Lucie. I fear her power.
Lucie must leave.
"Take this as a keepsake.
With this ring, you must only... express a wish and it will come true!"
"If I accept to grant you the girl, you must solemnly promise something that will ensure her happiness! "
"Repeat: with all my heart, I want to be like a faithful dog for Lucie."
A DOG !!
"We made it! His oath transformed him!
Suddenly he turned into a dog!"
But where is Jean?
NO DOGS ADMITTED.
Jean said we would meet here.
For the thief, the ring has lost its magic power.
"Don't wait for Jean. This damned ring has turned him into a dog!
He's in your hands!"
"Jean, is it you?"
At midnight...
Through the power of imagination, with a normal ring, Jean has gained his self confidence.
Look how he has changed.
THE END.
THE IMAGINARY VOYAGE (1925)
Renè Clair
THE CIRCUS
THE CIRCUS
"So you missed the hoop again."
"Father, I couldn't help it."
"For that you don't eat tonight."
"And you're supposed to be funny!"
"Look at that house; empty!"
Around the Side Shows hungry and broke.
"Here you are, sir."
"Count it."
"Is it all there?"
"Say, gimme that money!"
"How d'you get out of here?"
"Rotten!"
"Get off!"
"Where's the funny man?"
"Bring on the funny man!"
The Funny Man.
Meal-time after the Show.
"Father won't let me."
"Do you want a job?"
"Be here in the morning, and we'll try you out."
Early the next morning.
Hungry.
"Run along home!"
"I live here."
"Excuse me, my cane."
The Tryout.
"Go ahead and be funny."
"That's awful!"
"Put on the William Tell act."
"Now then, watch this and see if you can do it."
"Go ahead and try it."
"Put on the barber-shop act."
"Now I must hit you."
"Now hit me!"
"I can't see."
"Just a moment!"
"We haven't talked terms yet."
"Get out and stay out!"
"Show's starting!"
"Aren't you coming in?"
"You're not leaving?"
"You see, we couldn't come to terms."
"Thank you for the egg."
The Show on.
Trouble with the
Property Men.
"How about our back pay?"
"Get to work!"
"We quit!"
"They've quit."
"Get anybody!"
"Do you want a job?"
"Don't touch that button!"
"He's a sensation, but he doesn't know it."
"Keep him on as a property man."
The Circus prospered, but not the property man.
And the girl led the same hard life.
"Keep him busy and don't let him know he's the hit of the show."
A Sick Horse.
"Blow this pill down the horse's neck!"
"The horse blew first --"
"Open the door, quick!"
"I told you the lions were dangerous!"
"Where's that pill?"
"Come here!"
"I've got to see a doctor!"
"It's a shame the way they make you work --"
"And you the hit of the show."
"Why of course!"
"All the crowds, all the applause is just for you."
"I knew it!"
"If you strike that girl, I'll quit!"
"And what's more
I want what I'm worth --"
"I'll give you fifty dollars a week."
"Sixty!"
"I'll double it!"
"Nothing less than a hundred."
The Next Show.
The success of the Tramp made life easier for the girl and himself.
"Oh, Merna, you must have your fortune told!"
"I see love and marriage with a dark, handsome man who is near you now."
A New Added Attraction,
Rex, a tight-rope walker.
"Pardon me."
"Go right ahead."
"I'll give you
Five Dollars for it."
"It's happened; I'm in love!"
"He's a tight-rope walker."
"I've just met him."
"Hurry up, you're on!"
The Act Over.
"What's the matter?"
"You hardly got a laugh!"
"This is my friend."
"I don't like tight-rope walkers."
Time brought many changes to the Circus;
New Hopes and
New Ambitions.
His New Ambition.
"Never mind the rope."
"You'd better try and be funny again or you'll go!"
The next performance- and not a smile.
"I've had enough of this;"
"You get one more chance."
"Where's Rex?"
"Rex, the tight-rope walker, hasn't shown up."
"Is Rex here?"
"You can do the act, can't you?"
"You'll do it or quit!"
"I'll do it; find his clothes!"
"There's the clothes!"
"You follow her!"
"He'll kill himself."
"That's all right;"
"I've got him insured."
"Take your time, there's another act to go on."
"Why, what is the meaning of this?"
"I am taking his place on the rope."
"You'll get killed."
"Oh, no, I have a charmed life."
"I'll give you five dollars if you'll do it."
"Not a word to anybody."
"Please don't do this."
"You've forgotten your tights."
"You're on!"
"You're through!!!"
That Night.
"I've run away from the circus."
"I'll never go back."
"Can't you take me with you?"
"I've got an idea."
"You stay here."
"Have you seen Merna?"
"She's run away --"
"I can do nothing for her -- --"
"Now, there's one way out."
"She's there now?"
"Take me to her!"
The Next Morning.
The Circus ready to leave.
"So you've come back -- You -- !"
"You're speaking to my wife!"
"Will you go on with the show?"
"-- -- if you take him."
"The end wagon for you."
"Come in with us."
THE MARRIAGE CIRCLE
A few days... and a few nights... in Vienna...
...still the city of laughter and light romance.
The day starts late, but gloriously...
...in the home of Prof. Josef Stock.
Dearest Mizzi.
I've just learned that...
...you moved to Vienna two months ago and I feel hurt...
...that you didn't let me know.
I'm so anxious to see you again and have you meet my husband...
...You and your husband must call soon...
Affectionately.
Charlotte.
"Keep on with your cruelty... and some day I'll leave you!"
"That's just what you want...
...but you'll not ger rid of me so easily."
"I'm engaged and waiting for my passenger."
"If you're in a hurry, let me take you part of the way."
"Oh, sure... you look beautiful!"
Charlotte, whose marriage to Dr. Franz Braun is ideal.
Eduard Grieg
"I LOVE THEE"
...love thee, dear,
I love thee now and...
"You'll get over it... in time!"
"Mizzi, you can't imagine the perfect happiness of our married life!"
...I love thee more than any earthly creature...
"Don't be silly... husbands are blind!"
"Did you ever see a man like him!"
"I LOVE THEE"
"That's his favorite song."
HELIOS VIENNESE
INTERNATIONAL DETECTIVE AGENCY...
...I hereby employ the Helios Detective Agency...
...to collect evidence against my WIFE...
...and agree to pay the usual bonus for sufficient proof...
...of misconduct to procure a divorce. Prof. Stock.
"Professor, I never fail... you're as good as divoced."
"Mrs. Stock has a fainting spell, and wants Dr. Braun to come at once!"
"I thought you were ill."
"It's my heart again."
"This is Dr. Braun...
Charlotte's husband."
"I had another attack of my heart trouble."
"You must take good care of me."
Dr. Gustav Mueller calls at the Braun's every morning...
...ostensibly for his partner, but really for a glimpse...
...of his partner's wife.
"I've never seen you look so... so beautiful!"
"I might come to your office some day... when you are not expecting me."
My dear Mrs. Stock...
I am convinced that...
...I am not the right physician to treat your case...
...so please consult another.
With best wishes for...
...your speedy recovery,
Sincerely, Franz Braun
DR. FRANZ BRAUN
DR. GUSTAV MULLER
PSYCHICIST SPECIALISTS
"Any one who talks so much can't be sick."
"Lucky Devil... to be so loved by your own wife!"
"I want to teach him not to throw my roses away."
"It's a <b>very</b> serious case."
"You see... how crazy my wife is about me?"
"I... er... a nervous man knocked it over."
"But I have many patients!"
"Gustav, you're my best friend.
Please... please console her."
With the first quarrel forgotten, the Brauns give a dinner party.
"We'll never quarrel again... never!"
"You seem greatly interested in Miss Hofer."
"Dr. Schmidt... friend of mine."
"I'm sorry, but I have important business at the club...
...that will keep me there all night."
"He changed the place cards so he could sit by Miss Hofer...
...but I put them back."
"Miss Hofer, I'm <b>so</b> glad to see you."
There is more danger in dancing than in dining.
"Get him Mizzi... dance with him... talk to him...
...don't let him out of your sight!"
"Your dress!"
"I'm afraid you'll be cold!"
"Mizzi!"
"Where's Franz?"
When a big party ends, small parties begin.
Slip out if you can.
I'll wait in the car...
...at the corner for ten minutes.   Mizzi Stock.
"Your behaviour with Pauline Hofer was simply... scandalous!"
"If you won't believe me... if you can't trust me...
...then I can't stay here!"
"Dear, even if
I am cross something...
...I love you just the same."
"I merely wanted to prove how frightfully careless...
...your husband is to leave you alone in the dead of the night"
"How can a husband, who loves his wife, neglect her so!"
"I love you... I just can't help it... nobody could!"
"Wait... I'm going back with you."
"Come upstairs... and phone for another taxi."
"Don't worry... he'll come back."
"You will <b>not</b> go back."
"I cannot live without you!"
"Prof. Stock has gone home."
"Josef! I need love!"
"...I promised to tell Prof. Stock...
...the result of the last chess game."
1:10am
Dr. Braun and Mrs. Stock arrive in taxi and enter house.
1:15am
A light is turned on in the room.
1:22am
Shades are pulled down.
Remarks:
When I left the house after 1:50am
Dr. Braun was still there.
"Pack your things."
Then the morning, when one can't look the sun in the face.
"Get out and leave me in peace... or I'll tell my husband!"
"I had a terrible dream...
Gustav was kissing me!"
"That's what happens... when you leave me alone."
"That is true... but I give you my word...
...my visit was entirely innocent."
"I believe you... but nobody else will...
...and I'm delighted to have a man of your standing...
...help me get rid of my wife."
"By the way, Mizzi is at the
Hotel Bristol... since this morning."
"Franz! There's a man in this... but who?"
"Hotel Bristol!"
Franz: I suppose my husband has told you everything...
...Well, it's all your fault that
I'm in this desperate situation...
...Why did you come to my house at all...
...if you merely wanted to tell me that you did <b>not</b> love me?
...If you are not here by 10 o'clock...
...I shall call at your office.   Mizzi
"Confide in me... who is this man?"
"My husband... and my best friend!"
"I'm innocent... I've done nothing... Here is the proof!"
Franz: I suppose my husband has told you everything...
...Well, it's all your fault that
I'm in this desperate situation...
...Why did you come to my house at all...
...if you merely wanted to tell me that you did <b>not</b> love me?
...If you are not here by 10 o'clock...
...I shall call at your office.   Mizzi
"Is it my fault that your husband fell in love with me?"
"I'll mail you a copy."
The dreaded end of a dreadful day.
"You must talk to Charlotte... you are the only one...
...in whom she has perfect confidence."
"Wait, Franz, my boy...
I'll teach you a lesson...
...so you'll never look at another woman."
"We had better go in the back way."
"Don't ask my forgiveness...
I'm as guilty as you."
"Gustav's kiss was no dream... it was real...
...in this room... in that very chair!"
"Tell me... didn't you return to this room last night?"
"And didn't we kiss each other?"
"Fifty-fifty."
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
The first professional film by
Josef von Sternberg was unusually bold both subject matter and technical skill.
It framed the style of all gangster films to come.
A great city in the dead of night...
...streets lonely, moon-flooded...
...buildings empty as the cliff-dwellings of a forgotten age -
"The great Bull Weed - closing another bank account."
"That's what makes bums and squealers!"
"I may be a bum, but I am no squealer.
I might say, sir, that I am a
Rolls-Royce for silence."
"All right, Rolls Royce - I'll give you a chance to prove that."
"Keep your eyes off her!
What do you think I'm here for?"
"Watch me show that dame what I think of money."
"Buck Mulligan's looking for trouble."
"How'd you like to pick up ten bucks?"
"Pick it up or I'll send you to the morgue!"
"Give me that gun!"
"Rolls Royce, meet Feathers - my girl."
"How long since you had the body washed and polished, Rolls Royce?"
"If you don't want Mulligan to bump you off, Professor, you'd better stick with me."
"With pleasure, sir."
"Come on, let's drift!"
"Can I possibly be of any assistance?"
"The city is yours, Kid - what'll you have?"
"Attila, the Hun, at the gates of Rome."
"Who's Attila? The leader of some wop gang?"
"You were born two thousand years too late. You can't get away with your stuff - nowadays."
"They'll never get me!"
"I'm either a missionary or a sucker, but I'm going to put you on your feet."
"What could I do to help you?"
"Help me? Nobody helps me! I help other people!"
"I'm going to bury that guy while these lilies are still fresh!"
But Buck should have used wax flowers, for long after his lilies had faded - -
"You don't want that junk. It's too vulgar!"
"Why, it's the old hideaway!
Why did you bring me here?"
"Don't you know it's wrong to steal?"
"Look at him - cost me a thousand - looks like a million!"
"He's read every book in the case - he likes to read!"
"Let's have the key, Professor."
"A perfect getaway - - through our warehouse to the next block.
And nitro couldn't blow those 
         doors!"
"No, thanks. I've got to go out on important business."
"The police all know Mulligan's
Special. Plant the little flower where it will do the most good."
"I told you that guy had brains."
"You stay here. You may have the brains, but I've got the guts."
"What were you before Bull Weed picked you up?"
"A lawyer sometimes - a drunkard always ... what does it matter?"
"A woman, I suppose."
"I'm not interested in women."
"The Captain wants to see you."
"Say - what is this - a pinch?"
"Somebody framed me!"
"Framed you? Since when are you a picture, Buck?"
"You've got the wrong guy this time.
I'll be out in twenty minutes."
"Is this why you're called Feathers?"
"I wear feathers all over."
"What were you before
Bull Weed - er - found you?"
"I thought you weren't interested in women!"
"Bull Weed's our best friend, isn't he?"
"This is the first time in a long while that I've felt ashamed."
"Well, I planted that flower. They've probably pinched Mulligan by now."
"See you at the Ball tonight?"
"You've got to show. Everybody with a police record will be there!"
"Besides, I'm going to make
Feathers queen of the ball."
"- be there! Them's orders!"
The underworld's annual armistice - when, until dawn, rival gangsters...
...bury the hatchet and park the machine-gun.
"Check your gats!"
"Vote for Feathers!"
"Throwing away any ten-dollar bills tonight?"
"Who said you could dance with her - with-out asking me?"
"Our friend has gone back to his booze again!"
"- but I don't want you to drink!"
"Please .... don't!"
"You're Bull Weed's girl - aren't you?"
Elsewhere the night deepened into silence and rest. But here the brutal din...
...of cheap music - booze - hate
- lust - made a devil's carnival.
"F-F-Feathershelected!"
"You tell her now."
"The committee is waiting to crown you Queen o' the Ball."
"You needn't worry about your sweetie. He's out - - for the night!"
"Before sentencing you, I declare to you and your kind...
...that no man, or band of men, can defeat the Law."
"Others have tried it before, and,
I regret to say, will try it again -
- but their fate must be the same as yours."
"All your life you have dealt with the Law as an enemy. And now...
...by a final deed of violence, you have compelled it to end your career."
"I sentence you to hang by the neck until you are dead - -"
"- and may God have mercy on your soul!"
"How are we going to help him now?"
"Don't worry. They haven't hanged him yet."
The Law took no chances. Bull Weed was isolated from his world.
No messages delivered, no visitors admitted.
"- before sunrise tomorrow, to hang the said Bull Weed by the neck until he is dead."
"Any last request?"
"Tell Paloma to bring me the juiciest steak in Dreamland."
"The only one who'll see Bull is Paloma - when he brings him his last meal."
"Here's the plan - the hearse will come to the outer court...
...an hour before the hanging -"
"- and you wait in your car at
Three Corners Road, for
Bull to join you."
"You have Paloma tell Bull -
I'll attend to the hearse."
"Does that mean any danger - for you?"
"The police will only see me buying two tickets at the railroad station -"
"Then they'll be sure Bull is leaving town with me."
"Then I won't see you again?"
"This is good-bye."
"If I lose you, it's my finish.
I love you so -"
"I can't let you go - !"
"We have a chance to lead a decent life. If we get Bull out - we're his again!"
"We can't double-cross him - - we owe him everything."
"We do love each other, don't we?"
"We can't do this - - we couldn't be happy if we betrayed him!"
"You see - you taught me how to be decent."
"Rolls Royce says watch for
 the hearse - two o'clock...
...The gang will be in it - - they'll cover the guards and spring you!"
"That's a lie! Rolls Royce doesn't want me to get out!"
"You've got him wrong, Bull - that hearse will come crashing through like a tank!"
"On the level, Ed - has Rolls
Royce or Feathers ever really tried to see me?"
"Maybe I hadn't ought to tell you - but the whole town knows how they're carrying on."
"Ed, is there time for another game of checkers?"
"You hate to leave the old burg - don't you?"
"Do you think Rolls Royce is still in town?"
"What do you care? You'll be hanging in an hour."
"There's one guy I'd like to get before I hang."
"You're in a tight place now."
"It's your move."
"The plan went wrong - the guards got wise, somehow."
"It's all over with him by now."
"Extra! Bull Weed escapes!"
"What's the extra about?"
"Nothing - just a boob breaking jail!"
"So you've brought the police, too. You little rat!"
"Now you can wait and take what you framed up for me!"
"Bull - listen - we were on the level - we tried to get you out -"
"He sure cinched my finish - he's got those keys!"
"We've got the Bull cornered at his old hangout!"
"If you're waiting for Bull Weed, you'll have a long wait."
"They'll get us both in a few minutes, Bull. Why should I lie to you now?"
"If I could get my hands
 on that lousy skunk...
...I'd go back and
let 'em hang me!"
"I'm sorry things went wrong - but there's still time - for you - to get away!"
"Now you see - - how much he double-crossed you!"
"I've been all wrong, Feathers -
I know it now - I've been wrong all the way -"
"And all this got you was another hour!"
"There was something I had to find out - - and that hour was worth more to me than my whole life."
HAROLD LLOYD
IN
"THE KID BROTHER"
PROF. POWER
ORIGINAL - MAMMOTH
POWERS - STRENGTH - HEALTH
MEDICINE SHOW
The recent death of
"Prof." Powers has left his daughter Mary with the problem of carrying on the medicine show.
Flash", I'm sorry
I let you persuade me to keep on with the show.
Forget it, Mary.
It wouldn't be a show without you. Besides, everything's going to be O.K.
Sheriff Jim Hickory and his two oldest sons have made the family name famous throughout the country.
Harold, the youngest Hichory, was born on April Fool's Day.
The stork that brought him could hardly fly for laughing.
We'll be leaving for the meeting directly... how about my Sunday shirt?
If anything happens to that shirt, young man,
I'll whale the life out of you.
Hank Hooper, Harold's sworn enemy ever since Harold sold him a dozen door knobs for fresh eggs in the dark.
Well, I see the town raised the money for the dam all right.
It will be a big thing for Hickoryville.
And a bigger thing for you... eh, Sheriff?
Son, how many times have I told you we don't want any more trouble with these Hickorys?
Where is this metropolis of Hickoryville… and who signs the permits for the shows there?
Sheriff Jim Hickory... but he ain't got any use for medicine shows... he run the last one out of town.
You stay here, son... the town meeting's no place for boys.
Hi, Sheriff!
I've brought this show all the way from New York just to play your wonderful city.
Sheriff, I’d like you to autograph this little permit.
STOP! LOOK! LISTEN!
DR. PODERES MAMMOTH
MEDICINE SHOW
FREE: CONSULTATION
ADVICE - ENTERTAINMENT
Subscribers to Country Dam
The undersigned Citizens of
Hickoryville have paid their share for the new dam.
I move we give Sheriff Hickory a vote of thanks and place the money in his keeping until it is time to turn it over.
I appreciate your confidence,
Mr. Chairman... and I'll write the State Treasurer tonight.
I'd rather see that much money in a real safe place.
You're hinting that it won't be safe with me?
I got some money in there... and I don't want to see it... mislaid!
Keep back... or some-one might get hurt.
Mr. Hickory, I... I don't know how to thank you.
Who told you my name?
Every one n the state knows the Hickory…
...and I'm proud to have met the man who made the Hickory name famous.
You mean my father and brothers.
You're modest... but I like you for it.
What's your name?
Where do you live?
With the Medicine Show... down by the river.
Goodbye!"
This is a great day for Hickoryville... and we Hickorys have something to be proud of.
Never mind the letter... do those supper dishes.
Hickoryville
May 6
State Treasurer:
The Hickoryville citizens have collected their share for the dam and it is now in my keeping.
We are now waiting further instructions from you regarding the dam money.
Respectfully
Sheriff Jim Hickory
How does that sound to you?
Now you boys can sign it.
Goin' to the show?
That big medicine show in the village.
Who gave them permission to play here?
I thought I'd mail our letter.
Did you give them permission?
As you seem to be taking over the duties of sheriff... go down and stop the show.
This medicine is not only good for man and beast but is recommended as a furniture polish and for cleaning harness.
My father sent me down to stop the show... if you don't mind.
Now folks, on the count of three, this trick will prove that the little sheriff is out of sight.
Now folks, we will again be entertained by our little beauty!
If you don't stop the show, I'll have you arrested.
Where's your authority?
One moment, Sheriff,
I've got a little present for you... first.
I'm giving you 24 hours to get out of here!
I'll get the key,
Mr. Hickory...
The kid is as much at fault as anybody.
I'll attend to him when we get home.
Will these do for tonight?
Would you get me a glass of water, please?
Wouldn’t you rather have some hot coffee?
It's the wind.
Me and mama have come to take the girl home.
She can't stay here where there's no womenfolks. It ain't decent.
I suppose I'd better go.
Will you go with me to the celebration for the dam tomorrow?
Good night, Mary...
I'm going to sleep in the barn.
Next morning...
MONEY COLLECTED FOR
COUNTRY DAM
SHERIFF JIM HICKORY
REALIZES LIFE-LONG
AMBITION
The money will now remaining the Sheriff's keeping until the celebration tomorrow when he will turn it over to the state officials who will be present.
Where's that Harold?
Sleeping in the barn.
The girl from the medicine show came home with him.
She's asleep in the parlor.
Miss... I'm going to fetch you some breakfast.
Everything all right, miss?
Here's your breakfast,
Miss.
Get to work... that boy
Harold does more work than both of you.
...and if you fellows ever try anything like that again, I won't let you off so easy.
I'm earning my board at the Hoopers' by helping with the housework.
I'll get my wraps.
You go in and get her wraps...
I want to speak to her a moment.
The older he grows. the worse he gets.
You boys better get dressed for the celebration.
Come on, you're going with me to the celebration.
If you don't go with me, you won't go with anybody.
The money for the dam has been stolen!
All I know is...
I found the strong box open and the money gone.
Some one broke into your house, opened the box... and you didn't hear nothing?
It sounds funny to me...
Haven't you any clue, Jim?
GIGANTE DR. PODERES
MEDICINE SHOW
FREE
I just got an idea who did this and I'm going out and get them.
We ain't satisfied with your goin' and I reckon you better stay here till we are.
Then I'll deputize my sons.
Boys, it's those two fellows with the medicine show.
Bring them back here.
Son, you get hurt.
This is a man's job.
Harold, aren't you going with your brothers?
You see... my father and brothers don't reckon much on me... and I guess they're right
I'm not what you think I am. I was just pretending.
But you can be what
I think you are... without pretending.
...and no matter what anybody else thinks, have confidence in yourself and you can't lose.
Do you really believe in me?
There's that girl from the medicine show... and he's helping her to get away.
Pop, I reckon they got away.
BLACK GHOST
Subscribers to country Dam
The undersigned citizens of
Hickoryville have paid their share for the new dam.
Hello, SHERIFF
You keep him covered,
Sheriff, while I get the money.
Help! Help! I can't swim!
I went clear beyond the county line but not a trace of them.
Jim Hickory, I believe you stole that money!
Let's put him under arrest and take the law in our own hands.
The leading citizen of
Hickotyville may soon find himself at the end of his rope.
Son, you're a real
Hickory!
FINIS
Buster Keaton in College
Directed by : James W. Horne
On the sunkist slopes of the Pacific, where land and water meet - -
California.
High School Graduation Day, where the next step is either go to college or go to work.
A few drops of rain couldn't dampen a mother's -
- enthusiasm on her son's Graduation Day.
MAIN STREET DEPT. STORE
Mary Haynes - winner of every popularity contest -
- in which the boys were allowed to vote.
89 CENTS
Jeff Brown -
Star athlete, who believed so much -
- in exercise that he made many a girl walk home.
"I didn't think you would call for me in the rain. I'm sorry you are all wet."
"Young man, it's time you graduated.
You've been here seven years."
"I know you are going to be as popular at Clayton College as you were here."
"It is my pleasure to present this diploma to our most brilliant scholar."
"- and your scholastic record richly merits this honor medal."
"Ronald will now speak on the 'Curse of Athletics'."
"The secret of getting a medal like mine is - - books not sports."
"The student who wastes his time on athletics -
- rather than study shows only ignorance."
"Future generations depend upon brains and not -
- upon jumping the discus or hurdling the javelin."
"What have Ty Ruth or Babe
Dempsey done for Science?"
"Where would I be without my books?"
"Your speech was ridiculous.
Anyone prefers -
- an athlete to a weak-knee'd, teachers' pet."
"When you change your mind about athletics, then I'll change my mind about you."
"Mary is going to enter Clayton ...
I wish I could go."
"I'm afraid we can't afford it, dear."
"I can work my way through. Other boys do."
So the following term, Ronald arrived at Clayton, and was met by ...
Clayton
BOY WANTED
"I need another clerk as good as he is."
"You can commence tomorrow."
"Well, if it isn't the student prince."
Slow
Narrow Bridge
DON'T SMOKE
DON'T SPIT
How to play Baseball
How to play Football
How to Sprint
"I am Dean Edwards. Your principal writes me what an excellent student you are."
"A boy like you can make this athlete-infested college -
- a seat of learning once more."
"You boys will do well to follow the example of this young scholar."
Sunday found Ronald taking
"fizzical" exercise.
BOY WANTED
"You play third base for the second team."
"You forced two men out and you're out too."
WANTED
Colored Waiter
"Bring me something you can't stick your thumb in."
Clayton's wonder track team training for the intercollegiate meet.
"I admire his spirit.
At least, he's trying."
"Don't get too interested in that campus clown. -
- You're supposed to be going with me."
"You take an awful lot for granted."
"Attaboy, you made a hole in one."
A call to the Dean's office meant only one thing -
GRIEF
"You have been a miserable failure in all your studies and I know the reason why."
"I took up athletics because the girl I love thinks I'm a weakling."
"I love her and would do anything to please her."
"I understand, my boy. The same thing happened to me, -
- but I was stubborn.
That's why I'm a bachelor."
"Here's a list of the men eligible for the rowing crew."
"Coach, I'd like to have you make this young man coxswain of the crew."
"His size and weight are perfect and he has brains."
"My request is final."
"Clayton can't lose the boat race now.
I've just been appointed the 'Coaxer'."
"Boys, get out the smelling salts - -
- Little Lord Fauntleroy is your new coxswain."
"It's the Dean's orders. He'll be in that race unless -"
"- unless something happens to the poor boy."
The day of the race.
"Hey, coach - nothing has happened to Mama's boy!"
"Don't worry - you're coxswain.
Give him this and -
- he'll wake up just in time for the football season."
"Please leave! If you were seen in my room it would mean expulsion for me!"
"That's just what I want. I was expelled this morning -
- and thought I would like to take you with me."
"I'm going to stay here until we are discovered - -
- then you might change your mind about marrying me."
"Boys, we've got to win!
If we don't, rowing -
- will be a thing of the past at Clayton!"
"Is Ronald our coxswain to-day?"
"Certainly not. I've taken care of that pest in a big way."
The rival crew, ready for their most important race of the year.
THE BULLET
"Go on, they are waiting for you.
They've just been kidding me."
"Maybe it's halitosis -
Four out of five have it."
OFFICIAL
DAMFINO
"Go get a boat with a strong bottom."
OLD IRON BOTTOM
"Ready all!"
"Hurry - Jeff has me locked here in my room, and he -"
"Young lady, do you know what this means?"
"Yes - it means we are going to be married."
THE END
Subtitle By Reza Fa
"LADY WINDERMERE'S FAN"
Lady Windermere faced the grave problem-- of seating her dinner guests.
Lord Darlington
"Lord Darlington."
"I presume you came to see my husband."
Dear Lord Windemere--
This note from a total stranger may surprise you--
...but is is important that you see me at once if you would avoid certain...
...unpleasant disclosures.
Yours very truly, Edith Erlynne.
"Lord Darlington is most anxious to see you."
"You don't mind if
I run away?"
"Lady Windermere, I have a bit of news that might interest you."
"I love you!"
After a life of adventure abroad,
Mrs. Erlynne had drifted to London--
...her social stranding a thing of the past, the present a problem for her polished wits.
"Who are you - and what does this letter mean?"
"I am the mother of your wife."
"I knew you would doubt me-- here are the proofs of my identity."
"You know very well that your daughter was brought up to believe her mother is dead--
...you also know why!"
"She worships her dead mother.
The truth would kill her!"
Thanks to Windermere's cheques,
Mrs. Erlynne lived in extravagant style--
...not accepted by society but the subject of its gossip.
No party of the Windermeres' was complete without
Lord Augustus Lorton--
...London's most distinguished bachelor.
The Duchess of Berwick,
Lady Plymdale...
...Mrs. Cowper-Cowper-- gossip, gossip, gossip--.
"She is getting gray--"
"She is quite gray--"
"She is perfectly gray."
"I wonder where the woman gets all her money?"
"Why gossip about a woman you have never met? ...
...She may be very nice."
"I cannot understand why your husband defends the woman!"
A gentleman's relation to a lady is indicated by the manner...
...in which he rings her doorbell.
But when the relation becomes more friendly--
"What right have you to be jealous?
You don't love me."
"If you really loved me, you would marry me...
...in spite of what society might say--"
"I am sorry my maid forgot to empty the ash tray...
...but it happens even in society."
Lady Windermere's birthday dawned radiantly.
Lady Windermere's birthday will be celebrated tonight with a brilliant reception...
Among the guests will be many notable personages of society.
"When a married man dismisses his own car...
...and hires a taxi--!"
"You may find - in your husband's cheque book...
...the name of Mrs. Erlynne."
"It's not fair of me and
I know it, but... I love you."
"I am desperate - if you refuse to invite me tonight...
...I will go to my daughter and tell her who I am!"
"To be seen at your house tonight means my social recognition...
...possibly my marriage to Lord Augustus."
"Since that day at the races
I have never said One Word about Mrs. Erlynne."
There is nothing wrong- believe me, dear. I simply helped a woman who deserved it."
"You will change your mind when you meet her...
...I have asked her here tonight."
"If she dares to come here-
I will strike her across the face with this fan!"
Happy Birthday
Through the hour for the reception had arrived...
...Mrs. Erlynne still waited for her invitation card.
"Lord Darlington."
"You were quite wrong.
My husband has never met Mrs. Erlynne."
List of guests.
My dear Mrs. Erlynne-- please do not come tonight...
...My wife is so upset about your invitation that
I am forced to cancel it...
Regretfully Windermere
"Mrs. Erlynne!"
"Please introduce me to
Lady Windermere."
"How kind of you to honor us!...
...I have heard so much about you - from every side."
"I have yearned - positively yearned - to meet the best dressed woman in London!"
"I am leaving England tomorrow--
You will never see me again.
Good bye, Margaret."
"Is it too late to ask you to marry me?"
"Lord Windermere is looking for you--"
"I am sure he has not missed me- you have entertained him so well."
You may have your Mrs. Erlynne-
I am going to Darlington who loves me...
Margaret.
"Your wife has a little headache - she is lying down."
"--and we became quite friendly- really!
I told her of my engagement...
...to Lord Augustus and she was delighted."
"She wants to rest, do you see?
Don't disturb her."
"Do not wake her. If necessary, make some little apology for her."
"Did you find Lady
Windermere?"
You may have your Mrs. Erlynne-
I am going to Darlington who loves me...
Margaret.
"I swear to you there is nothing between
Lord Windermere and myself!...
Go home!
Please go home!"
"Trust me, child - trust me as you would your own mother."
"How dare a woman like you speak of my mother - my mother!"
"I did just what you are doing tonight - and ruined my life."
"If they find you here you will be dishonored - an outcast!"
"I am afraid I took your wife's fan by mistake - so sorry!"
"Forgive me for intruding -
I am sure it will never be necessary again."
The following morning.
"You were right about Mrs. Erlynne.
She is thoroughly bad. Last night--"
I am just leaving for France.
I only came to say goodbye...
...Mrs Erlynne
"Don't tell him!
You would kill his love-
...and spoil the only decent thing I ever did."
"Your conduct last night was outrageous! I have decided not to marry you."
THE END
Joseph M. Schenck Presents
"Buster" Keaton in
The Haunted House [1921]
Written and directed by
"BUSTER" KEATON and
EDDIE CLINE
Wall Street
The palatialparking place of the Bull and the Bear --- mostly the Bull.
New York is not the only town that has its master mind of finance.
The bank cashier and his band of counterfeiters have a strong reason for making people believe this house is haunted.
"I'll show you waht would happen if the police came."
The time lock doesn't open till nine o'clock."
Although it's a small bank it has a president and although he is a small man he has a daughter.
"I wonder who put counterfeit money in the bank --- I'll ask the police."
GLUE
1st. NATIONAL BANK
BURGLAR PROOF
TIME LOCK
That night the Daredevil
Opera Company was executing
"Faust" --- and he deserved it.
SMOKING
After searching everywhere else the police found him where he was.
"That house is haunted."
"The little fellow from the bank is upstairs."
Today
-BULLETIN-
KEATON  |  OUT
Today
-BULLETIN-
KEATON  |  IN
THE END
Written Subtitle by:
Jaffar AlBori
THE DOCKS OF NEW YORK
The waterfront of New York
- the end of many journeys, the beginning of many adventures.
Miles of docks wait day and night for strange cargo - and stranger men.
Ships come in from the sea - tarrying a day or two in the endless journey from port to port.
These were the days before oil fuel made stoking a lady's job - when stokers earned their pay in sweat and coal-dust.
"Well, Bill! We brought the ol' barge in right on time!"
"Pick up that waste!
Nobody goes ashore till this hole is cleaned up!"
"This packet sails tomorrow morning."
"You've got one night ashore.
If any o' you muckers come back drunk, you'll do double shift!"
"He's the most even- tempered guy I ever knew - always sore!"
"He thinks we're goin' ashore to play marbles!"
The Sandbar, a cable's length from the wharf, has vanished now - wiped out by commerce and reform.
But that night it was wide awake and roaring.
Save his soul and money comes to Hymn-Book Harry
"Meet my husband!"
"Well, Andy! I guess you never expected to run across me here!"
Night and fog met the stokers coming ashore.
"Hey, Bill! That's no place to take a lady!"
"Come on, Bill. They'll take care of her!"
"Okay, Bill! Be a hero an' leave your pal!"
"But just remember Singapore - - an' recollect Shanghai!"
"Well, you gave me the air.
It's been three years - what did you expect me to do?"
"Take that out o' here - before you draw the police!"
"Get her a hot drink!"
"One hot toddy!"
"You're not goin' in there!
That's the only rag she had to her back!"
"So you're the guy that saved my life?"
"You could have saved yourself the trouble, an' let me die."
"All right! Make believe you died - make believe you're startin' all over again!"
"You left all that slush in the river, Baby. All you need is a good time!"
"I've had too many good times."
"You ain't never been out with Bill Roberts."
"Dry up before you catch cold!"
"Would you care?"
"Well, I might..."
"After a month in the stoke-hole,
I got no sympathy for anybody that wants to quit a swell world like this!"
"Throw yourself into them new rags an' give me a chance!"
"All right, Bill Roberts,
I'll give you a chance."
"Anyway, I can always make a hole in the water."
"Are you goin' to let me have a good time in my own quiet way - or must I take this place apart?"
"Thought you might want your tie - Bill."
"Pretty, ain't she?"
"You better take my tip - an' stay away from that dame!"
"Shove off, my lad! I want to talk with your lady friend."
"You may be big game aboard ship, but you're only an animal-cracker here."
"Gee, but you're strong!"
"I guess you've known a lot o' girls."
"I ain't braggin' about my love-affairs."
"I'm not braggin', either."
"Ever been married, Bill?"
"Say, who'd marry a guy like me?"
"Oh, I don't know.
A lot o' girls might."
"You ever been married, Baby?"
"Say, who'd marry a girl like me?"
"I've sailed the seven seas, but I never saw a craft as trim as you."
"I don't think it's fair of you to kid me."
"Say! What makes you think I'm kiddin'?"
"What did you ever do that makes you worse than me?
I'd marry you in a minute!"
"An' come to think of it,
I'll marry you right now!"
"You don't know Bill Roberts!
I'll try anything once!"
"Get me a parson - I'm goin' to get spliced to my girl friend!"
"Come back here, Bill - don't make a fool o' yourself!"
"Meet the bride!"
"I better get Hymn-Book Harry - before he wrecks the place!"
"I'm goin' to do right by our Nell!
I'm goin' to marry her - here an' now!"
"Do you think he can make you decent by marryin' you?"
"I don't know what to think, any more."
"Until I got married,
I was decent!"
"We'll give you a marriage you'll never forget!"
"Where's your license?"
"Are you goin' to queer our fun just because you got to have a little piece o' paper?"
"If you got to have a license,
Bill will get one first thing in the morning."
"Won't you, Bill?"
"Word of honor, Parson.
First thing in the morning!"
"Let the old fusser go!
I'll marry you."
"If any of you eggs know why these heels shouldn't get hitched, speak now or forever after hold your trap!"
"Does it mean that much to you?"
"Dearly beloved, we are gathered together in the sight of God and in the face of this company -"
"- to join this Man, and this 
Woman, in Holy Matrimony."
"Matrimony is an honorable estate .... and is not to be entered into lightly -"
"Do you take this woman to be your wedded wife?"
"Will you love her, comfort her, honor her, and keep her in sickness and in health, forsaking all others
-- as long as you both shall live?"
"Sure, I will!"
"I will."
"Give me the ring."
"Here's mine - I hope it does you more good than it did me!"
"Here's your wages, Parson.
Easy come, easy go!"
"I expect you to bring me the license in the morning. 
Pay me then."
"What's the meanin' of this jamboree?"
"Oh, I thought I'd get married, and settle down."
"But how are you goin' to get rid of her?"
"Who says I want to get rid of her?"
"I know you, Bill Roberts!
You might fool her, but you can't fool me!"
"What lady threw that shoe?"
"You don't know what this means to me, Bill!"
"I'll be a good wife, Bill."
Morning.
"Got a match, Chief?"
"I s'pose you've forgot all about last night?"
"Wasn't you never young, Chief?
I was just havin' a good time!"
"I s'pose you've forgot about gettin' married, too."
"Chief, last night's over.
Today's another day!"
"Mebbe for you, but not for me.
That sock in the jaw will cost you your job!"
"One ship's as good as another,
Chief. Any port in a storm!"
"Get out o' here - or my husband will kill you!"
"Don't kid me!"
"Don't let Bill Roberts stand between you an' me - you know he ain't comin' back!"
"You're a dirty liar!
He is comin' back!"
"Rustle that stretcher - this guy's in bad shape!"
"You won't get nowhere keepin' your mouth shut!"
"I warned you! Now beat it
- while you got time!"
"I'm her husband."
"She didn't shoot him.
The kid wouldn't hurt a fly!"
"I shot him, an' nobody else is goin' to get the credit for it."
"I'm his wife. He gave me the air once too often!"
"Why didn't you say so before?"
"I didn't care - before."
"I hope you have better luck than me - - but I doubt it."
"I didn't figure on your comin' back to help me."
"You didn't need my help, Baby."
"Goin' away - Bill?"
"Sorry, Baby. Sailin' in an hour -
- I never missed a ship in my life."
"Could you give me a minute to - to get used to it, Bill?"
"I never even thanked you for pullin' me out o' the water."
"That's all right!"
"An' I never thanked you for them swell clothes you bought me."
"That's all right, too."
"An' I guess you expect me to thank you for bein' decent enough to make me your wife."
"Now listen, kid - you can't get me sore! I never did a decent thing in my life."
"I've always been like this.
There ain't no power on earth that could ever keep me ashore!"
"Why get serious about it, anyway?
You knew all I had was one night ashore - you knew I was just a dirty stoker!"
"You ain't so bad, Bill Roberts!"
"But it would have been kind o' funny if this had been on the level
- even for a couple o' months."
"Maybe if I ever stayed ashore for as long as a couple o' months
I'd get to like it."
"Get a move on, Bill.
Time's up!"
"So long, Baby."
"Well - goodbye - Bill."
"Come on out o' this - before you get into another mess!"
"I'll fix it for you, Bill.
You can't go to sea like this."
"What are you tryin' to  do
- bring me more bad luck?"
"Superstitious, are you?"
"The nerve of that dame - bawling me out after all
I done for her!"
"I could of told you before that she was no good
- like all females!"
"Lucky for you I happened along!
If I hadn't pried you loose, she'd of stuck like a barnacle!"
"Buck into it, you two!
I want steam, not talk!"
"I'll have you put in irons for this!"
"Where's my wife?"
"In jail, where she belongs."
"What's she in jail for?"
"Why don't you go to the
Night Court an' find out?"
"Thirty days. Next case!"
"You are charged with having in your possession clothes stolen from the Harbor Pawn Shop."
"How did you get them?"
"My husband gave them to me."
"Where is your husband?"
"He left me this morning."
"How long have you been married?"
"I was married last night."
"Thirty days. Next case!"
"Just a minute, Captain!
I'm her husband.
I pinched them duds myself!"
"Break in anywhere - take anything you want - - that's your idea, I suppose?"
"No, sir, I rung the bell!
But there wasn't no answer, so I helped myself."
"I see - man of importance
- no time to waste.
Just what was your hurry?"
"Well sir, I'm a stoker.
I only had one night ashore, an' I wanted to have a good time."
"Sixty days will slow you down.
Release the woman. Next case!"
"Sixty days ain't a long cruise,
Baby - an' it'll be my last one, if you'll wait.
"I guess I'd wait forever, Bill."
Buster Keaton in "Go West"
Written and Directed by Buster Keaton
"GO WEST, YOUNG MAN, GO WEST"
Horace Greeley (1811 – 1872)
Some people travel through life making friends where ever they go, while others -
Just travel through life.
In a little town in Indiana, the social standing of -
- a certain young man had kept him continuously on the move.
GENERAL MERCHANDISE
"I'll give you a dollar sixty five for the whole business."
"I've tried every place in town for a job, do you suppose there's any use asking you?"
SOUTHERN RAILROAD
CANADIAN PACIFIC RAILWAY
NEW YORK CENTRAL RAILROAD
A.T. & S. F.
Brown Eyes.
"Do you need any cowboys today?"
"I'm working here."
"You don't seem to be."
"Tell that new hand to get a horse and go help the boys."
"I'm shipping a thousand head, Thursday.
I can't hold out any longer."
"Get those steers back in there."
"Wave something red and they'll come to you."
"Get a brand on that cow."
The day of the shipment.
"What do you mean by selling cattle now, -
- when you know I am holding out for a higher price?"
"That's my business."
"You'll not ship cattle out of this country if I can stop it."
"He threatens to stop the cattle. -
- And if they don't reach the stockyards, I'm ruined."
"Put her in there, she goes too."
"Where?"
"To the slaughter-house."
"She's not going!"
"You can't buy her, she'll bring twice that much."
"Why don't you let him have her."
"You boys see that the train gets through."
"When you say that - SMILE."
A.T. & S. F.
PASADENA
Contents : CATTLE
Destination : Union Stock Yards, - 
- Los Angeles, California.
When Empty Return this Car to
"-- and if they don't reach the stockyards, I'm ruined."
ROOMS FOR RENT
AUTO PARK
Pig 'n Whistle (It was originally a chain of restaurants and candy shops, founded by John Gage in 1906.)
TURKISH BATH
MASQUERADE COSTUMES
"Can you give me something red?"
"Captain, there's a thousand cattle roaming the streets!"
"There's five thousand steers outside!!"
"There's ten thousand wild cows loose in the street!!"
"There's a million bulls in town!!!"
"Call out the Fire Department to help stop the stampede."
"Arrest the man responsible for this."
POLICE STATION
UNION STOCK YARDS
"Have you seen anything of my cattle?"
"I guess we're through."
"My home and anything I have is yours for the asking."
"I want her."
THE END
Subtitle by Reza Fa
Where have you been?
All aboard!
All aboard!
What did he say?
Does this train go to Pottsville?
Keep your ears open, All aboard!
All trains going west...
All aboard.
Thank you.
All aboard! All trains going west...
- ..and Pottsville.
- That's our train!
Don't stand there.
Help me pick the music up!
Hey, come on. The train's about to go.
Come on, Stan!
This is the last train today! Come on!
Watch where you're going!
Come on, give me that stuff!
Bye, Ollie!
Well, we've lost the music.
Now what are we gonna do?
- We can fake it.
- Fake it!
A good thing you didn't lose the fiddle or we would be sunk.
Sit down! l'll find the conductor.
Hey! What's the idea?! l'm awfully sorry, sir. He didn't see you. l can't trust you anyplace. Get back.
What are you trying to do?
Where are you fellas going?
- We're going to Pottsville.
- Sit down.
-l'm the manager of this act.
- Let me see your tickets.
Pottsville. What are you fellas gonna do in Pottsville?
We're a big-time vaudeville act.
Well, l'll bet you're good.
- Come with me.
- Come on.
Don't hit me like that.
That's it.
- Where are you gonna sleep?
- l'm gonna sleep up there.
We can't get up there with this. l don't care. l'm the manager of the act.
There's people sleeping here.
You'll have to keep quiet.
- l'm sorry.
- (Baby cries)
- Good night!
- Shh!
Get up there and let's go to bed.
Give me that.
- Shh!
- Don't shush me.
Nearly broke my head.
Now take your shoes off and go up to sleep.
You're getting nowhere.
Put your foot in there.
When l push you up, grab it.
That's right. Get over there.
Put your foot in.
Grab it.
Hey!
This is our berth. Get up there.
Get up there.
- Why, you...!
- Shh!
Get up on my back.
Do you mind hurrying?
Thank you.
Now lay down. Don't you hit me like that!
- (Baby cries)
- Shh!
Don't shush me. Hold my hand. l wish l'd checked you with the baggage.
You make me sick!
All right now, lady!
Let's get to bed.
We've got four shows to do tomorrow.
Would you not crowd me so much?
Get your head off of mine.
- Say, you're choking me.
- l can't help it.
- l'm trying to get my suspender off.
- Why didn't you get another berth? lt was the only thing they had.
Don't crowd so much.
Don't keep pushing me like that.
You take up more room.
You're choking me.
- (Baby cries)
- Shh!
Don't shush me. Shut up!
Don't you hit me like that.
Get your foot outta my face.
- And don't crowd!
- l can't help it.
Why don't you stay on your own side?
Will you quit crowding?
Would you mind getting a little further and don't crowd? l look like a mackerel fish.
Keep that thing off my foot. Give it to me.
We won't be bothered with that.
Did you know that you have my pants on your leg?
Get over on your side.
Don't you hit me like that!
And keep quiet.
- Look out. My foot.
- Get your foot outta the way.
Wait a minute. l want to press these pants. l'll lay on that side.
Fix this bed up so we can go to sleep.
Hand me those clothes.
Will you get over there and quit crowding?
Give me that sheet over here!
Next stop is Pottsville.
Pottsville!
All out for Pottsville.
Come on, this is where we get off.
Pottsville.
Hurry up and get your clothes on.
Call for Potts...
Where's the fiddle?
Hmm.
Sure.
Wait a minute now. Don't lose your temper. lt was your fault you put the thing under the seat. l told you not to do it. Wait a minute!
CHEMI BEBIA
MY GRANDMOTHER
Written by
Georgi Mdivani - Kote Miqaberidze
Directed by
Kote Miqaberidze
Photography:
A . Polikevich - V. Poznan
Art direction:
Iraki Gamrekeli
Story:
A. Takaishvili
- E. Chernova - E. Ovanov
Ak. Khorava - G. Abesadze
In production of
Goskinproma Georgia, 1929
We decided to restore this film not only because of its artistic merit.
We are convinced that even today it will be able to combat certain sheme of practices still present in our society.
Restoration directed by
Leyla Gordeladze
Titles:
G. Mdivani - L. Gordeladze
Music by
Oleg Karavaychuk
Sound engineer:
Shoshitayshvili N. Mount: O. Gevorgyan
Photo effects, photography:
K. Sarishvili
Edited by
A. Dzhugeli
Production manager:
S. Sikharulidze
This film was restored at the 'Order of
Lenin Winning', Gruzia Film Studios, 1976.
THE T.O.R.K. TRUST
REGISTRAR
CLOAK
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
OFFICE MANAGER
CONTROLLER
ACCOUNTING
CASHIER
CHIEF ACCOUNTANT
'No handshaking!'
GENERAL COUNCIL
SECRETARY
BOARD MEMBER
VICE CHAIR OF THE BOARD
'When your business is finished, leave!'
The early bird.
Already working away.
POLITICAL EDUCATION PRIMER
And as for the senior executives...
CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD
'No admits! 'Meeting in progress.'
No fair... You got a car and
I got nothing.
Shhh... I don't need any deputy for this.
OFFICE MANAGER
"Nothing aggravates a busy man more than a loafer."
She loves me. She loves me not.
She loves me. She loves me not.
She loves me!
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
TYPISTS
'No admits under any circumstances!'
Fighting for a promotion.
The man with the briefcase.
Acting rationally.
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
My position!
No, mine!
To the director of the Trust....
Confidential...
Wow. With such connections he could be the director.
A petition to the T.O.R.K. Trust from the worker, A. Khorava.
Please, allocate 50 rubels for the needs of our production team.
Work is being held up..
Petition No. 78903 from a worker.
To be circulating.
Expedite.
More discussion.
Bureaucrats!
NO SPITTING. NO SPITTING.
BUSINESS MANAGER
'By appointment only!'
DON'T INTERRUPT!
BUSY MAN AT WORK!
The busy man was working.
NO SMOKING
- Soon?
- No, the plan is still being developed.
When nothing happens, even time stops.
But the Youth Communist League our 'Junior Cavalry'.
THE IRON BROOM
DO LESS IF YOU DO IT WELL
The new business manager.
FIRED FOR BUREAUCRATIC ACCESS
About time. At long last by Order of the Workers and Peasants Inspection
business manager Deliagin has been fired, for being a notorious idler
and bureaucrate. About time.
Workers reporter: Gaika
And the fired manager doesn't know what to do with himself.
Everything she has ever dreamed on she got on the black market.
Oh, is there another husband like mine?
What are you doing up there, daddy?
Practicing.
See how funny our papa looks there...
You've never introduced me to the worker reporter, Gaika.
You're so possessive!
Fired! Then, no more car!
No flat! No free tickets!
A divorce!
A diivorce! Or a job!
The bastard has already found to set up. Maybe he'll help me?
Be a pal! Teach me how to set myself up.
No job and no family!
You idiot! All you need is a grandmother.
No 1. Find a grandmother.
No 2. Be a pest.
No 3. Be pushy.
Sum total... a job.
NO CIGARETTE BUTTS ON THE FLOOR!
BUSINESS MANAGER - SECRETARY
NO CIGARETTE BUTTS
ON THE FLOOR
Find a grandmother. Be a pest.
Be pushy. A job.
I am a great employee. Could you write a note to the director of the Trust?
Dear Comrade Sasha!
This letter will be brought to you by a certain...
To the director of the Trust... </ i >
Personal.
Urgent.
Confidential.
Thank you my friend!
Thank you my dearest!
You are now like a father and a mother to me. You are my dear grandmother.
REGISTRAR
- Oh, come back to me! - Ah, what about the divorce? Did you ask for one?
Invoice for the future.
...stockings...
...dress fabric, 30 m...
...shoes, 4 pairs...
At his destination.
I am an ex-executive.
And I am the wife of the future executive.
I have a letter of recommendation.
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is a recommendation.
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is a recomm...
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is...
Directors are changed.
The jobs remain.
I'm an experienced administrator...
I am an...
Wait... Where the hell are you going?
Shhh... Quiet... He'll fly away.
Here you are. An impressive recommendation.
Dear Comrade Sasha! This letter will be brought to you by a...
Dear Comrade Sasha! This letter will be brought to you by a...
a certain scoundrel who pushed me over the edge
with his endless pestering.
Kick him the hell out of there!
With Communist regards...
...to bureaucratic delays...
...to sloppiness...
...to bureaucrats...
...Death!
Death to bureaucratic delays, to sloppiness,
to bureaucrats!
THE END
Music composed by Beth Custer
Performed by
The Beth Custer Ensemble
Transcribed by mitbrille
Karagarga@2014
:Joseph M. Schenck Presents
"Buster" Keaton in
Convict 13 [1920]
Written and directed by
"BUSTER" KEATON and
EDDIE CLINE
Golf - the game that brings out the beast in men.
Written Subtitle by:
Jaffar AlBori
"Fore!"
GUARD
WARDEN
"She loves me, she loves me not..."
"You shouldn't have gone to all the trouble just for me."
"I want you to meet my father."
"You are to be hanged today."
"This is the guy we're hanging today."
"Don't worry. it'll work just fine."
CHAMPION
HEAVY WEIGHT
HANGMAN
"Sorry. boys. We'll fix it and tomorrow we'll hang two of to make up for this."
"Nice day we're having. eh?"
"If you want to see who's boss, just try me!"
ASSISTANT
WARDEN
"The riot starts at three o'clock"
THE END
TWO SHY MEN
Inspired by the comedy by
Cast:
You see, gentlemen, how this wretch treated his wife...
Mr. Fremissin, a shy young man, who was pleading his first case. for the accused, all the severity of the Court!
An example must be made and
I ask for this man all the severity of the Court.
The Defense will now speak.
The young man's aunt, as excited as her nephew...
I ask for my client... all the severity of the Court!
Three months in prison!
Two years later...
Garadoux, now a widower, lives in a village where no one knows his past.
Two years haven't cured
Fremissin's shyness...
"You Must Love Me"
She's the daughter of a landlord from around here.
It would be an advantage to your nephew...
Another shy person,
Mr. Thibaudier was this same night very embarrassed...
I am a widower with a good position.
I love your daughter.
But I've been waiting for your answer for two months...
She's charming. Be audacious.
That's the secret to success.
She'll love me when we're married
...Come on, say yes.
The two young people, from this day, were always thinking of each other.
If you love her, make her love you.
Be daring. Try to see her again.
Every day, Fremissin went to the village where Cecile lived, hoping to meet her.
But Mr. Garadoux insists that
I've given him your hand...
Besides, I should have rejected him earlier!
I don't want to marry him.
Why haven't you told him so?
I've arranged everything.
My family's coming tomorrow with the lawyer to sign the contract.
Unfortunately I'm engaged.
Yes, Mademoiselle Cecile walked by with a young man.
Go see my father today. Ask for me boldly. It's the only way.
Papa, a young man is going to come and ask for my hand.
It's him I want to marry and not Garadoux!
He didn't ask me anything!
And tomorrow Garadoux is coming with his family and the lawyer.
If you come back to this village again, you're a dead man!
The next day.
My father says you didn't talk to him. 
Come quickly. Love, Cecile
If you leave your house you're dead.
 - A masked man
The Thibaudier family waits for the Garadouxs and the lawyer.
Not a word about my past.
I won't come down. I don't want to marry that man!
Cecile isn't ready. She'll come down when the lawyer arrives.
I'm going to the Thibaudiers. 
I'm the lawyer.
Don't go! The house is full of masked bandits.
The Thibaudiers are being held prisoner by masked bandits!
The house is being attacked by bandits!
The bandits are giving themselves up.
We're saved! 
Where are the bandits?
Why Mr. Garadoux! 
If you were the bandit, then you must want to go back to prison.
The poor man beat his wife.
I had him sentenced to three months in prison.
The poor man. 
They've killed him!
The Garadouxs, having sued the 
Thibaudiers for damages,
Fremessin  had to defend his future father-in-law.
But in court the shy men...
Subtitles by ironhills
December 2010
